7 - Lung
Stuart S. Sagel
LARGE AIRWAYS
Trachea
With the advent of multidetector row scanners, CT has become the major imaging technique for evaluation of the trachea and major bronchi (189,318,386,414,665).
Although most disease processes involving these structures are initially detected on plain chest radiography or endoscopy, CT is extremely valuable in determining the extent of disease and in differential diagnosis. CT is far superior to endoscopy in evaluating peritracheobronchial spread of disease and extraluminal pathology.
Unlike single-detector CT, multidetector-row CT (MDCT) allows 1- mm transaxial slice thickness of the entire tracheobronchial tree and provides superb quality two-dimensional (2D) and three-dimensional (3D) reformations of the central airways, including multiplanar
(coronal/sagittal), minimum-intensity projections (MinIPs), 3D shaded-surface displays, and volume-rendered images (491).
Internal rendering of the tracheobronchial wall and lumen can be obtained using so called virtual bronchoscopy techniques (213,482).
Although the use of IV contrast enhancement is not necessary for evaluation of the central airways per se, it is often valuable in helping depict extraluminal pathology.

Tracheal Diseases
Diseases of the trachea are noted in Table 7-1. The most common focal disease of the trachea is a benign stricture (Fig. 7-1), usually the result of prior intubation or tracheostomy.
Tracheal neoplasms are relatively uncommon, with 90% being malignant (338). The two major types of tracheal carcinomas are squamous cell (55%) and adenocystic (18%). The latter have a more insidious clinical onset related to a slower growth pattern.
Hematogenous metastases to the tracheal mucosa, such as from melanoma or breast carcinoma, are rare. Malignant tracheal neoplasms usually appear on CT as an eccentric irregular soft tissue mass within the lumen, most typically arising from the posterior and lateral wall (Fig. 7-2). CT is very valuable in assessing their possible resectability, by defining extent of tumor, possible direct invasion of contiguous mediastinal structures such as the esophagus and aorta, and any associated mediastinal lymph node metastases.
Benign tracheal tumors include squamous papilloma (almost always occurring initially in young children), pleomorphic adenoma, mesenchymal hamartoma, and those of cartilaginous origin. These benign neoplasms tend to be well circumscribed, smoothly marginated, and less than 2 cm in diameter.
In tracheobronchomegaly (Fig. 7-3) or the Mounier-Kuhn syndrome (Fig. 7-4), there is diffuse dilatation of the trachea (greater than 3 cm) and central bronchi, with the formation of diverticula in the wall, as the result of atrophy of the cartilage, muscles, and elastic tissues of the central airways (359).
Relapsing polychondritis may manifest as diffuse smooth narrowing of the trachea and central bronchi (Fig. 7-5). 
Tracheobronchopathia osteochondroplastica (Fig. 7-6), amyloidosis, sarcoidosis, and Wegener granulomatosis (Fig. 7-7) typically appear as irregular narrowing of the tracheobronchial lumens. Tracheobronchopathia osteochondroplastica is characterized by the presence of small 2- to
5-mm osteocartilaginous nodules within the submucosa of the trachea and central bronchi. CT shows these small, calcified intraluminal masses arising from the anterior and lateral walls, sparing the posterior membranous trachea.


Bronchi
As stated previously, CT is a sensitive technique for depicting anatomic distortions (dilatation, thickening, narrowing) (Fig. 7-8) involving the major bronchi. Approximately 95% of endobronchial lesions that are identified by fiberoptic bronchoscopy can be detected by CT, including virtually all primary neoplasms (Fig. 7-9), especially when thinly collimated images are obtained in the area of interest (229,413,415,416,421,422) (Fig. 7-10). Associated changes in the distal pulmonary parenchyma such as collapse (Figs. 7-11 and
7-12), consolidation (Fig. 7-13) and, rarely, focal overdistension (see Fig. 7-10B) may be demonstrated.
Proper assessment of airway morphology necessitates that the CT slice thickness chosen be no larger, and preferably thinner, than the diameter of the airway being evaluated (191). Multiplanar or 3D reconstructions may be advantageous in selected cases, particularly if surgery is planned, especially to assess the length of stenosis in obliquely oriented airways (102,267,319). Critical information may be more easily conveyed to the surgeon in these planes, even though sometimes no real additional diagnostic information is provided. Internally rendered images of the airway lumen also may be constructed, so-called virtual bronchoscopy , which simulate the perspective of the bronchoscopist (622). However, with such methodology artifacts are sometimes induced that simulate pathology, and no information about the bronchial mucosa or histology of a lesion is provided.
Due to its better spatial resolution, CT is superior to MRI in demonstrating both normal bronchi and endobronchial masses (366). CT may be helpful in the selection of patients for bronchoscopy or an alternative diagnostic test (38,136).
It can be used when the clinical suspicion of endobronchial disease is low to improve the potential diagnostic yield of bronchoscopy; that technique may be obviated if CT shows no bronchial abnormality. Predicting whether an abnormality seen on CT is endobronchial, submucosal, or extrinsic (peribronchial) is fraught with error, and CT is not as accurate as bronchoscopy in detecting submucosal spread of neoplasm. When transbronchial needle aspiration biopsy is contemplated, CT may be of major assistance in deciding whether it is warranted and also in guiding its application because it provides a detailed assessment of any associated mediastinal lymph node mass and its relationship to the adjacent major airways and vessels (521). Sometimes a benign etiology for a suspected lesion, such as broncholithiasis (302) (see Figs. 7-11 and 7-13), is demonstrated. On CT, calcification that is either endobronchial or peribronchial usually is visible, and the involved bronchus may be narrowed or completely obstructed. There may be distal lung atelectasis, consolidation, bronchiectasis, or rarely, air-trapping.
Ectopic bronchi, including an accessory cardiac bronchus or a tracheal bronchus, which may predispose to recurrent lung infections, can be recognized on CT. In a patient with congenital bronchial atresia, CT may depict concomitant regional lung hypodensity beyond a dilated mucus-filled bronchus more convincingly than conventional chest roentgenography (Fig. 7-14).

Bronchial Adenoma
Comprising a group of neoplasms that generally arise within the proximal bronchi or trachea, the term bronchial adenoma  is an acknowledged misnomer because these lesions are neither benign nor usually glandular. All of the various histologic types including carcinoid (75%), cylindroma, adenocystic, and mucoepidermoid should be considered low-grade carcinomas (612). These malignant neoplasms usually grow slowly but may metastasize to the mediastinal lymph nodes or extrathoracic sites.
The primary lesion may grow predominantly intraluminally or, alternatively, may have a small intraluminal component while extending deep into the adjacent peribronchial (pulmonary parenchyma or mediastinum) or paratracheal soft tissues (Fig. 7-15). If the lesion is mainly intraluminal, the bronchus may become occluded (Fig. 7-16). Although distal air trapping may occur, most commonly atelectasis or obstructive pneumonitis in the subtended lung results, which may be lobar or segmental, depending on the location and size of the lesion.

Pulmonary carcinoids arise from neurosecretory cells in the conducting airway, and comprise about 2% of lung neoplasms (522). These neuroendocrine cells can give rise to a spectrum of carcinomas, ranging from well differentiated (so called typical carcinoid ) to moderately differentiated (previously termed atypical carcinoid ) to the extremely aggressive small cell undifferentiated carcinoma of the lung. The well differentiated neuroendocrine carcinomas (80%) arise in the central airway, most typically the right upper and middle lobe bronchi, occur usually between the ages of 35 to 50 years, and have a frequency of metastasis of about 5%.
The moderately differentiated neuroendocrine carcinomas (or atypical carcinoids), are seen in somewhat older patients, tend to occur more peripherally beyond the segmented bronchi, and metastasize in about 70% of patients. Because of their location and relatively indolent growth, central carcinoids frequently present as hemoptysis, cough or recurrent infection. The carcinoid syndrome is rare (3%).
CT can be very helpful in the preoperative definition of the total extent of these infiltrating neoplasms, especially the extraluminal component (23,419). When no extension outside the bronchial wall is seen, local sleeve resection of the tumor with repair of the bronchus may be feasible (Fig. 7-17). The well-differentiated neuroendocrine carcinoma (typical carcinoid) generally is highly vascular and usually demonstrates substantial enhancement following dynamic IV contrast administration. It also may arise more peripherally in the lung, almost always in close proximity to a bronchus, and usually appears as a sharply marginated nodule frequently containing some stippled calcification (Fig. 7-18).


Bronchogenic Carcinoma
Bronchogenic carcinoma currently is the leading cause of cancer death (27%) in both men and women older than 35 years in the industrialized world. More individuals die from this neoplasm in the United States than from the three next most common causes of cancer death (breast, colorectal, and prostate carcinoma) combined.
CT serves a dual role in the patient suspected to have a bronchogenic carcinoma based on the plain chest radiograph.
Initially, it may substantially facilitate the diagnostic evaluation, by providing more precise characterization of the size, contour, extent, and tissue composition of the suspicious lesion (7,31,316,317). In addition, if the lesion likely represents a lung carcinoma, CT can notably influence the therapeutic plan as it serves as part of the staging process to assess the extent of the disease (53,325).
Commonly, CT is first performed to confirm or further assess an abnormality seen on the chest radiography. Such a CT examination, in approximately 20% of patients referred to a tertiary care center, will demonstrate that the questioned abnormal opacity represents an inconsequential or benign lesion (467) (Figs. 7-19, 7-20, 7-21, 7-22). 
A benign etiology (e.g., granuloma, hamartoma, arteriovenous malformation, broncholithiasis) may be confidently distinguished from a suspected primary malignant neoplasm, and either further workup obviated or different investigation and/or management directed (Fig. 7-23).
The findings on the CT examination can be valuable in directing further evaluation and establishing a definitive pathologic diagnosis when the lesion in question probably represents a bronchogenic carcinoma (17,280,325,326,362). The likelihood of a positive diagnosis from bronchoscopy can be predicted if a bronchus is seen leading to or contained within the pulmonary lesion (146,423) (Fig.
7-24). Because CT provides a detailed depiction of the segmental and usually the subsegmental bronchi, determination of the location of an endobronchial mass may be a helpful adjunct in directing the bronchoscopist to the appropriate biopsy site. An alternative appropriate diagnostic and/or staging test may be suggested, be it a transcervical mediastinoscopy (Figs. 7-25 and 7-26), anterior parasternal mediastinotomy (Figs. 7-27 and 7-28), percutaneous or transbronchoscopic needle biopsy (Figs. 7-29 and 7-30), and sometimes direct thoracotomy if the lesion is almost certainly neoplastic and no additional abnormalities are discerned (Figs. 7-31 and 7-32). CT can be helpful in planning and guiding percutaneous needle biopsy (131), although often larger peripheral lesions can be biopsied under fluoroscopic or ultrasound guidance. Small subpleural blebs may be seen on CT that were not apparent on plain chest radiographs, prompting a revision in the direction of the biopsy needle to reduce the risk of producing a pneumothorax.
Because the overall accuracy of CT and MRI are quite similar, and because CT is more readily available, less costly, and quicker to perform, it usually is the initial cross-sectional tomographic procedure chosen. In selected cases, MRI can play a complementary role. A focused MRI examination may be used to resolve a specific question related to invasion of the mediastinum or chest wall, or in further characterization of an adrenal mass. MRI should be considered an alternative primary tomographic technique in a patient with a central mass in whom iodinated IV contrast media cannot be administered and possibly with suspected superior sulcus tumor.
There are at least a dozen different types of lung cancer (523). More than 95% arise from the bronchial or bronchiolar epithelium or from bronchial mucus glands; these carcinomas may be of the squamous cell (epidermoid), adenocarcinomas, or large or small cell undifferentiated type. For pragmatic reasons, bronchogenic carcinoma is often divided into two broad histologic categories: nonsmall cell and small cell. Despite significant advances in chemotherapy and radiation therapy, cure of nonsmall cell bronchogenic carcinoma (approximately 85% of these carcinomas) basically is achievable only by surgical resection, and then only in certain categories of limited disease. Small cell carcinomas are rarely amenable to surgical treatment because of their aggressive behavior and usual widespread involvement at the time of presentation. A few of these patients with limited disease at presentation or when a preoperative histologic diagnosis wasn'testablished will have surgical resection, but postoperative chemotherapy generally is used as micrometastases are suspected to be present in most patients.
Ultimately, only about 40% of patients with newly diagnosed bronchogenic carcinoma are amenable to surgical resection with curative intent. Accurate preoperative staging is extremely desirable for differentiating those patients with localized disease suitable for curative surgery from those with more widespread neoplasm better managed with palliative therapy. Surgery should be restricted for complete tumor resection; incomplete palliative resection in patients with advanced disease should be avoided. A resectable tumor is defined simply as technically one that can be completely removed by surgery. Operability takes into consideration whether surgery is appropriate therapy considering the patient's overall medical condition, as well as the presumptive prognosis and operative morbidity and mortality rate related to the size, location, and histology of the primary lesion.

Staging
Treatment of bronchogenic carcinoma, as just described, is dependent not only on the patient's overall medical status and the histology of the tumor, but also on the stage of the disease. The purpose of any staging system is to provide consistency in communication about the extent of disease to help determine prognosis, thus serving as a basis for selection of the most appropriate therapeutic option. Accurate preoperative staging of a new lung cancer is essential to select those patients with localized disease for curative surgery and those with widespread neoplasm for palliative therapy, and is a combined responsibility of the radiologist, pulmonologist, thoracic surgeon, and the pathologist, based on clinical (physical) findings, in conjunction with radiologic and laboratory assessment, and supplemented by pathologic sampling (e.g., bronchoscopy, mediastinoscopy, needle biopsy, videoscopic assisted thoracic surgery). The tumor, node, metastases (TNM) system (Table 7-2), which relates to both resectability and operability, is most commonly used for lung neoplasms, in which T describes the features of the primary tumor, N refers to the presence or absence of regional lymph node involvement, and M refers to the status of extrathoracic metastases. Lymph node status (N) is a better predictor of long-term results than the size of the primary tumor (T). The N category precisely identifies anatomic regions of mediastinal nodal involvement based on defined nodal stations (see Fig. 5-56 and Table 5-1 in Chapter 5).


The classification consists of four stages (Table 7-3). Stages I and II patients (about 25% at presentation) have primary carcinomas confined within the pleura, with or without hilar lymph node involvement; they are usually surgically resectable. Stage IIIa disease is classified as operable. The technical proficiencies and approaches of surgeons vary and disparate opinions may arise over the definition of limited invasion or nodal disease, and consequently, resectability. Patients with stage IIIa disease have limited invasion of the mediastinum or chest wall (T3), and are considered potentially resectable if vital structures in the mediastinum are not involved. It also includes patients with limited ipsilateral mediastinal nodal disease, which sometimes may besurgically resected for cure. Most available data suggest that surgery improves prognosis only when such metastases are restricted to a single low mediastinal lymph node station and do not extend through their capsule (no bulk nodal disease present).
Histology other than well-differentiated squamous cell carcinoma in mediastinal nodal metastases also equates with poor survival following surgical resection. Stage IIIb carcinomas directly invade the vital mediastinal structures (T4) (great vessels, heart, aerodigestive tract), or are associated with a malignant pleural effusion, or have spread to contralateral or supraclavicular lymph nodes (N3); they are virtually always unresectable for cure.
Generally, bronchogenic carcinomas are considered to be unresectable if they are classified as T4, N3, or M1 (stage IV) (449).
It is important to reemphasize that different surgeons apply different criteria for considering a lesion resectable,
P.443 sometimes influenced by the clinical status and age of the patient, especially in the stage IIIa category.
TABLE 7-3 STAGE GROUPING OF TUMOR, NODE, METATASES
(TNM) CATEGORIES FOR LUNG CANCER AND 5-YEAR
SURVIVALStage Tumor(T)Nodes
(N)Metastases
(M)5-Year
Survival(%)
IA T1 N0 M0 61
IB T2 N0 M0 38
IIA T1 N1 M0 34
IIB* T2 N1 M0 24
T3 N0 M0 22
T1 or T2 N2 M0 13
IIIA T3 N1 or
N2M0 9
 Any T N3 M0 7
IIIB T4 Any N M0 3
IV Any T Any N M1 1
*Pancoast tumors are IIB (T3N0).
   Multiple lesions
      same lobe T4
      different lobe M1
The TNM system is helpful in describing the anatomic extent ofdisease in an individual patient and roughly correlates with survival, but it has several drawbacks. There is limited ability to distinguish between primary lesions of disparate size and location. No histologic differentiation is inherent, and no distinction is made between intracapsular nodal metastases and extracapsular matted nodes.
Lymph nodes status (N) is a better predictor of long-term results than the size of the primary tumor (T) (453,464). The survival of patients with non–small cell carcinoma correlates relatively well with the anatomic extent or stage of the disease, whereas survival in small cell undifferentiated carcinoma generally does not correlate
(69,568,637). Thus small cell carcinoma is usually described as limited  (confined to the ipsilateral hemithorax and the contained lymph nodes, without a pleural effusion) or extensive  (spread beyond these areas).
CT staging of the thorax and upper abdomen has a high accuracy in helping predict the likelihood of curative surgical resection
(65,66,154,257). But its role is not by itself to determine operability or establish prognosis. CT defines gross anatomic abnormalities but has definite histologic limitations and high specificity may not be possible. The detection of an enlarged mediastinal lymph node, or an enlarged adrenal gland or focal liver lesion should not constitute sufficient evidence for inoperability because such an abnormality may not be due to metastatic neoplasm, even in a patient with a documented bronchogenic carcinoma. Histologic corroboration of metastatic neoplasm within the enlarged node or abnormal organ is strongly recommended in patients otherwise considered operative candidates. Based on CT localization of suspected disease, the appropriate biopsy procedure and access route can be determined.
CT should not be used to replace invasive techniques of staging, such as transcervical mediastinoscopy (see Figs. 7-25 and 7-26), anterior parasternal mediastinotomy (see Figs. 7-27 and 7-28), percutaneous needle biopsy (see Fig. 7-29), or transbronchoscopic needle aspiration biopsy (see Fig. 7-30) (214,625), but to optimize more selective use of these techniques. CT, perhaps in conjunctionwith positron emission tomography (PET), may obviate invasive staging for patients with negative findings besides the primary tumor.
CT is clearly superior to standard radiologic techniques for demonstrating direct extension of the primary neoplasm into the mediastinum or chest wall and detecting enlarged mediastinal lymph nodes, particularly in the pretracheal, aortopulmonary, and subcarinal areas. In those patients with clinically evident metastatic disease or unequivocal mediastinal lymphadenopathy on plain chest radiography precluding resection, a CT study is not required for staging purposes per se. Nevertheless, CT may be valuable for biopsy planning or for development of radiation therapy portals, and to assess the results of any subsequent chemotherapy. The anatomic information derived from CT scans regarding the extent of the neoplastic disease and its relationship to adjacent structures, as well as measurements of surrounding tissue thickness, alters the design of the planned radiation dose distribution in approximately one third of patients to maximize tumor coverage and minimize irradiation to uninvolved areas (117).
Extent of the Primary Tumor (the T factor) . Contiguous extension of a primary bronchogenic carcinoma into the mediastinum, particularly when mediastinal vascular invasion has occurred, generally precludes curative surgical resection. The mediastinal structures requiring critical assessment depend on the site of the primary tumor. With right upper lobe (RUL) lesions, the superior vena cava, right main bronchus, and carina need to be carefully analyzed. With left upper lobe (LUL) carcinomas, spread can occur around the aortic arch and into the aortopulmonary window, and to the main pulmonary artery. Both middle lobe and lingular cancers can directly invade the pericardium and heart.
Lower lobe lesions may involve the left atrium, inferior pulmonary vein, esophagus, or diaphragm; those on the right side also can extend to the inferior vena cava and left-sided tumors to the descending aorta.With conventional tomography, it is generally impossible to determine whether a centrally situated pulmonary mass invades the mediastinum or merely lies in close proximity to it. On CT, mediastinal invasion should be absent if a preserved fat plane or portion of the lung is demonstrated between the primary neoplasm and the mediastinal structures (168,231,341). It should be emphasized that a neoplastic mass simply contacting the mediastinal pleura, with the lack of a well-defined fat plane between the lesion and the mediastinum, does not indicate mediastinal invasion. A low probability of invasion exists if the tumor merely touches the mediastinal fat over a very short distance, with the angle subtended between the lesion and mediastinum less than 90 degrees. The soft tissue attenuation tumor mass must infiltrate into
(interdigitate with) the mediastinal fat and extend around and oftentimes substantially distort the great vessels or major bronchi before unresectable extension can be confidently diagnosed (Figs. 7-
33, 7-34, 7-35, 7-36, 7-37). Optimal IV contrast media administration is usually a requisite to confirm or exclude mediastinal vascular encasement. Limited invasion of the mediastinal pleura or pericardium with sparing of vital structures
(T3) does not preclude curative resection. Tumors demonstrating more extensive invasion of the mediastinum must also involve critical structures such as the great vessels, trachea or carina, esophagus, or heart to be classified as unresectable (T4, or stage
IIIb). A vital role of the radiologist is to determine whether a T4 classification is justified based on unequivocal CT (or MRI) findings.
A major contribution of CT has been in establishing such advanced bronchogenic carcinomas and
P.444
P.445
P.446 excluding these patients from surgical consideration. However, it is not always possible to distinguish T3 from T4 lesions; an indeterminate category would occur when some obliteration of themediastinal fat is present, or the angle subtended exceeds 90 degrees, or when the mediastinal vascular or airway distortion is minimal (Fig. 7-38). In most instances, these patients remain candidates for surgical resection. Sometimes, clinical experience must be interjected into the equation. Although central tumors with pulmonary venous extension theoretically are resectable, the prognosis in such circumstances is dismal and oftentimes such a finding contributes to considering a patient to be inoperable although technically not unresectable (Fig. 7-39).
Figure 7-32  Bronchogenic carcinomas. A, B: Sequential CT images show a spiculated right lower lobe adenocarcinoma with associated pleural tags. C: In another patient, CT shows a spiculated left upper lobe squamous cell carcinoma with desmoplastic retraction of the major fissure anteriorly ( arrowhead ).
Figure 7-33  Unresectable bronchogenic carcinoma. A:
CT shows a large mass occluding the right upper lobe bronchus ( black arrow ), directly invading into the mediastinum, with extension to the precarinal area ( white arrowhead ) and infiltration into the superior vena cava ( black arrowhead ). The atelectatic lung distal to the mass demonstrates greater enhancement ( curved arrows ). Enhancement of the azygos vein ( white arrow ) due to collateral flow. B: More caudally, CT shows the mass circumferentially around a narrowed right main stem bronchus extending towards the aorta.Figure 7-34  Unresectable bronchogenic carcinoma. A, B:
Sequential CT scans demonstrate extensive mediastinal invasion into the subcarinal area ( S) with circumferential narrowing of the bronchus intermedius ( arrow) and the right pulmonary artery ( arrowheads ). A small pericardial effusion also is present.Figure 7-35  Unresectable pleomorphic carcinoma of the trachea. A: Transaxial CT demonstrates extensive infiltration of the mediastinum between the trachea and medial aspect of the aortic arch, with the mass abutting the esophagus. B: Volume-rendered sagittal CT image shows the large tracheal tumor invading the mediastinum
(arrowheads ).Figure 7-36  Unresectable bronchogenic carcinoma. A, B:
Sequential CT images show a large, necrotic squamous cell carcinoma of the left upper lobe invading the mediastinal fat (f) and the left pulmonary artery (p).Figure 7-37  Unresectable bronchogenic carcinoma. CT demonstrates a large central left lung mass, which is causing complete collapse of the left lung, and invading the proximal left pulmonary artery ( arrows ). The distal atelectatic lung (lu; left upper lobe, ll; left lower lobe) enhances, and there is a left pleural effusion.
Relatively central primary neoplasms, especially adenocarcinomas, frequently extend proximally in the submucosa of the bronchus for a considerable length. Peribronchial soft tissue thickening may be depicted on CT (Fig. 7-40), sometimes with extension into the mediastinal fat. Such a finding should prompt a deep biopsy at bronchoscopy for corroboration.
CT demonstration of extension of tumor into the hilar region withinvolvement of the origin of the main left or right bronchus, or proximal left or right pulmonary artery, or both the superior and inferior pulmonary veins, would strongly suggest that a pneumonectomy is required for successful resection. With proximal main bronchial involvement only, lobectomy with sleeve resection and bronchoplasty may be feasible. Even if there is invasion of the carina, a pneumonectomy and sleeve resection may be possible in selected cases, although the morbidity and mortality are relatively high. Similarly, tumor extending across a fissure would suggest the need for a pneumonectomy or, perhaps, an extended lobectomy (Fig.
7-41). In patients with marginal pulmonary function or perhaps severe cardiac disease, considered candidates only for a lobectomy, the CT findings affect operability rather than resectability (106).
Figure 7-38  Resectable bronchogenic carcinoma. CT shows a large right lower lobe carcinoma abutting the mediastinum, adjacent to the left atrium, air-filled esophagus, and azygos vein, without definite invasion. At surgery, the lesion did not invade the mediastinum, and mildly enlarged right hilar lymph nodes were reactive.
A primary central bronchogenic carcinoma, causing distal obstruction/pneumonitis, often can be separated from the latter on contrast-enhanced CT, and if needed, MR images. Lung consolidation/atelectasis appears higher in attenuation value or in signal intensity than the proximal neoplastic mass (see Figs. 7-33 and 7-37). Such definition of the limits of the primary tumor can be important in patients undergoing radiation therapy (117). The ability of CT to depict the extrabronchial extent of carcinomas involving the distal trachea or proximal bronchi, and its relation
P.447 to adjacent major vascular structures can be valuable if laser photoresection therapy is planned. The presence of substantial peribronchial tumor extrinsic to a bronchial obstruction, which cannot be evaluated by fiberoptic bronchoscopy, is a predictor of poor response to laser photoresection therapy (455,667).Figure 7-39  Bronchogenic carcinoma. A: CT shows a large partially necrotic right upper lobe mass (m), occluding the right upper lobe pulmonary artery ( white arrow ) and extending into the right superior pulmonary vein ( black arrow).B: A more caudal CT image shows tumor extending into the left atrium (LA). A right empyema is secondary to a concomitant right lower lobe pneumonia.Figure 7-40  An extensive right upper lobe adenocarcinoma narrows the lobar bronchus ( arrow) and extends proximally in the submucosa, producing thickening of the posterior wall of the right main stem bronchus ( arrowheads ). The mediastinum and the superior vena cava also are invaded, and a small right pleural effusion is present.
Peripheral bronchogenic carcinoma may directly invade the adjacent pleura, or even pericardium, sometimes by extending along the perivascular-lymphatic sheaths. CT may demonstrate a small pleural or pericardial effusion not evident on conventional radiographs.
Aspiration of this fluid, under ultrasound guidance if necessary, may be warranted to determine if malignant cells are present, which
P.448P.449 could effect management in some patients. PET imaging also may be helpful in suggesting that a pleural effusion is benign or malignant
(121,535). Involvement of the parietal pleura and chest wall may be present in the absence of a pleural effusion. The value of CT in the determination of chest wall invasion is somewhat limited (555).
Asymmetry of the chest wall tissues may be due to patient positioning or a normal variation and can misleadingly simulate chest wall invasion (167,457). Similar to comments made regarding mediastinal invasion, mere contiguity of a peripheral lung carcinoma with the pleura on CT is not indicative of invasion. The presence of rib or vertebral body destruction or a soft tissue mass external to the ribs infiltrating the fat and muscles are absolute signs of chest wall invasion (Figs. 7-42, 7-43, 7-44), but are detected only with advanced tumors (487). CT findings such as more than 3 cm of contact between the lung mass and the pleura, the presence of adjacent pleural thickening, and an obtuse angle between the pulmonary neoplasm and the pleural surface may suggest parietal pleural invasion but are neither very sensitive nor specific. Pleural thickening may be due to benign causes, even in a patient with a peripheral bronchogenic carcinoma, such as concomitant inflammation, old scarring, or plaque formation. Loss of the normally present extrapleural fat layer also is suggestive of invasion (see
Figs. 7-42 and 7-44); this finding may be more easily recognized on
MRI but is not specific for parietal pleura invasion (205). An abnormal soft tissue mass in the chest wall may be seen on longitudinal relaxation time (T1)-weighted images, sometimes accompanied by abnormal high signal following gadolinium enhancement or on transverse relaxation time (T2)-weighted images
(442). Both diagnostic pneumothorax to determine if the neoplasm loses contiguity with the chest wall and dynamic CT during respiration to ascertain whether the tumor moves with respect to the parietal pleura have been advocated to assess for chest wall invasion (627,660). However, benign adhesions may produce false-positive results and the additional imaging required is rarely, if ever, warranted. The most specific indicator of parietal pleural invasion is the clinical presence of focal chest wall pain. Even in patients who are stage IIIa (T3) by virtue of tumor penetrating through the parietal pleura, such chest wall invasion is not necessarily a contraindication to surgery; prognosis is reasonable if the invasion is limited and no mediastinal lymph node metastases are present (543). The involved chest wall may be resected en bloc along with the adjacent primary neoplasm; however, such a procedure is associated with increased operative morbidity and mortality.
Figure 7-41  Bronchogenic carcinoma (CA) originating in the superior segment of the right lower lobe, extends across the major fissure ( arrow) into the right upper lobe (l).Figure 7-42  Bronchogenic carcinoma, chest wall invasion. A, B:
Cephalocaudal CT images demonstrate a cavitary squamous cell carcinoma of the right lower lobe destroying a posterior rib ( arrow), obliterating the extrapleural fat and invading the chest wall external to the rib ( arrowheads ).
Patient, who presented with dysphagia, also has esophagitis.Figure 7-43  Large carcinoma of right upper lobe destroying a rib (arrow) and focally invading the chest wall ( arrowheads ).Figure 7-44  Carcinoma of left lower lobe invading and destroying the adjacent vertebral body. Neoplasm also extends into the adjacent extrapleural fat ( arrowheads ).
In some patients with superior sulcus (extreme apex of lung) bronchogenic carcinomas, curative resection may be attempted.
Almost all of these neoplasms are non–small cell, and they typically arise dorsal to the groove for the subclavian artery. Tumors that do not extend through the apical fat may be operated on primarily. Neoplasms that demonstrate invasion above the lung apex
(Pancoast tumors) usually are treated initially by radiation therapy
(sometimes in conjunction with chemotherapy), followed by surgical resection if the tumor responds (433,599,632). Formerly it was generally accepted that the extent of these neoplasms and the proximity of tumor to the subclavian vessels and brachial plexus is depicted more accurately with coronal and sagittal MRI compared with CT (Fig. 7-45) (226). However, recent experience withmultiplanar reconstructions of thin-section MDCT images suggest equivalence in displaying disruption of the apical fat layer and extension of the tumor into the lower neck. Involvement of the adjacent ribs and vertebral bodies usually is better seen with CT
(Fig. 7-46) (599). Invasion of the subclavian artery, a vertebral body, or upper brachial plexus involvement, or mediastinal lymph node metastases presages an exceedingly poor prognosis, and usually contraindicates surgery.
Simultaneous lung carcinomas may be depicted on CT (Fig. 7-47), one of which was not suspected on plain chest radiography (275), in up to 2% of patients being evaluated
P.450
P.451 for possible lung cancer. A physically distinct and separate lung neoplasm with a different cell type is considered a synchronous primary lesion and should be staged independently. Separate masses with the same histology may be considered synchronous if there is no evidence of carcinoma in the lymphatics and lymph nodes common to both. Although these lesions are categorized as T4, successful resections of both, sometimes through a median sternotomy if in different lungs, has been accomplished in selected cases.Figure 7-45 A, B:  Coronal and sagittal magnetic resonance images show destruction of a posterior rib ( arrows ) with tumor invading the chest wall ( arrowheads ), contacting the brachial plexus and right subclavian artery anteriorly.
Figure 7-46  Superior sulcus carcinomas. A: CT shows a large mass (M) filling the left lung apex, invading and destroying the left second posterior rib ( arrow).B:In another patient, CT shows a left superior sulcus carcinoma invading an adjacent vertebral body.
Figure 7-47  Synchronous carcinomas. A: CT demonstrates a 5-cm lobulated mass in the middle lobe. B: More cephalad, a 1.6-cm spiculated mass also is seen in the left upper lobe.C: Fused 18-fluorine–positron emission tomography/CT image demonstrates avid uptake in both lesions. Both were resected via median sternotomy and demonstrated large cell carcinoma with neuroendocrine features and a moderately differentiatedsquamous cell carcinoma respectively.
Figure 7-48  Hilar lymph node metastasis from a right lower lobe carcinoma. CT demonstrates a nodal mass in the right hilum ( arrowheads ), and the primary carcinoma ( arrow).
PET imaging generally has limited value in assessing the T features of a bronchogenic carcinoma. Bronchial wall and vascular invasion usually are difficult to assess. However, high standard uptake values
(SUVs) do correlate with the aggressiveness of the neoplasmhistologically and provide some prognostic information.
Mediastinal Lymph Node Status (the N Factor) . CT can provide important information about the nodal status in patients with bronchogenic carcinoma. Identification and localization of enlarged mediastinal lymph nodes can serve as a useful guide for selection of the optimal semi-invasive tissue sampling staging procedure (e.g., mediastinoscopy, mediastinotomy, transbrachial or transthoracic needle biopsy) to obtain tissue and corroborate lymph node metastases, before attempting curative resection of a bronchogenic carcinoma (see Table 5-2) (103,297).
Contrast-enhanced CT is a sensitive depicter of hilar lymph node enlargement (Fig. 7-48), being able to detect lymph nodes 6 mm or larger in diameter (163,554). Nevertheless, hilar lymph node assessment has little relevance in most patients with bronchogenic carcinoma. It is the presence of direct mediastinal extension of the primary neoplasm or mediastinal lymph node metastases (see Fig.
7-30; Fig. 7-49) that contraindicates surgery. Although
P.452
P.453 the presence of ipsilateral hilar lymph node involvement (N1) alters the stage and notably diminishes the prognosis of the patient, it neither makes the patient unresectable (and would not affect operability if the nodes can be dissected free of the mediastinum without necessitating a pneumonectomy) nor accurately predicts the presence of mediastinal lymph node involvement. Metastatic carcinoma may occur in mediastinal lymph nodes in 25% of patients with negative hilar nodes. Therefore, in the overall staging of bronchogenic carcinoma, hilar evaluation is of minor importance and rigorous efforts at hilar staging are usually not warranted, unless the patient is clearly not a candidate for a pneumonectomy
(pulmonary function status would permit only a lobectomy), which may be required if the nodal metastases are found to encase a main pulmonary artery at surgery.Figure 7-49  Hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastases. A:
CT demonstrates a cavitary mass in the left lower lobe, and associated left hilar lymph node enlargement
(arrow).B: More cephalad image shows a concomitant necrotic subcarinal nodal mass ( arrow). Transbronchoscopic needle aspiration of the latter mass disclosed poorly differentiated squamous cell carcinoma.Figure 7-50  Bulky lymphadenopathy. A: CT at level of the aortic arch ( A demonstrates markedly enlarged right paratracheal lymph nodes ( arrows ).B: More caudal, the primary squamous cell carcinoma narrowing the bronchus intermedius ( arrowhead ) is seen. Peripheral enhancement of notably enlarged subcarinal lymph nodes ( n due to cetntral necrosis, is present.Figure 7-51  Aortopulmonary window lymph node metastases. A,
B: Sequential cephalocaudal CT images demonstrate lymphadenopathy ( arrows ) in the aortopulmonary window, along the course of the left recurrent laryngeal nerve, in a patient with a left upper lobe carcinoma who presented clinically with hoarseness.
The presence of ipsilateral mediastinal lymph node metastases (N2) secondary to bronchogenic carcinoma generally presages a very poor prognosis and usually indicates incurable disease, and traditionally has been considered a contraindication to thoracotomy, regardless of cell type or location. Selected patients, however, have improved survival after resection of limited mediastinal nodal disease (stage
IIIa), followed in most cases (or preceded) by adjuvant radiation therapy or chemotherapy. Well-differentiated squamous cell carcinoma with only intranodal growth within a node in the ipsilateral tracheobronchial area would be a noncontroversial example. However, extension of tumor through the capsule, usually accompanied by bulk enlargement of the lymph node (Fig. 7-50),generally indicates that neoplastic disease almost certainly has spread to other nodes or entered the systemic circulation. Deep cervical/supraclavicular lymph node metastases may occur in up to
10% of patients at presentation, with only about 25% of those involved nodes being palpable clinically (most frequent with squamous cell carcinoma). Attention should be directed to this nodal group on the cephalad CT images of the thorax (144,616).
The location of the primary carcinoma determines the usual lymphatic pathways of tumor spread to the regional lymph nodes
(463). Cancers originating in the right lung tend to metastasize initially to the ipsilateral tracheobronchial (hilar) nodes [10R] (see
Fig. 5-56) and subsequently to the right paratracheal nodes [4R,2R].
Such neoplasms rarely metastasize to contralateral lymph nodes
(N3), unless the histology is small cell undifferentiated carcinoma, whereas cancers of the left lung commonly spread to the right paratracheal nodes subsequent to ipsilateral involvement (see Figs.
7-25 and 7-26). Carcinomas of the LUL usually metastasize initially to nodes in the aortopulmonary window [5,4L] (see Fig. 7-27; Fig.
7-51) and both left upper and lower lobe lesions may spread first to the left tracheobronchial region [10L]. Involvement of the prevascular lymph nodes [6] almost always is preceded by nodal disease in the paratracheal area. Cancers of the middle lobe and both lower lobes often affect the subcarinal nodes [7] early in their dissemination (see Figs. 7-30 and 7-49), and lower lobe lesions also may extend to the paraesophageal [8], pulmonary ligament [9], and supradiaphragmatic nodes [14]. Knowledge of the expected drainage pattern can be valuable in selected cases. It would be extremely unlikely for a right lung carcinoma to spread only to aortopulmonary lymph nodes, and isolated enlargement of nodes in this region noted on CT in such a patient generally can be presumed due to another cause, such as old granulomatous disease.
The reported sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of CT in detecting mediastinal nodal metastases have been extremely variable, even when using apparently the same criteria and similar equipment andtechnique (73,128,164,224,376,454,486,544,575,635). False- positive rates have varied from 20% to 45%, and false–negative rates from 7% to 39%. An overall sensitivity and accuracy of about
65% seems reasonable. Both are higher with squamous cell carcinoma than adenocarcinoma. Pragmatically, the larger the lymph node appears on CT, the greater the chance that it will be involved with metastasis. Our diagnostic criteria on CT scans, largely chosen to maximize sensitivity, is that any mediastinal lymph node less than 1 cm in long axis diameter is considered unlikely to harbor metastatic disease. Those nodes 1 to 2 cm in diameter are considered highly suspicious; such enlargement can be caused by either neoplasm or granulomatous disease. While mediastinal lymph nodes more than 2 cm in diameter in a patient with a known primary bronchogenic carcinoma almost always are due to neoplastic involvement, histologic corroboration is still strongly suggested.
With the better definition now available with MDCT enhanced scans, central necrosis or hyperemia in even a normal size lymph node makes it highly suspicious for metastatic disease.
Size criteria alone will never be totally reliable in staging the mediastinal lymph nodes (340). The demonstration of enlarged mediastinal lymph nodes in the patient with bronchogenic carcinoma does not automatically imply metastatic disease (Fig. 7-52). As already stated,
P.454 approximately 20% will be false–positives related to pre- or coexisting infectious/inflammatory disease. Other morphologic features of lymph nodes, such as shape, attenuation value, or margination, have not proved of practical value in this differentiation, with the exception of central fat, which invariably indicates benign adenopathy. Because of this nonspecificity, enlarged lymph nodes should be biopsied for confirmation of disseminated disease; a patient should not be denied a potentially curative resection based solely on radiologic size criteria of a mediastinal lymph node.Figure 7-52  Reactive lymph nodes. CT demonstrates mildly enlarged pretracheal lymph nodes
(arrowheads ) in a patient with a right lower lobe squamous cell carcinoma. Both mediastinoscopic biopsy and nodal sampling at thoracotomy disclosed only reactive inflammatory changes in these nodes.
Lymph nodes containing metastases typically missed by CT are those that are still normal in size. Such microscopic metastases occur in about 15% of patients with clinical stage I bronchogenic carcinoma.
These same patients sometimes have negative results also at mediastinoscopy, and their N2 status is discovered only at thoracotomy with nodal sampling. Their prognosis and survival rate, with adjuvant postoperative radiation and/or chemotherapy, is substantially better than patients with N2 disease established at mediastinoscopy (553).Surgical nodal sampling procedures developed before the advent of
CT for staging purposes, including transcervical mediastinoscopy and parasternal mediastinotomy, notably reduced the percentage of unnecessary thoracotomies from 40% to 10% or less. Yet, these procedures have some definite limitations and are only 85% accurate in mediastinal nodal evaluation. The mediastinoscope does not evaluate all of the mediastinal compartments. Only lymph nodes in the middle mediastinum, precarinal and anterior and lateral to the trachea and posterior to the major vessels (brachiocephalic arteries and veins, superior vena cava, and ascending aorta), are accessible to biopsy. Approximately 8% of patients with bronchogenic carcinoma and negative mediastinoscopy have mediastinal lymph node metastases at surgery. Such involved lymph nodes are usually in the anterior mediastinum (prevascular space), aortopulmonary window, and posterior subcarinal region, but sometimes metastases are detected in lymph nodes that were accessible to mediastinoscopy. Mediastinoscopy can be used for paratracheal and anterior subcarinal lymphadenopathy (see Figs. 7-26, Fig. 7-50, and
Fig. 7-51). Aortopulmonary window adenopathy is best approached via a left parasternal mediastinotomy (see Fig. 7-27).
Transbronchoscopic needle biopsy can be used for posterior subcarinal (see Figs. 7-30 and 7-49) and sometimes paratracheal lymphadenopathy. In some selected circumstances, CT-guided percutaneous needle biopsy may be useful to sample enlarged mediastinal lymph nodes. The accuracy of these tissue-sampling techniques can be increased when directed by CT to areas of morphologic abnormality, including clinically unsuspected metastases in the adrenal and liver. Although the bronchoscopic recognition of widening and fixation of the carina may strongly suggest mediastinal involvement with tumor, the CT demonstration of enlarged lymph nodes in the subcarinal area helps in the earlier appropriate selection of patients for transbronchial needle aspiration. Evidence of associated abnormalities, such as superior vena cava obstruction or destruction of a vertebral body, combinedwith extensive lymphadenopathy, may preclude the need for additional staging procedures if the histology of the primary lesion has been established.
Whether CT is sufficiently sensitive to screen out patients who would not benefit from routine transcervical mediastinoscopy or left anterior parasternal mediastinotomy remains controversial (456).
Some surgeons advocate mediastinoscopy in all patients considered to be candidates for resection. Others contend that in a patient with a negative CT examination of the mediastinum and upper abdomen, one can proceed directly to thoracotomy, especially if the primary tumor is a squamous cell carcinoma or is small and peripheral.
Although there will always be a percentage (sometimes as high as
39%) of false–negative CT scans due to microscopic metastases within normal size lymph nodes (195), this may have little clinical significance. As was already emphasized, a relatively favorable prognosis still may be achieved in patients with limited intranodal disease, detected by routine intraoperative biopsy of normal- appearing mediastinal lymph nodes, when supplemental postoperative mediastinal irradiation or chemotherapy is administered; thus resection would still have been appropriate.
PET is superior to CT (and MRI) in staging the mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with bronchogenic carcinoma (580). In combination with CT, it provides complimentary noninvasive functional information to simple size criteria, improving the overall accuracy of clinical staging.
PET provides physiologic data rather than morphologic information.
The most commonly used agent for PET tumor imaging is deoxyglucose linked to 18-fluorine, or FDG. This agent competes with glucose for transport into cells and for phosphorylation by hexokinase, both of which are increased in tumors compared with nonneoplastic cells. However, increased glucose metabolism is not specific for malignant neoplasm, and can occur with infectious (Fig.
7-53) and inflammatory processes, as well as in some normalanatomic structures, such as brown fat and muscles including the heart (24). Also, some carcinoid tumors (see Fig. 7-15) and well- differentiated adenocarcinomas and bronchoalveolar cell carcinomas
(Fig. 7-54) may not demonstrate significant tracer uptake (279).
Increased FDG uptake in a normal size lymph node is highly suggestive of metastatic disease. The absence of increased uptake in an enlarged node is strongly indicative of the absence of metastases. Overall sensitivity is about 83% and specificity about
90%, approaching the results with mediastinoscopy (276). The information from the PET examination in conjunction with the CT findings can be used to more accurately guide those semi-invasive mediastinal node-sampling techniques (e.g., mediastinoscopy, mediastinotomy, transbronchial needle biopsy) already
P.455 described. Nevertheless, FDG PET is not infallible for the confirmation or exclusion of N2 or N3 disease in non–small cell lung cancer. As with CT, false–negative examinations occur with microscopic foci of tumor. Also, false–positives can result from inflammatory and infectious nodal disease.Figure 7-53  Active tuberculosis. A CT demonstrates a 15-mm spiculated cavitary lesion ( arrow) in anterior segment of the left upper lobe, in an elderly women with emphysema. B: Fusion 18-fluorine–positron emission tomography/CT image demonstrates marked increased uptake in the lesion, interpreted as compatible with a primary carcinoma. Patient declined immediate further evaluation of presumed carcinoma for familial reasons. C:
CT 3 months later at time of scheduled needle biopsy demonstrates marked interval growth of the lesion, with new peripheral lung consolidation. Aspirationspecimens disclosed M. tuberculosis .
FDG PET studies interpreted without correlative anatomic imaging studies (CT or MRI) are less accurate. Separating hilar from mediastinal nodal disease may be difficult, and with central bronchogenic carcinomas separating uptake in the tumor from nodes may be impossible. Combined interpretation of dual modality fused
PET/CT images optimizes the strengths of each; the sensitivity and specificity of either technique alone is improved. CT can help resolve some false-positive PET findings. CT and PET should be viewed as complementary; sometimes one is better, sometimes the other.
Evaluation of Distant Metastases (the M Factor) . Some patients thought to be resectable for cure have occult metastatic disease present outside the thorax (M1) (532). Such extrathoracic metastases may arise from spread via the lymphatic system or through the pulmonary veins directly into the systemic circulation.
Autopsies performed within 30 days of attempted curative resections, before the introduction of CT, have shown that the frequency of such
P.456 occult metastases in non–small cell bronchogenic carcinoma at the time of presentation may be as high as 30% in patients with adenocarcinoma or large cell carcinoma, but generally less than 15% with squamous cell carcinoma. Also, with squamous cell carcinoma, it is rare to have extrathoracic metastases in the absence of mediastinal nodal metastases (557).Figure 7-54  Mixed well differentiated adenocarcinoma/bronchoalveolar cell carcinomas. A: CT demonstrates a complex mass in posterior segment of the right upper lobe, with peripheral solid soft tissue elements ( straight arrow ), and more central cystic regions
(pseudocavitation) ( curved arrow ).B: 18-Fluorine–positron emission tomography showed an standard uptake value of 1.9, interpreted as most likely a chronic inflammatory process. C: In another patient, CT again demonstrates a complex left upper lobe mass, with anterior solid lobulated soft tissue elements ( arrow), and a larger posterior cystic region
(pseudocavitation) ( arrowheads ). 18-Fluorine-positron emissiontomography showed mild increased uptake with an standard uptake value of 1.9; inflammation was favored. D: CT–guided needle aspiration of the soft tissue component disclosed well differentiated adenocarcinoma.
The most common sites of occult extrathoracic metastases in order are the brain, bone, liver and adrenals. CT staging for bronchogenic carcinoma should extend into the abdomen to assess the liver and adrenals (Figs. 7-55 and 7-56). Such concomitant assessment now can be accomplished easily with MDCT helical technique. The liver is almost never the only demonstrable site of metastases, unless the primary lung neoplasm is an adenocarcinoma. Abnormal liver function tests are neither a sensitive nor specific indicator of liver metastases. Suspicious lesions can be biopsied, often with ultrasound guidance, if the results will impact therapeutic decisions.
CT is very sensitive in detecting adrenal masses. Although most patients with metastatic enlargement of the adrenals have CT evidence of mediastinal lymph node enlargement,
P.457
P.458 occasionally the adrenal is the only site of metastases to contraindicate surgery. The vast majority of patients with adrenal metastases do not have clinical signs of adrenal insufficiency. An adrenal mass is not synonymous with metastasis; incidental benign nonhyperfunctioning adenomas occur with a similar frequency as that of metastasis in patients with bronchogenic carcinoma (437). A small (less than 3-cm), well-circumscribed adrenal mass with a homogeneous relatively low attenuation value (less than 20 HU), because of its lipid content, and no peripheral enhancement, almost certainly represents an adenoma. Most lesions exceeding 3 cm in diameter, especially those that are inhomogeneous and have a thick enhancing wall, represent metastases. If an indeterminate adrenal mass is seen on postcontrast CT images, there may be merit inacquiring thin-collimation noncontrast scans of the adrenal about 1 hour later; substantive attenuation values above 30 HU suggest metastasis, whereas dominant values below 20 HU an incidental nonhyperfunctioning adenoma. If the mass is still equivocal, MRI is advocated (490). Relatively low signal intensity on both T1- and T2- weighted images with no enhancement post–gadolinium administration and signal dropout on opposed phase chemical shift imaging is characteristic of a benign adenoma (51). Percutaneous needle biopsy under CT or ultrasound-directed guidance may be required to document, or
P.459 help exclude, adrenal dissemination if the patient is otherwise deemed operable (Fig. 7-57).Figure 7-55  Bronchogenic carcinoma with metastases. A:
CT demonstrates a 4-cm irregular right apical mass (m). B: More caudal image demonstrates right hilar(arrow) and subcarinal ( arrowhead ) lymphadenopathy. C A heterogenous right adrenal mass ( arrow) is seen. D: An enhancing enlarged left paraortic lymph ( arrow) also present. E:
Fusion 18-fluorine–positron emission tomography/CT image shows markedly increased uptake in the primary apical tumor ( straight arrow ) as well as in the right adrenal metastasis ( curved arrow ).
Figure 7-56  Small cell undifferentiated carcinoma with liver metastases. A CT shows the small primary tumor ( arrow) in the left upper lobe, with extensive mediastinal lymph node metastases ( n).B: More caudal image of upper abdomen demonstrates multiple peripherally enhancing liver metastases ( arrowheads ) plus a left adrenal metastasis ( arrow).Figure 7-57  Adrenal metastasis from bronchogenic carcinoma.
A: CT demonstrates a small mass in the right adrenal ( arrowhead ) in patient with a right upper lobe carcinoma. Mild mediastinal lymph node enlargement and a small right pleural effusion also were present, but mediastinoscopy and thoracentesis were negative. B: CT-guided percutaneous biopsy of right adrenal mass
(done in prone position) was positive for metastatic carcinoma.
Detection of unsuspected extrathoracic spread of bronchogenic carcinoma by FDG PET also can dramatically alter patient management. The likelihood of detecting such metastases increases in patients with locally advanced disease, which may already have been documented on CT. FDG PET is valuable in detecting bone metastases; it is less valuable in depicting cerebral metastases than
MRI (or CT). As with lymph node disease, a positive PET study cannot be accepted as definitive proof of metastases as false- positives occur. Nevertheless, there is no doubt that FDG PET can reduce the likelihood of noncurative or futile surgery in lung cancer patients, and it is increasingly being used in virtually all patients considered candidates for surgical resection.Ancillary Comments.  While still in the investigative phase, some patients with proven mediastinal lymph node metastases
(mediastinoscopy, mediastinotomy, transbronchial needle aspiration) may undergo induction chemotherapy, radiation therapy, or both. If there is documented regression of disease (e.g., by CT, PET, or mediastinoscopy), subsequent complete surgical resection of the tumor may be attempted (107). Preliminary results with this combination therapy show improvement in the disease-free period and some increased survival. Those patients with persistent N2 disease after this neoadjuvant therapy are not candidates for surgery.
The evaluation of a patient with known or suspected bronchogenic carcinoma requires the detection and characterization of lesions involving the lungs, hila, mediastinum, pleura, chest wall, and upper abdomen. CT is the most advantageous radiologic technique for evaluating these regions simultaneously. Studies have failed to demonstrate any consistent superiority of MRI over CT in the assessment of the primary tumor, detection of direct mediastinal extension, or the recognition of lymph node metastasis
(335,410,631). In most instances, MRI simply recapitulates the findings of CT. Whereas MRI has some theoretical and real advantages (e.g., direct multiplanar imaging capability, avoidance of iodinated IV contrast agents), these are outweighed by considerations such as availability, cost, and examination time. CT remains the initial tomographic examination of choice, with MRI assuming a secondary problem-solving role in patients in whom CT is inconclusive or a more primary role when iodinated contrast media is contraindicated (Fig. 7-58). On occasion MRI may be helpful in determining the nature of an adrenal mass. Although MRI may be superior to CT in detecting chest wall invasion by bronchogenic carcinoma, this is generally not a critical staging issue, except perhaps in some selected superior sulcus tumors (see
Fig. 7-45).
CT may provide unique information in specific clinical situationsrelated to bronchogenic carcinoma. An occult primary tumor may be detected, sometimes in a patient with a positive sputum cytologic examination or with a paraneoplastic syndrome, and no lesion apparent on chest radiography or fiberoptic bronchoscopy. These carcinomas are frequently situated in areas poorly assessed by standard radiography, such as the lung apices, or the paramediastinal and juxtadiaphragmatic regions. Analogous to conventional radiography, lung carcinomas may be missed on a chest CT examination (200,643,644).
Figure 7-58  Magnetic resonance image in patient with elevated creatinine demonstrates a large right upper lobe carcinoma (CA) invading the mediastinum and the right pulmonary artery (P).
Bronchioloalveolar cell carcinoma represents a subgroup of adenocarcinoma, with overlapping features often present in the same nodule/mass (17,280,308,326,601,657,666) The link with smoking as a predisposing cause is weakest with this type of carcinoma, which also may be associated with chronic interstitialpulmonary fibrosis. These tumors arise from the type II pneumocytes lining the alveolar walls and grow by spreading along the framework of the normal parenchyma, without associated destruction. They may present as a solitary nodule, focal consolidation or diffuse disease. The consolidative form may be segmental or lobar, mimicking pneumonia. If a large amount of mucin is present, the consolidation will appear of relatively low attenuation on CT, and on postcontrast scans, the vessels standout within the consolidation (CT angiogram sign). CT may be valuable in separating the solitary form of bronchioloalveolar cell carcinoma from the diffuse variety, therefore changing the categorization and therapeutic approach (Figs. 7-59 and 7-60).
As noted, when planning radiation therapy, contrast-enhanced MDCT can be helpful in distinguishing a central endobronchial mass from more distal collapsed or consolidated lung (see Figs. 7-33 and 7-37).
Similarly PET/CT may have a valuable role in tailoring radiation portals and FDG PET may be more beneficial than CT in
P.460 quickly determining treatment response. Substantial residual FDG activity is a relatively poor prognostic sign after treatment.Figure 7-59  Solitary bronchoalveolar cell carcinomas. A:
CT demonstrates an ill-defined, mainly ground-glass opacity ( arrows ) in the right upper lobe. B: In another patient, CT demonstrates a small area of consolidation containing lucent cystic areas
(pseudocavitation) in the superior segment of the right lower lobe (arrows ).C: In another patient, CT shows a heterogeneous region of ground-glass opacification, some soft tissue attenuation zones of consolidation, and cystic regions (pseudocavitation). The surgical resection specimen showed some regions of well differentiated adenocarcinomawithin the predominately bronchoalveolar cell carcinoma.
CT may influence treatment and be of some prognostic value in patients with undifferentiated small (oat) cell carcinoma (193,385).
Determination of disease extent may help in the decision about whether to use adjuvant radiation therapy and to tailor portals.
Initial pericardial or abdominal (liver, adrenals, lymph nodes) involvement is an especially poor prognostic indicator (see Fig. 7-
56).
CT is more sensitive than plain chest radiography in detecting recurrent bronchogenic carcinoma, particularly in mediastinal lymph nodes or in the postpneumonectomy space (165,460), and may explain some postoperative problems (551). With large tumors at presentation, there is a greater risk of local recurrence (248).
Wedge resections may also leave residual tumor in lymphatics or lymph nodes, increasing the incidence of local recurrence. And among patients that survive lung cancer, there is a 2.5% annual risk of developing a second primary lung carcinoma (325), perhaps warranting some routine follow-up scanning.
Lung Cancer Screening
The purpose of any screening test is to prevent, by means of earlier detection, the development of symptomatic advanced disease and its adverse effects (432). As already noted, bronchogenic carcinoma is the leading cause of cancer death in both men and women in the
United States, where
P.461 approximately 25% of the population are smokers or former smokers. The poor overall survival from bronchogenic carcinoma
(15%) relates to many patients having advanced regional disease or distant spread at the time of presentation. It would be desirable to identify more individuals with early stage lung cancer in an attemptto decrease morbidity/mortality from this disease.
Figure 7-60  Multicentric bronchoalveolar cell carcinomas. A, B:
Selected cephalocaudal CT images demonstrate bilateral ill-defined nodules ( arrows ), some with central lucencies (pseudocavitation). C: CT guided percutaneous needle biopsy establishes the diagnosis. D:
In another patient, CT shows relatively large areas of consolidation with air bronchograms (pneumonic form of disease) in both lower lobes.
Previous screening trials with plain chest radiography and/or sputumcytology failed to show a mortality benefit. Subsequent public health endeavors have emphasized the prevention of smoking since at least
90% of lung cancers are smoking-related. Early enthusiasm with using CT screening was engendered by the notable number of stage
I cancers (about 5% to 6%) detected in patients with emphysema who were being considered for lung transplantation or lung volume reduction surgery (527). Multiple studies have documented that spiral CT is clearly superior to chest radiography in the detection of small lung carcinomas. Several initial screening studies were encouraging, oftentimes doubling the number of lung cancers detected in stage I (116,230,260,337,429,657,658).
False–positive nodules, however, were noted to be very common on the baseline (prevalence) studies, at least 50% in some geographic areas, but less frequent on follow-up (incidence) examinations. Determining whether such nodules are malignant generally requires a minimum of one more CT examination
P.462
P.463 to ascertain for possible growth. And in some screening studies, almost 80% of screened individuals have further testing recommended for observed abnormalities, including potentially serious ancillary findings (such as a mediastinal mass or liver or renal lesion).Figure 7-61  National Lung Screening Trial detected rapidly growing lung carcinoma. A: Initial low dose CT demonstrates a well-circumscribed 7-mm diameter nodule ( arrow) in the left upper lobe. B: Follow-up low dose CT 6 months later shows a dramatic increase in size to 2.9 cm in diameter. Resected specimen disclosed poorly differentiated adenocarcinoma.Figure 7-62  National Lung Screening Trial detected lung carcinomas. A: Low-dose CT demonstrates a spiculated 11-mm nodule ( arrow) in the left upper lobe
(adenocarcinoma). B: In another patient, low dose CT shows a mainly ground-glass 19-mm nodular opacity, with multiple bubble lucencies, especially in the center
(pseudocavitation) in the right upper lobe (bronchoalveolar cell carcinoma).
All screening CT lung cancer examinations use decreased milliamps and often peak kilovoltage to diminish the radiation dose to the patient (63). Nodules not containing benign calcifications identified on CT screening should be classified depending on their size, shape, and margins. For small nodules (4 to 10 mm), a follow-up CT examination is almost always recommended. Based on a 3-year experience with the National Lung Screening Trial (NLST) (234), this author generally recommends 12 months for lesions 4 to 6 mm in greatest diameter (less than 4 mm nodules are considered negative). With nodules 7 to 9 mm in greatest diameter, a 6-month follow-up is usually recommended (Fig. 7-61). The characteristics
(margins) of the nodule factor into this recommendation recognizingthat surrounding emphysema may make some diagnostic criteria unreliable (362). Solid nodules with spiculated margins larger than 8 mm in diameter are considered highly suspicious, as are ground glass nodular opacities larger than 10 in diameter (Fig. 7-62), although the vast majority of the latter are not bronchoalveolar carcinomas (Fig. 7-63). Also, a shorter follow-up interval generally is recommended for nodules discovered during the incidence studies
(provided they are truly new and not simply previously overlooked).
With larger lesions (10 mm or greater), PET imaging, percutaneous biopsy or even resection may be suggested, along with the option of a 3-month follow-up CT examination (perhaps after broad spectrum antibiotic treatment). It is rarely possible on a single screening examination alone to dogmatically state that a lung cancer is present. But for lesions that definitely grow, removal/biopsy needs to be considered.
Measuring the growth of nodules is not simple, especially when only
2D CT images are used (515). For a nodule to double in volume,
[4/3 II (d/2)3], d must increase by 25%, which is difficult to discern with small nodules. Volumetric nodule reconstructions provide more reliable evidence of lesion growth (301), but even they can vary related to the phase of respiration, and they increase the time and cost of screening studies. Even stability of a nodular opacity for 2 years is not absolute criterion of a benign lesion as some ground- glass opacities or irregular scar-like lesions due to proven bronchoalveolar cell carcinoma may not convincingly display growth in this time period. However, these latter lesions are unlikely to have a negative clinical impact in almost all patients in whom the diagnosis is delayed.
As previously noted, lung cancers can be missed on CT examinations by careful, conscientious radiologists (259,336). Generally, they are smaller than 1 cm in diameter, and overlapped/obscured by surrounding structures, usually vessels, or by adjacent scarring.
Most nodules missed on initial prevalence scans are detected on subsequent incidence examinations, still usually at stage I.Automated computer programs generally can increase the
P.464 detection of such missed nodules, especially those more central in the pulmonary parenchyma, but at the “cost―  of identifying other false–positive nodules (528).
Figure 7-63  Inflammatory ground-glass opacity. A: National
Lung Screening Trial low dose CT demonstrates a focal area of ground-glass opacification ( arrows ) in the right lower lobe. B: Follow-up low dose CT 6 months later demonstrates complete interval resolution of the opacity.
No clear guidelines exist as to who should be screened for lung cancer or at what intervals. At our institution, we screen individuals only as part of the randomized NLST (substantial smokers age 55 to
74 years; an initial baseline followed up with a minimum of 2 subsequent yearly studies; a 6-month interval health review including an assessment of their quality of life is also conducted).
Although such yearly screening might be reasonable, some aggressive carcinomas have become manifest between such studies
(Figs. 7-64 and 7-65).The high false–positive rate has led to increased patient, and sometimes referring clinician, anxiety. Asymptomatic individuals become patients when informed they have a lung nodule. Additional costs, beyond screening, are generated, for follow-up CT examinations, alternative tests such as PET imaging, etc. Incidental findings, many of no clinical relevance, also sometimes require follow-up/referral, further increasing cost. Rarely, benign nodules are resected (Fig. 7-66), in some cases because they have grown
(Fig. 7-67).
Figure 7-64  Aggressive interval carcinoma. A: Initial low-dose
NLST CT is normal. B: Follow-up low-doseCT one year later demonstrates development of new irregular 2-cm nodular opacity in anterior basal segment of the left lower lobe. The left hilum has increased in size in the interval. C: Subsequent contrast-enhanced diagnostic CT demonstrates enlarged left hilar lymph nodes.
Pathologic diagnosis was poorly differentiated adenocarcinoma.
Patients need to be informed that a negative screening CT examination does not preclude the subsequent development of lung cancer, sometimes even between screening intervals, and as mentioned, some lung cancers will not be detected on CT, especially central ones, including those arising in the bronchial lumens. For the latter, sputum cytology or fluorescence bronchoscopy may be alternative screening techniques. Appropriate personnel need to be available to counsel and evaluate a patient with a positive screening test (339). At our medical center, a biweekly SPIN (solitary pulmonary indeterminate nodule) clinic is conducted, with a nurse coordinator, a thoracic surgeon, a pulmonologist, and a radiologist all present to offer recommendations.Figure 7-65 A:  Initial NLST low-dose CT demonstrates a 17-mm mixed soft tissue/ground-glass attenuation nodular opacity ( arrow) in the left lower lobe.
Surgical resection disclosed a stage I mixed well-differentiated adenocarcinoma/bronchoalveolar cell carcinoma, a theoretical cure.B, C: Cephalocaudal CT images from a diagnostic CT performed 20 months later (8 months after normal postoperative CT), because of weight loss, demonstrates a new nodule in the left upper lobe ( arrow), plus enlarged lymph node mass (n) in the aortopulmonary window. A mildly enlarged subcarinal lymphnode also is present. Subsequent percutaneous needle aspiration of the large node disclosed small cell undifferentiated carcinoma.
P.465
All current published lung cancer CT screening studies are non- randomized, lack a control group, and suffer from inherent screening biases (e.g., lead time, length time, overdiagnosis)
(54,450,571,594). Improved survival is merely postulated (based upon finding a preponderance of stage I lesions), not proven
(recognizing this is true for other widespread medical screening tests, including prostate specific antigen [PSA] for prostate carcinoma). It remains undetermined whether the detection of more early stage carcinomas represents a true stage shift or merely overdiagnosis. There certainly can be a negative impact upon the quality of life, and even mortality, from interventions that do not affect overall morbidity/mortality. Even if this test potentially can save lives, its cost is not known, and a decision about who should pay for the examination (e.g., private health plans, the government, the patient who smoked cigarettes) has not yet been addressed.
Currently, no professional health-care organization recommends CT screening for lung cancer.
Pulmonary Collapse
The patterns of pulmonary collapse seen on the standard chest radiograph have been well described. However, the appearance may be confusing, especially if scarring or adhesions exist between the lung and adjacent pleura. CT is often helpful in clarifying that the plain radiographic film findings are secondary to collapse
(166,412,417,418,480,653), and furthermore may suggest the cause and determine the extent of any obstructing mass (see Figs.
7-11, 7-12, 7-13; Fig. 7-68). The underlying mediastinum is not obscured by the collapsed lung on CT and can be easily evaluatedP.466 for coexistent lymphadenopathy or direct invasion by a bronchial neoplasm. IV contrast administration generally is helpful in delineating a proximal obstructing tumor and separating it from distal atelectatic lung as well as from adjacent mediastinal structures. Collapsed distal lung usually enhances to a greater degree than the proximal neoplasm. However, in some cases, separation may not be possible, despite optimal contrast enhancement technique. If the collapsed lung contains a large amount of water (e.g., drowned lung distal to tumor) it may not enhance more than the tumor (Fig. 7-69). In addition, if the blood supply to the collapsed lobe is obstructed
P.467 or if the tumor is vascular, there may not be sufficient differences in enhancement pattern to allow separation.
Figure 7-66  Granulomatous infection. A: NLST low-dose CT shows a spiculated 12 mm nodule in the left upper lobe. B: Fusion FDG-PET/CT image demonstrated an SUV in the nodule of 5.9, consistent with an aggressive neoplasm. The resection specimen disclosedmycobacterium xenopi .
Figure 7-67  Benign growing nodule. A: Initial NLST low-dose CT demonstrated a very well-circumscribed homogeneous 11-mm nodule ( arrow) in the right lower lobe, interpreted as likely benign. B: Follow-up low-dose CT 1 year later shows that the nodule has grown to 15 mm in diameter. The nodule was resected and pathologically was an amyloidoma.
General Observations
Both the direct (fissural displacement, decreased size of hemithorax, vascular/bronchial crowding) and indirect (mediastinal shift, hilar displacement, hypoaeration, compensatory hyperaeration, elevation of hemidiaphragm) signs of collapse seen on plain chest radiographs
(474) can be applied to CT (166). This becomes important so as not to confuse the CT findings with a lung mass. The lobes lose volumewhile generally maintaining contact with the chest
P.468 wall peripherally and the hilum centrally, resulting in a wedge shape on CT, which is not always apparent on conventional radiography. As compensation for the space formerly occupied by an expanded lobe, an ipsilateral adjacent lobe may overinflate, appearing more lucent and oligemic. Although most observations can be made on a standard CT examination (5-to 7-mm-thick sections), reconstruction of additional thin sections (1 mm) may be helpful in evaluating specific lobar or segmental bronchi for an obstructing mass.
Figure 7-68  Left upper lobe collapse. A: On a postcontrast CT, the collapsed lobe appears as a triangular, enhancing structure, sharply marginated laterally by the major fissure ( arrows ). The relatively low attenuation tubular structures ( arrowhead ) in the collapsed lobe represent dilated mucus filled bronchi. B: On a more caudal image, a small enhancing mass ( arrowheads ) is seen occluding the left upper lobe bronchus. Bronchoscopic biopsy disclosed a well differentiated neuroendocrine carcinoma (carcinoid tumor). C: In another patient, a relatively low attenuation central tumor mass
(arrowheads ) is seen obstructing the left upper lobe bronchus.
Bronchoscopy revealed squamous cell carcinoma. The mildly enlarged aortopulmonary window nodes ( arrow) were reactive on surgical resection. D: In another patient, a large central mass
(arrowheads ) occludes the left upper lobe bronchus, with greater enhancement of the more distal atelectatic upper lobe (l).
Marked concomitant subcarinal lymph node enlargement (n) is present. Specimens from bronchoscopy and transbronchial needle biopsy of the subcarinal mass disclosed poorly differentiated squamous cell carcinoma.
Left Upper Lobe Collapse
The left upper lobe (LUL) collapses predominantly in an anterosuperior direction against the anterior chest wall. Superior migration of the lung is limited somewhat by the left pulmonary artery passing over the LUL bronchus. As a result, the superior segment of the left lower lobe frequently hyperexpands between the collapsed LUL and aortic arch, toward the left lung apex, accounting for the periaortic lucency seen on the plain chest radiograph. On CT, the atelectatic LUL appears as a triangular or V-shaped soft tissue density structure that abuts the chest wall anterolaterally with the apex of the V merging with the pulmonary hilum (see Fig. 7-68). Asthe collapse increases there is less contact of the LUL with the lateral chest wall. The collapsed lobe is bordered medially by the mediastinum and posteriorly by the major fissure, which is displaced anteriorly. Although the lobe is usually of homogeneous attenuation, some crowded air-filled bronchi may be seen. Secondary signs of collapse that are visible include elevation of the left hilum, with foreshortening of the aortopulmonary window, along with mediastinal displacement, usually accompanied by herniation of the right lung anteriorly. With elevation of the left hilum the LUL bronchus, which is normally lower than the right, may be seen at approximately the same level. Moreover, the left lower lobe bronchus may move anterolaterally. If the elevated left pulmonary artery is imaged lateral to the aortic arch, it may simulate lymphadenopathy. Decreased size of the left hemithorax also is apparent and is often much more striking on CT than on the chest radiograph.
In the absence of a large proximal obstructing lesion, the collapsed lobe should taper smoothly toward the hilum. If the obstructing mass (e.g., bronchogenic carcinoma, lymphadenopathy) is large enough, a contour bulge may be seen (see Fig. 7-68 C, D). The wedge of lung will be seen to widen focally rather than taper as it extends to the hilum. This is the CT equivalent of the S sign of
Golden and may be more apparent than on plain chest radiographs.
Although the distinction between benign and malignant neoplasms can only be made histologically, in some cases CT can confidently identify a benign cause of obstruction (e.g., broncholithiasis).
Right Upper Lobe Collapse
The pattern of right upper lobe (RUL) collapse is different than that of LUL collapse because the RUL is smaller than the LUL (which incorporates the lingular division) and has two fissural borders
(minor and major fissures). Furthermore, the right main stem bronchus is more apt to shift as a result of lobar collapse because itis not fixed at the hilum by the right pulmonary artery. These differences result in the RUL collapsing superiorly and medially rather than predominantly anteriorly as in LUL collapse. On CT, the collapsed RUL is seen as a sharply defined triangular density bordered by the minor fissure laterally and the major fissure posteriorly (Fig. 7-70). The minor fissure has a straight border, whereas the major fissure may have a straight, concave, or convex border. There is elevation of the right hilum and the right pulmonary artery may be seen at a higher level than normal. In addition, the right main stem bronchus may rotate anteriorly. Hyperexpansion of the middle and lower lobes also occurs. The superior segment of the lower lobe may extend between the mediastinum and medial border of the collapsed RUL, but this is a less common finding than with collapse of the LUL. Moreover, anterior lung herniation is less common, probably because of the smaller size of the RUL.
Right Middle Lobe Collapse
With collapse of the right middle lobe (RML), the minor fissure and lower half of the major fissure move close together. On CT scans, the collapsed lobe is triangular or trapezoidal, and is demarcated by the minor fissure anteriorly
P.469 and major fissure posteriorly (Fig. 7-71). The interface between the middle and upper lobe is frequently less distinct than that between the middle and lower lobe because the minor fissure is more parallel to the scanning plane. The collapsed RML decreases its contact with the lateral chest wall but maintains its contact with the anterior chest wall on more caudal images. Because of the small volume of the RML, usually there is no significant mediastinal shift, compensatory hyperinflation, or decreased volume of the hemithorax. Segmental collapse, which may be confusing on plain chest radiographs, is easily detected on CT by following the course of the middle lobe bronchus as it bifurcates into medial and lateral segmental bronchi. The medial segment abuts the heart and anteriorchest wall, whereas the lateral segment extends posterior to the hilum and does not contact the heart.
Figure 7-69  “Drowned―  obstructed left upper lobe.
Postcontrast CT shows a consolidated left upper lobe without notable volume loss. Although the left upper lobe bronchus is noted to be completely occluded, the size of the central mass cannot be determined. An enlarged subcarinal lymph node ( arrow) is present. Mediastinoscopic biopsy of enlarged pretracheal lymph nodes seen on more cephalad CT images disclosed poorly differentiated squamous cell carcinoma.Figure 7-70  Right upper lobe collapse. A: On CT, the collapsed lobe appears as a triangular, enhancing structure, sharply marginated laterally by the minor fissure ( solid arrows ) and posteriorly by the major fissure ( open arrow).B: On a more caudal image, the obstruction ( arrow) of the lobar bronchus is demonstrated. C: Even more caudal, the collapsed lobe is flattened against the mediastinum.Lower Lobe Collapse
The pattern of collapse is similar for both lower lobes, which collapse caudally, posteriorly, and medially toward the spine. On CT, the collapsed lower lobe appears as a wedged-shaped soft tissue attenuation structure adjacent to the spine (Figs. 7-72 and 7-73).
The major fissure, which forms the lateral border of the lobe, is displaced
P.470 posteriorly. The upper border of the collapsed lobe is usually concave (in the absence of a large central mass) whereas the lower border may be straight, concave, or convex. The varying configurations relates to the extent of collapse, presence or absence of a central mass, degree of distal pneumonia, and the anatomy of the inferior pulmonary ligament. If the attachment of the pulmonary ligament to the hemidiaphragm is incomplete, the lower lobe may collapse more completely adjacent to the spine and have a rounded caudal appearance (Fig. 7-74), especially on plain radiographs.
Secondary signs of collapse include inferior and medial displacement of the hilum, posteromedial displacement of the lower lobe bronchus, ipsilateral mediastinal shift, hemidiaphragm elevation, compensatory hyperinflation, and decreased size of the hemithorax.Figure 7-71  Middle lobe collapse. Collapsed lobe seen as a wedge-shaped structure, bordered by the minor ( long arrows ) and major ( short arrows ) fissures. Air is seen in the segmented bronchi in the collapsed lobe, which was due to broncholithiasis.
Role of MRI in
Pulmonary Collapse
In most patients MRI provides comparable information to CT with respect to identifying lobar collapse and evaluating the underlying mediastinum (611). Separation of tumor from distal collapsed lung is often possible using a T2-weighted pulse sequence, on which the collapsed lung is usually higher in signal intensity than the more proximal tumor, reflecting the higher water content of the collapsed lung (59,232). Because the water content of tumors and collapsed lobes vary, distinction is not always possible. MRI is inferior to CT indelineating bronchial anatomy, and bronchial narrowing may be overestimated because of respiratory motion and lesser spatial resolution.
Compressive Atelectasis
Compressive (or passive) atelectasis most frequently occurs secondary to fluid or air within the pleural space. Whereas a large pleural effusion can obscure parenchymal disease on the plain chest radiograph, CT can distinguish
P.471 atelectatic lung underlying the pleural effusion (Fig. 7-75) (444). If the bronchus is patent and air bronchograms are seen throughout the lobe, proximal obstruction is unlikely. The distinction between the lower attenuation pleural fluid and relatively higher density collapsed lung can be appreciated on non–contrast-enhanced images, but the difference is accentuated by IV contrast administration. In patients with malignant pleural disease, the lung may be compressed by tumor masses as well as by pleural fluid.
Neoplasm within the pleural space also is more easily seen following IV contrast administration (see Fig. 7-75).
Figure 7-72  Left lower lobe collapse. A,B: Sequential cephalocaudal CT images show a central contour deforming squamous cell carcinoma ( white arrowheads ) completely obstructing the left lower lobe bronchus ( black arrow). Tubular mucus-filled bronchi ( black arrowhead ) are seen distal to the tumor. Partially necrotic enlarged subcarinal nodes containing metastases ( white arrow ) also present. Note the volume loss in the left hemithorax.
Figure 7-73  Combined right middle and lower lobe atelectasis.
A, B: Selected cephalocaudal CT images demonstrate a collapsed middle (m) and right lower lobe (l). The cause is mucus plugging ( arrow) in the bronchus intermedius. A small right pleural effusion (e) is seen.Figure 7-74  Lower lobe atelectasis. Postcontrast CT demonstrates marked enhancement of the collapsed left lower lobe ( arrowheads ) and posterior basal segment of the right lower lobe ( arrow) in a postabdominal surgery patient suspected of having pulmonary embolism.
The patterns of compressive atelectasis secondary to a pleural effusion relate in part to the size of the pleural effusion. With small effusions, CT may demonstrate only subsegmental collapse of a lower lobe, seen anterior to the pleural effusion. The major fissure is visible further anterior to the remainder of the aerated lower lobe.
As the pleural effusion increases in size, most of the lower lobe is collapsed, and the major fissure is no longer visible as a discrete structure. With larger effusions, fluid can be seen extending into the major fissure anterior to the collapsed lobe. The inferior pulmonary ligament can be identified transfixing the medial border of the lower lobe to the mediastinum and dividing the medial pleural space into anterior and posterior compartments (142,526).Cicatrization Atelectasis
Cicatrization atelectasis refers to volume loss secondary to scarring from previous inflammatory disease (418). Endobronchial obstruction is not present. The degree of volume loss may be more marked than in cases of collapse secondary to endobronchial obstruction. Associated traction bronchiectasis in the atelectatic lobe and pleural thickening are frequently present. The usual pattern of collapse may be altered secondary to pleural adhesions and parenchymal scarring. For example, a cicatrized RUL may collapse more posteriorly with posterior rotation of the carina and RUL bronchus.
Rounded Atelectasis
Rounded atelectasis is a form of nonsegmental peripheral pulmonary collapse that may mimic a primary lung or pleural neoplasm. The lesion probably is the residua of a previous exudative pleural effusion, which may be caused by a variety of inflammatory processes including prior thoracic
P.472 surgery and asbestos exposure (382,613), with symphysis of the visceral and parietal pleura, and resultant infolding and entrapment of a peripheral portion of the underlying lung. This pulmonary pseudotumor, usually about 3 to 5 cm in diameter and most commonly located basally and dorsally, especially in the paraspinal region, is composed of a swirl of atelectatic parenchyma adjacent to thickened pleura. Although conventional radiography and tomography may demonstrate characteristic findings, especially a comet-like tail adjacent to the medial aspect of the mass produced by pulmonary arteries and bronchi entering the focal atelectatic lung, CT can be helpful in depicting the full extent of the benign disease process and confirming the diagnosis (Figs. 7-76, 7-77, 7-
78) (112). The CT findings include (a) a rounded or wedge-shaped mass that forms an acute angle with thickened pleura, which isimmediately adjacent to the mass or connected by a short fibrous band; the pleura is usually thickest at its contact with the contiguous mass, (b) vessels and bronchi emanating from the hilar region, swirling around and converging in a curvilinear fashion into the lower border of the mass (CT equivalent of the comet tail sign),
(c) air bronchograms or indistinctness in the central portion of the mass; the periphery of the mass may be more opaque because it represents the area of most complete atelectasis, (d) notable and usually homogeneous contrast enhancement of the atelectatic lung,
(e) adjacent paracicatricial hyperinflated lung, and (f) volume loss in the ipsilateral hemithorax, including fissural or mediastinal displacement. Rounded atelectasis often is associated with a history of asbestos exposure (382). In such patients, CT frequently demonstrates pleural plaques or parenchymal fibrosis in
P.473
P.474 other areas of the thorax. Rounded atelectasis usually remains stable on serial radiologic studies, although very slow growth or regression may occur. In the majority of cases, the CT findings are so distinctive that further evaluation usually is not necessary.
However, if the CT findings are equivocal, percutaneous needle biopsy of the mass can be valuable for clarification; a specimen demonstrating fibrosis only solidifies the diagnosis. Otherwise, radiologic follow-up or surgical resection is required for indeterminate lesions.Figure 7-75  Compressive atelectasis secondary to a pleural effusion. A: Postcontrast CT demonstrates a mildly enhancing collapsed left upper lobe (u), with intact central bronchi. Enhancing areas of pleural thickening
(arrowheads ) are due to a malignant mesothelioma. B: More caudal CT image shows the compressed left lower lobe (I). C: Reformatted coronal CT image shows the large left pleural effusion and the collapsed left
(L) lung.Figure 7-76  Rounded atelectasis. A, B: Mediastinal and lung window settings demonstrate a paraspinal mass (m) in the left lower lobe, with vessels ( arrows ) converging around its periphery. The lesion is adjacent to the most marked pleural thickening posteriorly in the left hemithorax, related to prior asbestos exposure. Abundant extrapleural fat ( arrowheads ), due to chronic pleural disease, also is noted. Similar, but less severe changes are present in the right posterior hemithorax. C: High- resolution CT through the same region more graphically depicts the peripheral scarring and converging vessels, with bronchi clustered near the apex of the atelectatic lung (open arrow ). Some pleural calcification also can now beseen.
Figure 7-77  Rounded atelectasis. CT shows a right paraspinal mass with vessels curving around its lateral aspect. The lesion is adjacent to the most marked pleural thickening and calcification, due to prior asbestos exposure, in the right hemithorax, where concomitant volume loss also can be noted. Calcified pleural plaques also are present in the left hemithorax.Figure 7-78  Rounded atelectasis equivalents. CT shows wedge-shaped opacities ( arrows ) in each upper lobe peripherally, adjacent to marked pleural thickening.
Pleural plaques and thickening are seen in other locations in both hemithoraces.
Bronchiectasis
Bronchiectasis, which by definition represents irreversible dilatation of the bronchi, has been classified pathologically into three forms, depending on the severity of the bronchial dilatation:
Cylindrical  (tubular)—uniform mild dilatation with loss of normal tapering.
Varicose —greater dilatation with irregular caliber due to areas of expansion and narrowing.
Cystic (saccular)—marked dilatation with peripheral ballooning.
The plain chest radiographic findings in bronchiectasis are oftennonspecific, unless the disease is very advanced (198). Surrounding infiltrate or fibrosis, which may be causative (641) as well as a sequela, can obscure recognition of dilated, thick-walled bronchi. In the past, bronchography usually was required for confirmation (or exclusion). Now CT, which is clearly safer and easier to perform, and causes no patient discomfort, is the imaging technique of choice to establish the presence and extent of bronchiectasis
(351,372,395,564). While each of the pathologic types of bronchiectasis has a characteristic appearance on CT, the differentiation between the various forms is much less important than the simple identification of the disease process itself.
Figure 7-79  Cylindrical (tubular) bronchiectasis. A 1.5-mm collimated CT demonstrates mild dilatation and wall thickening in craniocaudally oriented bronchi
(arrowhead ); compare diameter to adjacent pulmonary artery.Similar changes are present in horizontally oriented bronchi
(arrows ). This 65-year-old woman has a rare allele for cystic fibrosis.
Recognition of the anatomic changes produced by bronchiectasis, and distinction from the normal pulmonary parenchyma, is best achieved by obtaining the CT scans with narrow collimation
(191,209), now almost always accomplished with spiral MDCT. High- resolution CT (HRCT) is sufficiently sensitive and specific to serve as both the screening and the definitive diagnostic imaging technique in patients suspected of having bronchiectasis, and it has an overall accuracy of about 97% (72,262).
Normal bronchi are not visible on CT in the most peripheral areas of the lung, within 2 cm of the costal or paravertebral pleura. The cardinal sign of bronchiectasis is dilatation of the bronchus, which usually is accompanied by bronchial wall thickening (internal diameter <80% of the external diameter) (Fig. 7-79). Bronchial wall thickening alone, sometimes a subjective assessment, can be seen in chronic bronchitis without bronchiectasis, but a spectrum exists between these two disease processes. The CT appearance of an abnormally dilated bronchus depends on its orientation in the transaxial plane. Vertically oriented bronchi (typically those in the basilar segments of the lower lobes and the apical segments of the upper lobes) will be seen in cross-section, almost always adjacent to an accompanying pulmonary artery. In normal individuals,
P.475 the adjacent pulmonary artery is the same size, or minimally smaller, than the bronchus. A bronchoarterial ratio greater than 1.2 is indicative of abnormal bronchial dilatation. Substantial dilatation of the bronchus and smooth mural thickening results in a signet ring configuration (Fig. 7-80). Bronchi that have a more horizontal course through the transaxial CT images (typically the anterior segmental branches of the upper lobes, the superior segments of thelower lobes, and the lingula and middle lobe branches) are seen along their length (Fig. 7-81). Abnormal dilatation is manifested by the lack of normal tapering or sometimes actually flaring of the bronchi peripherally.
Figure 7-80  Bronchiectasis. High-resolution CT demonstrates multiple dilated, thick-walled bronchi bilaterally. Those coursing cephalocaudal appear as a signet ring
(white arrowhead ), due to a pulmonary artery adjacent to a dilated bronchus with smooth mural thickening. Some circular and tubular soft tissue attenuation opacities ( arrows ) represent dilated bronchi filled with mucopurulent material. Also noted are multiple small peripheral centrilobular nodules ( black arrowhead ) due to terminal bronchiole inflammation.Figure 7-81  Varicose and cystic bronchiectasis. A, B: Selected cephalocaudal high-resolution CT images demonstrate advanced bronchiectasis, with varicose dilatation in multiple areas, including the middle lobe (straight arrows ).
Cystic dilatation is seen in the left lower lobe ( arrowhead ), where a signet ring configuration ( curved arrow ) also is present.
In the United States and most developed countries, the advanced cystic type of bronchiectasis, which typically occurs after severe lower respiratory tract infections in childhood, is now unusual.
Milder, cylindrical bronchiectasis is much more commonly encountered. Cylindrical bronchiectatic airways may be filled with mucus plugs, and these can be recognized as branching V- or Y- shaped structures or large dots in the lung periphery (284). A varicose appearance, dilated and irregularly thickened (beaded) areas alternating with narrowed regions, may be seen in more advanced cases of bronchiectasis within bronchi coursing horizontally (Fig. 7-82). Large elliptical circular opacities or thick- walled lucencies
P.476 can be seen in far advanced cystic bronchiectasis and represent bronchiectatic cavities filled with mucopurulent material or air.Sometimes air-fluid levels may be seen, due to retained secretions in the dependent portions, within these cystic structures, which is very specific for bronchiectasis, because it is not generally seen in other cystic lung diseases such as lymphangioleiomyomatosis or histiocytosis X. Bronchi oriented horizontally may exhibit progressive dilatation as they extend peripherally, and a string of cysts or grape-like clusters may develop within a segment or lobe.
Surgical resection for bronchiectasis may be considered if the disease is limited to a relatively localized area.
Figure 7-82  Clustered cystic bronchiectasis. A In man with hypogammaglobulinemia, a high- resolution CT shows branching bronchiectasis ( arrow) in the right upper lobe. Thickened tubular bronchiectasis is present in the lingula as well as superior segment of the left lower lobe
(arrowhead ). Multiple peripheral centrilobular nodules also are seen due to concomitant small airway inflammation. B: In another man with Kartagener syndrome and situs inversus, a reconstructed coronal CT scan demonstrates bronchiectasis in the left middle lobe ( arrow).Figure 7-83  Bronchiectasis, mosaic attenuation. CT in a 22-year-old man with cystic fibrosis demonstrates a zone of increased mosaic perfusion ( arrows ) in a relatively spared area of the left upper lobe, which could be mistaken for an acute infiltrate, and also shows regions of cylindrical bronchiectasis ( white arrowhead ) and peripheral centrilobular nodules ( black arrowhead ) in the right upper lobe.
Supplementary CT signs of bronchiectasis include crowding of the affected bronchi, sometimes with recognizable fissural displacement and volume loss within a lobe. Secretions in the very small peripheral bronchi can produce branching centrilobular opacities, or the “tree-in-bud―  pattern. Areas of decreased attenuation may be seen in the lung parenchyma, the so-called mosaic oligemia pattern , surrounding affected bronchiectatic areas (212), usually due to concomitant small airways disease. This phenomenon results from reduced perfusion secondary to diminished focal ventilation and can be accentuated on scans obtained in expiration. Enlarged bronchial arteries may be seen on postcontrast images, and are most frequent in patients presenting with hemoptysis (570).Figure 7-84  Bronchioloalveolar cell carcinoma. Unusual diffuse cavitary form in a patient with dyspnea and weight loss, but no purulent sputum production.
Figure 7-85  Histiocytosis X. CT demonstrates multiple ill-defined peripheral nodules, several with cavitation ( arrows ) in this 33-year-old woman with markedcigarette-smoking history.
A false–negative diagnosis of bronchiectasis may be the result of inappropriately thick CT sections, image degradation due to respiratory motion, or obscuring surrounding consolidation.
Coexisting pulmonary arterial hypertension can cause dilatation of the pulmonary arteries, making recognition of adjacent bronchial dilatation more difficult. False–positive mimics of bronchiectasis can be secondary to cardiac pulsations seen in the left lower lobe lingula or middle lobe, which spuriously thickens the wall or doubles the bronchial lumen (603). A small emphysematous bleb usually can be differentiated from focal cystic bronchiectasis because the former has a minimally thick wall and no accompanying vessel. Rarely other conditions, such as cavitary lesions in bronchioloalveolar cell carcinoma (Fig. 7-84) or Langerhan histiocytosis X (Fig. 7-85), may simulate bronchiectasis.
Bronchiectasis related to allergic bronchopulmonary aspergillosis tends to predominate centrally and in the upper lobes, and to be relatively severe (varicose or saccular forms) (Fig. 7-86) in the affected bronchi (349,626). Mucoid impaction in these dilated, thick walled bronchi may be high in attenuation. Almost all cases of bronchopulmonary aspergillosis in adults occur in patients with bronchial asthma, with Aspergillus fumigatus , the most common inciting allergen (563). An inflammatory reaction with a cellular infiltrate, mainly composed of eosinophils, leads to bronchial wall damage and mucoid impaction. Adult patients with cystic fibrosis typically have panlobular bronchiectasis (see Figs. 7-79 and 7-83), also
P.477
P.478 usually quite severe (Figs. 7-87 and 7-88) (211,247,547). Distal collapse and consolidation may be present. Concomitant small airways disease, manifested as a “tree-in-bud―  pattern, orclustered centrilobular ill-defined nodules, due to dilated impacted bronchioles and surrounding inflammation (see section on Small
Airways Disease), is frequent in advanced cases. A mosaic attenuation pattern (geographic areas of decreased lung opacity) may result from air trapping due to this small airways disease.
Small lung nodules adjacent to mild bronchiectasis, particularly in the upper or middle lobes of elderly women, suggest infection with
Mycobacterium avium-intracellulare  (Fig. 7-89) (220,468).
Figure 7-86  Allergic bronchopulmonary aspergillosis. A, B:
Cephalocaudal CT scans demonstrate relatively central, mainly cystic, bronchiectasis ( arrows ) in this
27-year-old woman with asthma.Figure 7-87  Cystic fibrosis. A: CT with lung window setting shows panlobar varicose and cystic bronchiectasis. B: Huge bronchial artery collaterals are better demonstrated on mediastinal window setting in a 19-year-old man with marked hemoptysis.
Figure 7-88  Advanced cystic fibrosis. The right lung is collapsed and totally replaced with cystic bronchiectasis, with some containing an air-fluid level ( arrowhead ). Less advancedbronchiectasis is noted in the left lung.
Figure 7-89  Mycobacterium avium-intracellulare  infection. A, B
Sequential cephalocaudal CT images demonstrate ill-defined focal nodular opacities clustered around bronchi in the right lower and middle lobes, with concomitant tubular bronchiectasis present in the latter location.Figure 7-90  Severe chronic bronchitis. CT demonstrates mild bronchial dilatation and mural thickening.
These findings resolved following medical therapy.
Mild reversible bronchial dilatation may be seen with severe chronic bronchitis (Fig. 7-90) as well as in an area of acute pneumonic consolidation. In problematic cases, a repeat examination can be obtained after a suitable interval following antibiotic therapy. Also, advanced interstitial pulmonary fibrosis may result in dilatation and distortion of the bronchi, so-called traction bronchiectasis  (Fig. 7-
91); it is extremely unusual for such patients to have chronic purulent sputum production.Figure 7-91  Traction bronchiectasis. A: Mild dilatation of upper lobe subsegmental bronchi ( arrowhead ) is seen secondary to peripheral fibrosis in a woman who has had bilateral mastectomies and tangential beam radiation therapy. B: In another patient, dilated bronchi are seen along the bronchovascular bundles due to fibrosis from sarcoidosis. C, D:
Transaxial and coronal reformatted CT images demonstrate basilar bronchial dilatation ( arrows ) secondary to fibrosis from usual interstitial pneumonia in a patient with scleroderma. A dilated air-filled esophagus is present.P.479
PULMONARY PARENCHYMA
Solitary Pulmonary Nodule
Further radiologic assessment of a new pulmonary nodule detected on a plain chest radiograph is a common task (278,328,595,629). By definition, a solitary pulmonary nodule is a spherical intraparenchymal opacity, 3 cm or less in diameter, completely surrounded by lung, without associated mediastinal lymphadenopathy or atelectasis. Lesions larger than 3 cm in diameter usually are defined as masses; most represent bronchogenic carcinomas. But even a smaller nodular opacity may represent a relatively early and potentially curable (70% in stage I) primary bronchogenic carcinoma. The major diagnostic dilemma lies in distinguishing such a lesion from common benign causes of a pulmonary nodule, especially a granuloma or hamartoma. Proper evaluation is important so that expeditious surgical removal of a potentially curable bronchogenic carcinoma can be accomplished, while concomitantly avoiding unnecessary invasive procedures for the benign conditions. In some surgical series, less than 50% of resected nodules are due to a malignant neoplasm. Most malignant solitary pulmonary nodules are bronchogenic
P.480 carcinomas. Metastases are a much less frequent cause. In the patient with a known extrapulmonary primary lesion, the pulmonary nodule most likely represents a metastasis if the primary site was a sarcoma, melanoma, or testicular carcinoma. Conversely, it is likely a new bronchogenic carcinoma if the primary tumor was in the breast, or head and neck. With a primary in the colon, kidney or thyroid, the odds are equivalent (478).
The initial evaluation of the suspicious nodule should begin with a comparison of any obtainable previous chest radiographs. Absence ofgrowth for 2 years generally is indicative of a benign lesion. In the past, more detailed information about the character of the nodular density sometimes was acquired by fluoroscopically directed low- kilovoltage spot radiographs and conventional tomograms (243), particularly when the nodule was deemed likely to represent a granuloma on the plain radiograph. These studies better determined the contour of the lesion and whether the nodule contained internal calcifications with a pattern characteristic of benignity (435). The detection of significant calcium content by these standard radiologic techniques, however, was not always a simple matter. Calcium is easy to recognize when it is deposited in a distinctive pattern—such as a central nidus, in concentric rings, or in a popcorn-like configuration—because of the contrast difference with noncalcified areas of the nodule. But it is much more difficult to ascertain when the calcium is distributed diffusely throughout the lesion in a homogeneous fashion. Because density on a radiographic film is an imprecise parameter, the determination of the calcium content of a nodule that appears homogeneous on standard radiography is often quite subjective (37).
CT has become the standard radiologic technique for further investigation when the plain chest radiograph demonstrates a suspicious (not definitely benign) nodule (118,668). Sputum cytology usually is negative and bronchoscopy unrewarding with most small pulmonary nodules, and it is much less desirable to obtain frequent serial chest radiographs to monitor possible growth of the lesion (428) (which represents a trade-off of increasing diagnostic accuracy while potentially jeopardizing prognosis). CT is the most effective, objective, and widely available radiologic technique to further assess and characterize (shape, borders, and density) a presumed solitary pulmonary nodule (see Fig. 7-19; Fig.
7-92) (473,560). Furthermore, simultaneous assessment of the mediastinum and chest wall is achieved, along with comprehensive evaluation of both lungs. Not infrequently, other pulmonary nodules are detected in the patient suspected to have a single lesion onchest radiography. Either concurrent metastases, synchronous primary carcinomas (typically adenocarcinomas), or lesions of disparate etiology may be the explanation. Today, it is not infrequent that some pulmonary nodules require further characterization that were first identified not on chest radiography, but on abdominal or neck CT examinations or on a CT of the thorax performed for other reasons.
Figure 7-92  Calcified granuloma. A: An 8-mm collimated CT scan demonstrates a small right lower lobe nodule, questionably containing calcium. B: A 2-mm collimated CT scan, overcoming the partial volume averaging effect, demonstrates diffuse calcification within the nodule, which also appears slightly larger.
P.481
The preferred technique in the further evaluation of the solitarypulmonary nodule is to first perform MDCT of the entire thorax, reconstructing initial images at 5-mm intervals. Once the nodule is identified, more thinly reconstructed images (1 to 1.5 mm) are obtained (99,623). Current MDCT scanners allow large areas to be imaged rapidly using narrow collimation. With a 16-detector row scanner, it takes less than 9 seconds to cover the entire thorax using 1-mm collimation. Misregistration resulting from variations in respiratory depth is essentially eliminated, and artifacts due to cardiac motion markedly curtailed. Nodules as small as 2 mm are depicted routinely, even more central ones adjacent to vessels.
Resultant improved accuracy is possible when pulmonary nodules are analyzed for growth on sequential studies. Near isotropic imaging allows distortion-free reconstructions in any plane.
Retrospective reconstruction generally obviates rescanning a patient if a nodule was found unexpectedly.
CT clearly defines whether the suspicious nodule is intraparenchymal, rather than within the pleura or chest wall. More important, it provides a comprehensive assessment of nodule size, contour and internal components (densitometry). All characteristics of a nodule need to be evaluated simultaneously, as no single one
(except perhaps diffuse calcification) is absolutely specific.
Nodules can be classified morphologically as solid (soft tissue attenuation, homogeneous or heterogeneous), ground glass, or mixed. A ground-glass opacity is a focal hazy increase in attenuation with preserved margins of the contained vessels and bronchi. With solid lesions or consolidation, the bronchovascular margins are obscured. Most isolated ground-glass nodular opacities are inflammatory in etiology, but when due to neoplasm (typically bronchoalveolar cell carcinoma and, rarely, lymphoma), their appearance may represent lepidic interalveolar tumor growth with residual aeration or some low attenuation interalveolar mucin.
Whereas most mixed nodules are malignant, a similar peripheral halo appearance can be seen in inflammatory disease, most notably
Aspergillus  in immunosuppressed patients.Figure 7-93  Schematic drawing of representative pulmonary nodules. A Edge analysis. Nodules 1 and 3 are sharp and smooth, whereas 2 is slightly lobulated. Nodule 4 has one edge which is spiculated; this type of lesion can never be diagnosed confidently as benign on the basis of a single CT examination. B Patterns of calcification. Nodules 1 and 2 have extensive central calcification and are compatible with old healed granulomas. Nodules 3 and 4 contain eccentric calcifications, and do not meet criteria for diagnosis of a benign lesion (adapted from Siegelman SS, Zerhouni EA, Leo FP, et al.
CT of the solitary pulmonary nodule. AJR Am J Roentgenol .
1980;135:1–13.).
The margins of the nodule, best assessed using a high-frequency reconstruction algorithm, are usually categorized as sharp (smooth, lobulated, concave, polygonal), irregular or spiculated (Fig. 7-93)
(145). The vast majority of nodules with sharp, precisely defined borders are benign, whereas many nodules with irregular or spiculated borders are due to primary malignant neoplasms,especially the latter border (see Figs. 7-31 and 7-32) (7,316,317).
Spiculated borders generally are the result of a desmoplastic response to the tumor with fibrotic strands radiating into the surrounding lung parenchyma or direct infiltration of tumor cells into the adjacent bronchovascular parenchyma. Vessels or portions of the pleural converging toward a nodule similarly are suggestive of a malignant neoplasm due to surrounding cicatrization. A bronchus protruding directly into a nodule confirms an endobronchial origin and strongly suggests a bronchogenic carcinoma (see Fig. 7-24).
Satellite nodules, 1 to 4 mm in diameter, surrounding a larger nodule, greatly favor the diagnosis of a benign granuloma (Fig. 7-
94). Lesions that are not truly nodular in contour on CT, but rather ovoid or linear, are invariably benign (Fig. 7-95). As mentioned, there is overlap
P.482 in margin characteristics of benign and malignant nodules, so that no feature is absolutely pathognomonic of histology.
Figure 7-94  An irregular 9-mm nodule ( large arrow ) is present in the left lower lobe, which was identified on a prior chest radiograph. In addition, a more peripheral 4-mm irregular satellite nodule ( small arrow ) also is noted. CT-guided aspiration of the larger lesion revealed
Hisplasma capsulatum  organisms.
Evaluation of the internal components of a nodule, including densitometry, may be critical in distinguishing a benign from a potentially malignant lesion. The basic assumption underlying the use of CT densitometry is that the presence of calcification in a well- circumscribed pulmonary nodule is a strong indicator of a benign lesion because granulomas contain greater amounts of calcium much more frequently than do malignant neoplasms. Calcium attenuates the x-rays to a greater extent than soft tissue, resulting in higher
CT numbers within any nodule containing an appreciable amount
(22). Although this phenomenon was first reported in 1976, the concept was not widely applied (170,277,562) until newer scanners became available that were capable of obtaining very thin sections
(1 to 2 mm), overcoming the problem with partial volume averaging of the “true―  CT numbers of the nodule with surrounding pulmonary air (see Fig. 7-92). Obviously, CT would not be warranted in an attempt to distinguish a benign granuloma from a metastasis in a patient who has had a primary osseous or soft tissue sarcoma
(e.g., osteosarcoma or chondrosarcoma) or a mucin-producing adenocarcinoma (e.g., colon, ovary, or breast) that might calcify.
Also, metastases that have a propensity to bleed (e.g., choriocarcinoma or melanoma) may have higher CT numbers than soft tissue because of fresh hemorrhage or calcification induced by prior bleeding, but such lesions almost always have irregular margins.Figure 7-95  Benign apical changes. In a patient noted to have an irregular nodular opacity in the right lung apex on a conventional radiograph, CT shows only linear fibrotic changes in the area; stability was corroborated on follow-up radiographs.
A low-frequency reconstruction algorithm is best for performing CT densitometry of pulmonary nodules, as it minimizes noise and avoids peripheral higher attenuation artifacts (239). The section in which the nodule is largest (equatorial image) is chosen for analysis. If the nodule contains visible diffuse calcifications on mediastinal soft tissue window settings (which can be corroborated by cursor circle measurement demonstrating multiple pixels exceeding 300 HU), no further evaluation is necessary. MDCT permits confident recognition of calcification in nodules as small as 1 mm in diameter. Similarly, central or lamellar calcification within a well-circumscribed nodule is indicative of a benign lesion. Linear, low-density artifactual streaking may be seen in the pulmonary parenchyma adjacent to a calcified nodule. Motion artifacts may create spuriously high CT numbers. They are typically linear and usually easily recognized on the scan extending through and outside the nodule. Similarly, falsely high numbers can occur with cavitary lesions with streakingat the air interface; densitometry has no role in their characterization. With small lesions in the left lower lobe located near the heart border, artifacts induced by transmitted cardiac pulsations may preclude definitive assessment of the attenuation value of the nodule, but this is a very rare problem with MD helical technique.
If the nodular lesion in question is well circumscribed but no definite internal calcification is seen, the attenuation values within it can be determined. A point that cannot be overemphasized is that CT numbers used for tissue characterization are not quantitatively absolute; they are relative values influenced by a variety of inherent technical and geometric factors (274,334,369,481,664). The numbers can vary substantially depending on the size and position
P.483 of the object to be measured and the surrounding medium (beam hardening effect), the reconstruction algorithm used, and the photon noise (scan time, milliamperes). Attenuation values from the same lesion can be disparate when the images are generated by machines from different manufacturers with discordant hardware and software.
Notable variations can occur on exactly the same scanner from day to day because of kilovoltage or detector drift. Therefore, it is impossible to establish a universal value that documents the presence of calcification within a pulmonary nodule. A presumptive diagnosis of a benign granuloma can be offered if the lesion is homogenous and definitely exceeds 200 HU. As emphasized, the margins of any calcified lesion must be relatively smooth to confidently diagnose a benign lesion because a small percentage of bronchogenic carcinomas may contain foci of dystrophic calcification
(Fig. 7-96) (177,586), or they may form in a calcified scar or engulf a preexisting calcified granuloma. Such calcification, usually eccentric and amorphous or stippled, is most typically found in larger lesions that almost always have markedly irregular margins.
However, eccentric calcification may also be seen in a granuloma; a smooth outer contour of the nodule would strongly favor the latter.Relatively large and central carcinoid tumors also may contain foci of calcification (172); a clue to the proper etiology is their central location immediately adjacent to a secondary bronchus (see Fig. 7-
18). Most calcified granulomas are in the periphery of the lung.
Hamartomas, which also may be peripherally located, can contain course, scattered calcification (561). It is sometimes
“popcorn―  or chondroid-like, and at times may be detected in conjunction with fat in the lesion (see Fig. 7-20).
Figure 7-96  Calcified adenocarcinoma. Diffuse punctate calcifications are present throughout an irregularly marginated
3-cm right upper lobe mass ( large arrow ). The calcified mediastinal lymph nodes ( arrowheads ) were due to healed granulomatous disease. Asbestos-related pleural plaques ( small arrows ) are present.Another internal compositional feature within a well-circumscribed nodule permitting definitive diagnosis of a benign lesion is the presence of fat, characteristic of a hamartoma (Fig. 7-97) (561). An internal heterogeneous composition, sometimes with small areas of necrosis, best demonstrated on IV contrast-enhanced images, supports a diagnosis of carcinoma (see Fig. 7-30), but can also occur in granulomas. Small air bronchograms, or focal bubble lucencies (air bronchiolograms), in a poorly marginated lesion, are more common in a malignant lesion, especially bronchioloalveolar cell carcinoma and rarely pulmonary lymphoma, but may occur in benign inflammatory masses. Pseudocavitation may also be a feature of bronchioloalveolar cell carcinoma (see Figs. 7-54, 7-59, and 7-60).
The presence or absence of enhancement after IV contrast administration may contribute further data in predicting the etiology of a well-circumscribed homogeneous nodule (7 to 30 mm in diameter) that remains indeterminate (593,597). Nodules that enhance 15 HU or less in the central portion are most likely benign, whereas those that enhance 25 HU or more usually are neoplastic.
Such an assessment is based on the vascularity of the lesion, which generally should be minimal in a healed granuloma. This technique is not used in our institution.
Instead, FDG PET may be applied to further characterize a nodule remaining indeterminate after the CT examination (119). As noted, this technique assesses metabolic activity, also perhaps a reflection of the vascularity of a lesion and simultaneously evaluates most of the body, including the mediastinum (199,451).
Abnormal FDG PET uptake can be determined by simple visual inspection (analogous to the detection of calcification
P.484 in pulmonary nodules by CT), or by semi-quantitatively calculating a
SUV (206). An SUV of more than 2.5 generally is used as an indicator of malignancy, having a sensitivity of about 95%, aspecificity of about 80%, and a negative predictive value of about
95%. The latter may be especially valuable, giving added confidence to a decision to follow an indeterminate nodule with CT. The sensitivity improves with nodules greater than 1 cm in diameter, but the specificity decreases. False-positive results can occur due to the glycolytic action of macrophages, not neoplastic cells; the most common causes are active granulomatous disease (tuberculosis, fungal infections, and sarcoidosis) (see Figs. 7-53 and 7-66) or lipoid pneumonia. False-negative results can occur with nodules 8 mm or smaller, and low-grade neoplastic lesions such as well- differentiated and mucinous adenocarcinoma, bronchioloalveolar cell carcinoma and carcinoid (neuroendocrine carcinoma). Again, as already stressed, the accuracy of FDG PET is notably improved with fusion PET/CT scanners.
Figure 7-97  Hamartomas. A: CT demonstrates foci of low attenuation (fat) within a well- circumscribed right lower lobe nodule. B: In another patient, CT demonstrates both foci of calcification and fat within a well-circumscribed lingular nodule.Figure 7-98  Benign pulmonary nodule. High-resolution CT demonstrates a minimally lobulated, homogenous soft tissue attenuation 13-mm nodule in the middle lobe. This 72-year-old woman was not a smoker; no growth was demonstrated in the nodule during 3-year follow-up CT examinations.
In the practice of this author, many patients with an indeterminate nodule on CT of 9 mm or greater in diameter undergo an FDG PET examination, which allows for a more accurate risk stratification. If the PET study is negative, follow-up CT at 6-month intervals to assess for growth generally is sufficient. A positive PET study suggests the need for biopsy or resection, or in a patient with ancillary medical problems, a follow-up CT in about 3 months may be warranted.The optimal management of any pulmonary nodule remaining indeterminate is somewhat controversial (36,438). It certainly depends on patient age and comorbidities, smoking history, sometimes patient preferences, and the referring physician. The surgical risk and probability of malignancy in the particular nodule need to be assessed in each patient individually. Older patients with concurrent medical problems and a high surgical risk, benefit most from a conservative approach, such as interval follow-up CT examinations (Fig. 7-98). As previously stressed in the section on lung cancer screening, 100% increase in the volume of a nodule requires on a 25% increase
P.485 in diameter. The latter determination can be particularly difficult with small lesions (8 mm or less) or with ground-glass nodules.
High-quality MDCT examinations are a requisite, with image reconstruction of 1- to 2-mm lung sections, preferably with the same scanner. Volumetric measurements are more accurate than 2D ones, and allows for detection of asymmetric growth in the z-axis, but there can be problems related to disparities in lung volumes between examinations and motion and segmentation artifacts (598).
Focal Lung Lesions
A few other pulmonary masses besides healed granulomas may be confidently diagnosed with CT (590,607). As mentioned, small areas of fat density, sometimes accomplished by chondroid
(“popcorn― ) calcification within a well-circumscribed nodule, may be seen in a hamartoma (see Figs. 7-20 and 7-97) (561). Areas of fat (about -80 HU) within an irregular pulmonary mass or focal consolidated area, most typically in the middle or lower lobe or lingula, strongly suggests an exogenous lipoid pneumonia (Fig. 7-
99) (258,642). Obtaining a history of chronic mineral oil or oily nose drop use can corroborate the diagnosis. A bronchocele can be recognized by its characteristic branching pattern (Figs. 7-100 and
7-101); the congenital variety due to bronchial atresia typically hashyperinflated (hypovascular) lung surrounding the mass-like, dilated, mucoid-filled segmental or subsegmental bronchus (see Fig.
7-14) (85,475). Similar findings may occur in congenital lobar emphysema, but an entire lobe is involved in this condition.
Figure 7-99  Lipoid pneumonia. A: CT shows an irregular spiculated 3-cm mass ( arrow) in posterior basal segment of the right lower lobe. B: More cephalad CT image demonstrates some patchy ground glass opacity in the anterior segment of the right upper lobe ( arrow).C: Soft tissue window setting CT through right lower lobe mass demonstrates very low attenuation within the lesion, with multiple Hounsfield numbers in the negative range, compatible with fat. A history of chronic mineral oil use was obtained, and the lesions were unchanged on subsequent follow-up CT examinations 6 and 12 months later.
Figure 7-100  Bronchocele. A branching Y-shaped opacity ( large arrow) is seen in a lateral subsegmental branch of the middle lobe. No central obstructing mas ( small arrow ) is present, suggesting a congenital basis or acquired stricture. Lesion stable on follow-up radiographs.
A variety of pulmonary lesions that are either composed of abnormal vessels (Fig. 7-102) or have an aberrant blood supply can simulate asolitary lung nodule on chest radiography. Such abnormalities include a pulmonary arteriovenous malformation, pulmonary vein varix, and sequestration.
P.486
P.487
Pulmonary Arteriovenous Malformations
Although solitary malformations may occur, they are more frequently multiple and often in both lungs, especially the lower lobes. In the most common single form, the dilated vascular sac is connected to one supplying artery and draining vein. The complex forms, less than 10%, have more than one supplying artery.
Although cases may be sporadic, most of the multiple malformations occur in association with hereditary hemorrhagic telangiectasia
(Osler-Weber-Rendu syndrome). The resultant right to left shunt bypassing the pulmonary capillary bed may cause cerebral events
(e.g., stroke, abscess); intrapulmonary hemorrhage and hemothorax is another possible complication.
The diagnosis is usually straightforward on CT (and sometimes on plain chest radiography) (Figs. 7-103 and 7-104). The malformation appears as a smooth, round, elliptical or even serpiginous nodule, with the feeding artery, less than half the diameter of the nodule, and the draining vein usually readily apparent. Contrast-enhanced
CT images show marked opacification of the lesion(s)
(173,469,645).
When screening relatives of patients with hereditary hemorrhagic telangiectasia for pulmonary arteriovenous malformations, bubble echocardiography (436) is used in our medical center (others do use
CT). If this study is positive, then CT pulmonary angiography is performed, using a technique identical to that previously described for pulmonary embolism. However, maximum-intensity projections
(MIP) reconstructions are almost always obtained to
P.488more quickly and accurately scrutinize the pulmonary parenchyma for malformations and depict the size and number of the supplying artery(ies), a determination critical for establishing the feasibility of treatment with coil embolization (Figs. 7-105 and 7-106) (110). At times, only small peripheral telangiectatic abnormalities not amenable to embolization are discovered (203,649). Catheter pulmonary angiography is usually restricted to this latter interventional application when a feeding artery greater than 3 mm is identified on the CT angiogram.
Figure 7-101  Congenital bronchoceles. A: The impacted mucus is calcified in this dilated branching bronchus ( arrow) in posterior segment of the right upper lobe. B: In another patient, a dilated, mucus-filled bronchus ( arrow) is surrounded by hyperinflation (due to collateral air drift) in posterior basal segment of the left lower lobe.Figure 7-102  Pulmonary artery pseudoaneurysms. A:
Posteroanterior chest radiograph demonstrates a right perihilar mass in a patient who developed hemoptysis following cardiac catheterization (including Swan-Ganz catheterization). Mild cardiac enlargement and small bilateral pleural effusions are present. B, C: Transaxial and coronal reformatted CT images demonstrate a pseudoaneurysm of the right pulmonary artery ( arrow), surrounded by thrombus. This was successfully treated with coil embolization. D, E: In another patient, transaxial and oblique reformatted CT images demonstrate a pseudoaneurysm of the middle lobe pulmonary artery, in a patient who previously had a
Swan-Ganz catheter inserted during a myocardial infarction. F:
In another patient, a small pseudoaneurysm of the left lower lobe pulmonary artery ( arrowhead ), causing hemoptysis, has developed adjacent to a left lower lobe abscess.
Figure 7-103  Pulmonary arteriovenous malformation. A:
Transaxial postcontrast CT shows a markedlyenhancing nodule in the left upper lobe ( arrow) with a large vessel nearby ( arrowhead ).B: A volume-rendered CT image shows a single supplying artery ( arrowhead ) and the draining vein ( arrow).
Pulmonary Sequestration
There are two types of pulmonary sequestration: intralobar and extralobar (16,124,140,585). Most pulmonary sequestrations
P.489
P.490 diagnosed in adults are intralobar, which are contained within the lung, usually a lower lobe, without a separate visceral pleural covering. Almost all of the latter are probably acquired abnormalities related to chronic infection, which leads to disruption of the normal pulmonary arterial supply to this area of the lung, with subsequent parasitization of systemic arterial supply, most commonly distal thoracic aortic branches to the visceral pleura near the inferior pulmonary ligament. Drainage almost always is via the pulmonary veins into the left atrium. Associated anomalies are rare.
Intralobar sequestrations typically appear on CT as a mass-like lesion, with round or pyramidal shape, frequently containing cystic spaces, which may exhibit air-fluid levels within them (Figs. 7-107,
7-108, 7-109). Adjacent emphysematous changes are common
(298). The systemic feeding artery (or arteries in about 16%) from the lower thoracic aorta invariably can be identified on MDCT angiography. Extralobar sequestrations are truly congenital, almost always encountered in neonates and young children. This lesion has its own separate visceral pleural investment, outside the normal lung, and is almost always airless, with no connection to the normal pulmonary arteries or bronchi. This mass generally is discovered incidentally on radiography, sometimes obtained because of other congenital anomalies or even pre-natal ultrasound. On CT, theytypically appear as a triangular or oval mass, usually near the medial bases of the lower lobes, especially on the left side (Fig. 7-
110). Arterial supply is from the lower thoracic or upper abdominal aorta, but drainage is to the inferior vena cava, azygos, or portal veins. MRI also may be used to define and characterize the size and course of anomalous arterial feeding vessels to sequestrations
(202,420), and does not rely on iodinated contrast material for their depiction.
Figure 7-104  Pulmonary arteriovenous malformation. A:
Transaxial CT shows a serpiginous enhancing vascular mass in the left lower lobe ( arrow).B: Volume-rendered CT image shows the malformation
(arrowhead ) with a draining vein ( arrow).Figure 7-105  Small peripheral pulmonary arteriovenous malformation. A: Transaxial CT shows a small ill-defined nodular opacity in the right lower lobe. B:
Sagittal thin-section maximum-intensity projection reconstruction CT shows a cluster of small vessels supplying and draining the lesion ( arrow).C: Catheter pulmonary angiogram corroborates tiny vessels supplying the malformation ( arrow) deemed too small for embolization.Figure 7-106  Small peripheral pulmonary arteriovenous malformation. A: Transaxial CT images shows a cluster of small nodules in posterior basal segment of the left lower lobe ( arrow).B: Transaxial thin-section maximum- intensity projection CT shows small vessels supplying the lesion. C: Sagittal thin-section maximum-intensity projection corroborates only very small vessels supplying the malformation, not deemed suitable for embolization, and catheter pulmonary angiography obviated.Figure 7-107  Intralobar sequestration. A: Soft tissue window setting CT shows a serpiginous opacity in the left lower lobe, supplied by a vessel ( arrow) from the descending thoracic aorta. B: Lung window setting CT shows region of hyperlucency ( arrowheads ) surrounding the opacity in posterior basal segment of the left lower lobe.
Other Focal Lesions
Abundant extrapleural fat just lateral to a lung lesion is strong circumstantial evidence of a benign chronic condition (Fig. 7-111).
Such a nodule/mass generally can be conservatively observed with follow-up radiographs/CT to corroborate stability.
CT is more sensitive in detecting subtle (early) cavitation within a known nodule and it can provide a thorough assessment of the thickness and nodularity of the cavity wall. As with conventional radiography, there is no pathognomonic feature on CT todifferentiate the various etiologies for a cavitary lesion, although an irregular inner wall with a thickness exceeding 15 mm favors a malignant neoplasm and surrounding infiltrate an inflammatory process (Figs. 7-112, 7-113, 7-114, 7-115). Cystic adenomatoid malformations, which are extremely rare in adults, may appear as cystic or conglomerate ring shadows in the pulmonary parenchyma
(Fig. 7-116) (452,484). They may change rapidly in size on serial radiologic studies. Inhomogeneous surrounding consolidation results from recurrent infection and mucus plugging.
Figure 7-108  Intralobar sequestration. A: Lung window setting CT shows ovoid nodular opacity in posterior basal segment of left lower lobe, with some associated peripheral scarring and surrounding hyperinflation. B, C:
Postcontrast soft tissue window setting cephalocaudal CT images show a supplying vessel ( arrow) from the descending aorta.
Figure 7-109  Infected intralobar sequestration. CT shows a large abscess A: In the left lower lobe with surrounding consolidation. B: More caudal CT image demonstrates a large vessel ( arrow) from the descending aorta supplying the sequestered lung.Figure 7-110  Extralobar sequestration. A, B: Cephalocaudal CT images shows two vessels from the descending thoracic aorta ( arrows ) supplying an area of opacification in the left lower lobe, noted on a chest radiograph in this one day old infant. C: Volume-rendered CT documents the two vessels ( arrow) arising from the aorta.Figure 7-111  Benign lung lesion. An irregular ovoid nodular opacity (thin arrows ) is seen in posterior segment of the right upper lobe; it possesses no features characteristic of a benign lesion. However, abundant extrapleural fat (thick arrows ) is noted external only to the nodular opacity, characteristic of a healed inflammatory lesion (possibly an organized pneumonia or prior pulmonary infarction). The lesion remained stable on follow-up radiologic studies.Figure 7-112  Cavitary lesions, primary squamous cell carcinomas. A: CT shows an irregular somewhat thick-walled cavitary mass in the left lower lobe. B:
In another patient, CT shows a thick-walled cavitary mass, with a mural nodule ( arrow) completing occluding the posterior segmental bronchus ( arrowhead ) of the right upper lobe.
Figure 7-113  Cavitary lesions, metastatic squamous cell carcinoma (cervix). CT shows multiple lung nodules, the largest mass in the right upper lobe having a markedly irregular thick wall.
Figure 7-114  Cavitary lesion, aspergillus .A: In a patient with carcinoma of the larynx, CT demonstrates a large thick-walled cavitary lesion in the left apex, considered most likely a synchronous primary lung carcinoma. An 18- fluorine–positron emission tomography study showed markedly increased uptake in the lesion. B: Specimens obtained from a CT-guided needle biopsy of the wall of the lesion disclosed Aspergillus fumigatus .Figure 7-115  Actinomycosis. An ill-defined cavitary mass, with a smooth inner wall, and surrounding infiltrate, is seen in posterior segment of the left upper lobe. Some infiltrate ( arrow) also is present in superior segment of the left lower lobe, as the infectious process has crossed the fissure.
P.491
P.492
P.493
P.494
A fungus ball, or mycetoma, generally is the consequence of a conglomeration of intertwined hyphae and cellular debris developing within a preexisting pulmonary cavity, such as due to prior tuberculosis or sarcoidosis, typically in the upper lobes. Aspergillus fumigatus  is responsible for the vast majority. This fungus is usuallya saprophyte, but may follow previous angioinvasive aspergillus in immunocompromised patients. Early in the development of a fungus ball, CT may demonstrate a “sponge-like―  network filling the cavity with a surrounding crescent of air (518), before a more solid mobile mass becomes demonstrable (Fig. 7-117). Adjacent pleural thickening is common. As the organism grows, extensive granulation tissue lines the inner cavity wall, which may result in hemoptysis.
Figure 7-116  Cystic adenomatoid malformation. CT shows cystic areas with mild surrounding infiltrate in posterior basal segment of the left lower lobe in a patient with prior recurrent lung infections. No abnormal arterial supply from the aorta was depicted.
Occult Pulmonary Metastases
As cancer therapies have become increasingly successful andsophisticated, establishing the presence of pulmonary metastases sometimes is important because it may dictate
P.495 some modification of treatment. In the initial evaluation and follow- up of most patients with primary neoplasms, standard chest radiography is the only radiologic examination required. This diagnostic approach is dictated by its relatively low cost and good sensitivity, plus the difficulty of treating most lung metastases. CT is valuable in selected circumstances as a more sensitive method for identifying small metastases that are undetectable or poorly seen by standard chest radiography.
Figure 7-117  Fungus balls (aspergillomas). A: CT in a patient with chronic myelogenous leukemia demonstrates a mass with contained branching lucencies within a cavitary infiltrate (semi-invasive aspergillosis) in the left lung apex. Surrounding pleural thickening is present. B: In another patient, CT shows a round mass (mobile on a prone image) within a postinflammatory pneumatocele following treatment for a staphylococcal pneumonia.Noncalcified pulmonary nodules smaller than 6 mm in diameter generally will not be seen with conventional radiographic techniques, whereas those larger than 15 mm should be readily detectable (101). Not only is the size of the lesion important, but also the nature of the surrounding anatomic structures greatly affects detection. Certain unfavorable locations tend to mask lesions unless they are relatively large. Overlying bones, blood vessels, or the heart (Fig. 7-118) can obscure the outline of a nodule. Nodules about 6 mm in diameter usually are seen only when they are projected directly over rib interspaces. The vast majority of pulmonary metastases resulting from hematogenous dissemination occur in the peripheral third of the lung, frequently in a subpleural location (542). Such subpleural nodules may be difficult to detect on conventional tomography, as the blurring produced by this technique frequently is insufficient to erase the obscuring densities of the overlying chest wall. The added yield of CT in detecting otherwise occult pulmonary nodules is in large part attributable to elimination of structural overlap. The transverse cross-sectional display of CT affords a more ideal demonstration of these peripherally situated lung lesions, as well as improving detection of nodules in the retrocardiac, retrosternal, and perihilar areas, in the inferior recesses near the domes of the hemidiaphragms, and in the extreme lung apices. In addition, the inherent superior contrast sensitivity of
CT plus the ability to make windowing adjustments also decreases observer error. Pulmonary nodules are frequently overlooked on the gray-on-gray format of conventional chest radiographs or whole-lung tomograms, in which the lesions lack a marked contrast difference from the surrounding parenchyma. The ability to display lung nodules on the CT format as a white structure against the black background of the lung, rather than as a light gray nodule against a darker gray background, enhances their density differences and consequently their detectability. Particularly with lesions 2 to 6 mm in diameter, CT frequently demonstrates one or more lung nodules when plain film tomography shows none, two or more nodules whentomography reveals only one, or bilateral nodules when tomography demonstrates only unilateral disease (104,383,393). Also, CT images the mediastinum and chest wall as well as the upper abdomen, with unsuspected metastases sometimes detected in these regions.
Figure 7-118  Occult pulmonary metastasis. A 9-mm nodule
(arrow), due to metastatic sarcoma is demonstrated in the retrocardiac region of the left lower lobe.
Identifying pulmonary nodules on CT generally is quite straightforward. Most lung metastases are round and well circumscribed, although some have irregular infiltrating margins; rarely, a predominantly interstitial (“lymphangitic― ) pattern occurs, which will be discussed later. If the nodular opacity is in the periphery of the lung and is separate from, and larger than, adjacent vascular structures located a similar distance from the chest wall, then the opacity represents a nodule. Because the lung is dividedinto lobes, a nodular metastasis may appear relatively central although it is actually located subpleurally adjacent to a fissure.
When pulmonary nodules are similar in size or smaller than vessels in the same area, interpretation is more difficult and these lesions may be overlooked. When viewing sequential scans, if the suspected lesion is continuous with a vascular structure on adjacent scans, the nodular opacity is probably a vessel rather than a nodule. Although
2 mm is generally accepted as the lower limit of detectability for peripheral lesions, more centrally located nodules usually must be larger in size to be consistently distinguished from a vessel on the cross-sectional image (Fig. 7-119). A pulmonary metastasis also may go undetected with older, conventional CT technique because it lies in a skip area produced by inconsistency in the depth of suspended respiration, which may vary up to 10 mm near the diaphragm, even in cooperative patients (304); this problem essentially has been overcome with spiral CT acquisition (68,506).
Tumor emboli resulting from hematogenous metastases may occlude and enlarge peripheral pulmonary arteries. They appear on CT as branching, lobulated enlargement of small to medium sized vessels.
Occasionally, peripheral infarction may result with distal consolidation or ground-glass opacification (261).
Multiple cavitary metastases usually result from primary squamous cell carcinomas, most frequently of the head and neck or the cervix
(see Fig. 7-113). Other extrathoracic
P.496 neoplasms can also be the cause, including sarcomas and colorectal carcinomas.Figure 7-119  Occult pulmonary metastasis. An 8-mm nodule
(arrow), due to metastatic sarcoma, is demonstrated centrally, just anterior to a bifurcating bronchus and associated pulmonary arteries.
Occasionally, the CT examination will detect a small linear density, sometimes irregular or angulated, in the periphery of the lung. Such a shape is not characteristic of a metastasis, which is typically round or lobulated, but rather is more consistent with a scar or focal atelectasis (194). A repeat scan in approximately 3 to 6 months may be helpful if further clarification is required.
Although CT is more sensitive than conventional radiologic studies in detecting small pulmonary nodules, a major limitation is that there are other causes besides metastases for such nodules
(172,275,405). They could represent a residue from previous infection or inflammation, an intrapulmonary lymph node, as well as a benign or primary malignant lung neoplasm. In areas where granulomatous disease (e.g., histoplasmosis) is endemic, approximately 30% of occult pulmonary nodules detected by CT arebenign, even in patients with documented primary extrathoracic neoplasms. Nevertheless, most pulmonary nodules discovered, particularly in the pediatric age group or in adults from areas in which granulomatous disease is rare, do represent metastases. And the more nodules detected, the greater is the presumption that metastases are present. Short of performing a limited thoracotomy for definitive histologic diagnosis, since fiberoptic bronchoscopy or percutaneous needle aspiration biopsy would have exceedingly low yields with these small peripheral nodules, a repeat CT examination after waiting a period of approximately 6 to 12 weeks may be required before a definitive distinction between metastasis or granuloma is attempted. An increase in size or number of the nodule(s) on the follow-up CT study may be assumed to represent de facto  evidence of metastatic disease.
Not all patients with extrathoracic malignant neoplasms should undergo a thoracic CT examination. Because of its relatively high cost, plus the problem of lack of tissue specificity, the clinical decision as to whether to proceed to a CT study when chest radiography is negative should be based on answers to the following questions: (a) Would the demonstration of pulmonary metastases alter the clinical management of the patient's primary tumor? (b)
What is the propensity of the specific type of tumor to metastasize to the lungs? and (c) Is there effective therapy available for metastatic disease of this tumor type? If the overall incidence of lung metastases from a given tumor being evaluated is very low
(e.g., stage I carcinoma of the cervix) (77,478), the extra effort to detect occult pulmonary nodules usually is not justified. However, with selected primary malignant neoplasms, an accurate assessment of the extent of metastatic disease may be crucial in reaching a therapeutic decision. CT would be indicated in some patients with primary tumors that have a high propensity for pulmonary metastases (e.g., osteosarcoma, melanoma of Clark level IV or V)
(223,620), particularly when a major operation is being considered
(e.g., amputation, extensive lymph node dissection), or in whom thelikelihood of detecting additional lesions is high (e.g., presumed solitary lung metastasis when surgical resection is being contemplated). CT occasionally may be used to provide a road map for surgical removal of metastases and may help to determine if a single procedure (i.e., a median sternotomy) or staging thoracotomy is required when bilateral lesions are present. Although MRI can occasionally demonstrate pulmonary nodules in close proximity to blood vessels that were undetected by CT (396), CT is superior in most patients because its greater spatial resolution permits better detection of nodules situated close to the pleura or diaphragm, as well as their relationship to a fissure, or the techniques are equivalent.
Other Occult Pulmonary Processes
Some lung lesions may be difficult to see or characterize on conventional radiographs because they are partially obscured or hidden by superimposed structures, such as tortuous mediastinal vessels, the heart, or the chest wall. Sometimes technical factors, such as marked obesity or the inability of the patient to stand or sit, preclude optimal roentgenographic evaluation of a pulmonary process. CT commonly shows parenchymal pulmonary infiltrates, particularly in the lower lobes, due to aspiration or lung contusion, after nonpenetrating trauma in patients in whom the chest radiograph (usually a supine portable) was normal (384). A gas collection seen within the consolidated area immediately after trauma is indicative of a pulmonary laceration. In the immunosuppressed, neutropenic patient with a vague focal opacity noted on a portable chest radiograph, CT may be valuable in suggesting an earlier diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis.
A soft tissue attenuation pulmonary nodule or mass is seen surrounded by a zone of lower ground-glass opacification (the halo sign) due
P.497 to hemorrhage/edema (Fig. 7-120) (289,309,652). On occasion,despite good-quality conventional chest radiographs, pathologic processes involving the lung parenchyma may be detectable on CT when the former study is negative, such as a small, otherwise occult, cavitary lung lesion (64,305), emphysema (43,294), and interstitial disease due to a variety of causes (192,394).
Figure 7-120  Invasive aspergillosis ; the halo sign. Hazy less opaque infiltrate, or ground glass opacity ( arrows ), surrounds two well-circumscribed soft tissue attenuation pulmonary nodules in the right upper lobe.
Radiation-Induced Pulmonary Injury
Patients who have undergone radiation therapy to the thorax, which causes some damage to the lungs in virtually all patients, are usually followed with plain chest radiographs. CT may be helpful in selected patients in the evaluation of possible residual or recurrentneoplastic disease (82,127,342). It is, therefore, important to understand the typical postradiation changes seen on CT to avoid confusion with neoplasm or possibly infection (245,343,600).
Radiation-induced changes detected on plain chest radiography and
CT will vary depending on many factors, including individual susceptibility, concomitant exposure to chemotherapy, radiation dose, volume irradiated, and the time course of delivery. A knowledge of the radiation portals and elapsed time since treatment is very important to understanding the radiographic findings.
Acute radiation changes (termed radiation pneumonitis ) do not always develop, but when they occur they are usually seen on standard chest radiographs at 6 to 8 weeks following 4,000 rads of treatment (342). However, they may be seen as early as 4 to 5 weeks following completion of treatment if 4,000 rads is exceeded or concomitant chemotherapy is given. There is a gradual development, in most patients, of radiation fibrosis, which usually stabilizes radiographically by 9 to 12 months following treatment. Acute posttreatment changes can be seen sooner with CT than plain chest radiography, occurring as early as 25 days after completion of radiation therapy. Generally, there is an evolution from a homogeneous slight increase in density (ground-glass opacification) to patchy more discrete areas of actual consolidation (Fig. 7-121).
Focal small nodular abnormalities can occur and may be confused with pulmonary metastases (Fig. 7-122). The findings conform to the shape of the radiation ports and often extend
P.498 across normal anatomic boundaries. There may be an associated small pleural or even pericardial effusion. The margins of the postradiation changes tend to become more sharply defined with time, relating to the development of fibrosis with streaky opacities in the radiated area, volume loss, and pleural thickening; traction bronchiectasis may develop within these consolidated fibrotic areas
(see Fig. 7-91A; Fig. 7-123). The most specific and helpful CT feature is confinement of the radiation changes to the irradiatedlung volume (355). For example, tangential ports used for treatment of breast carcinoma characteristically produce pleural-based infiltrates in the anterolateral aspect of the thorax that are sharply separated from the adjacent lung (98). These findings are more apparent on CT than on plain chest radiographs.
Figure 7-121  Acute radiation pneumonitis. A: Posteroanterior chest radiograph, in woman with right breast carcinoma who had a cough and right chest pain 11 weeks after initiation of radiation therapy, shows a very subtle opacity in the right upper lobe.B: CT shows patchy consolidation in the right upper lobe. The residual mass and a clip in the right breast are seen, along with anterior skin thickening.Figure 7-122  Radiation pneumonitis following tangential beam therapy. A, B: Cephalocaudal CT images obtained 4 months after completion of radiation therapy for a left breast carcinoma show a peripheral nodular infiltrate in the left upper lobe, with some slight associated volume loss.
Figure 7-123  Radiation fibrosis following tangential beam therapy. CT obtained 18 months after completion of radiation therapy for outer quadrant left breast carcinoma demonstrates relatively sharply defined opacification
(arrows ) in the immediate subpleural area of the left upper lobe.
Lucencies seen within the opacified area are compatible with traction bronchiectasis, and volume loss in the left hemithorax is present.
Differentiation of Postradiation Changes from Other Entities
Following radiation therapy, it may be difficult to determine from standard chest radiography whether residual or recurrent tumor is present. CT may show that the observed changes are typical of, or inconsistent with, radiation effect while concomitantly assessing the underlying mediastinum (342,355). Abnormalities that develop outside of the radiation ports, or the presence of any discrete mass or cavitation, should be considered suspicious for neoplasm (or superimposed infection). Sometimes, it is not possible to differentiate fibrosis from residual or recurrent tumor with CT. In some cases, MRI may be helpful (169). Areas that are very low in signal intensity on T2-weighted images are indicative of (radiation) fibrosis, but high signal intensity is a nonspecific finding. Recurrent tumor, infection, and radiation change (even several years after treatment probably due to persisting inflammation) can demonstrate relatively high signal intensity. Similarly FDG PET imaging may be of value in assessing for residual or recurrent tumor versus fibrosis after chemo or radiation therapy, or even surgery (119). As with
MRI, active inflammation
P.499 after radiation therapy may cause a false-positive result, and imaging may need to be deferred at least two months aftertreatment. In difficult cases, percutaneous or open biopsy may be necessary.
Pulmonary Embolism
Pulmonary embolism results from a thrombus that forms in the venous system, becomes dislodged, and passes into a pulmonary artery after migrating through the right side of the heart. It is a common condition and the third most lethal disease in the United
States (175,565,578). Clinical symptoms are not specific for pulmonary embolism, as they may be encountered, perhaps with equal frequency, in a variety of acute cardiopulmonary disorders, including asthma, emphysema, myocardial infarction, pulmonary edema, pneumonia or pneumothorax. Even additional data derived from the electrocardiogram, plasma D-dimer assay (295,638), which probably is of clinical value only when it is negative, arterial blood gas analysis and the chest radiograph (114) do not permit a definitive diagnosis or exclusion of pulmonary embolism in most patients (381). Further imaging usually is required to strengthen the possibility of pulmonary embolism or to suggest an alternative diagnosis. Multiple options exist, alone or in combination, including ventilation/perfusion (V) scintigraphy, pulmonary angiography, spiral CT angiography (CTA), MR angiography and venography, and ultrasound (Doppler) venography.
Recent technical advances in CT, including the newest multidetector array scanners (employing very narrow collimation and extremely short acquisition times), have allowed it to emerge as the primary diagnostic technique for suspected pulmonary embolism (Fig. 7-124)
(459,485,539). CT pulmonary angiography is being used as the initial and often sole radiologic study for its diagnosis (or exclusion) in the majority of patients. Spiral (helical) CT, now available in almost all hospitals, allows the rapid acquisition of a contiguous volumetric data set at peak contrast enhancement, and the direct recognition of pulmonary emboli in aP.500
P.501 relatively noninvasive fashion (although requiring the IV administration of iodinated contrast media)
(180,264,286,448,458,504,606,618). Even single-slice helical CT scanners have demonstrated sensitivities in the range of 85% for the detection of pulmonary emboli, and with the new multidetector array scanners, the study can be performed in a technically adequate fashion in more than 95% of patients, with a sensitivity and specificity also exceeding 95% (80,447,501,516,530,540).
Sometimes an alternative explanation for the patient's symptoms is provided, such as a diagnosis of unsuspected aortic dissection (the converse is also true with CT) (520). Much more diagnostic certainty and overall dramatically improved accuracy is provided compared with [V with dot above]/[Q with dot above] scintigraphy (174). Also,
CTA is less invasive, easier to perform, less costly and more readily available than conventional catheter pulmonary angiography (577), and substantially curtails and usually eliminates the necessity for this examination (648).Figure 7-124  CT angiography, pulmonary emboli. A: Transaxial CT shows filling defect
(arrow) in the first bifurcation of anterior segment of the right upper lobe pulmonary artery. B: Oblique reconstruction demonstrates embolus ( arrowhead ) at bifurcation. C: Coronal reconstruction demonstrates nonenhancing embolism
(arrowheads ) completely occluding a distal right upper lobe subsegmental artery.Figure 7-125  CT pulmonary angiography, technique. A: In an oncologic patient, with no peripheral venous access, contrast media was injected through a central vascular access catheter at a rate of 1.5 mL/second. Excellent enhancement is achieved, and the trailing edge of a large embolism ( arrowhead ) is demonstrated in the distal right pulmonary artery. B: Bolus tracking. In another patient, a cursor circle is placed over the main pulmonary artery, and a series of low-dose scans obtained at this level after IV contrast media administration. When a Hounsfield unit value of 100 is reached, this triggers automatic initiation of scanning of the entire thorax.Figure 7-126  Pulmonary vein thrombosis. A, B: Selected cephalocaudal transaxial CT images, in a patient post–lung transplantation with peripheral consolidation of the right upper lobe, demonstrate patency of the right upper lobe pulmonary artery ( arrowhead ) with occlusion of the right superior pulmonary vein ( arrow).C: Coronal reconstruction shows the occluded vein ( arrow) with a patent artery
(arrowhead ).
Technique
For high diagnostic accuracy, it is crucial that a specific spiral(helical) acquisition technique be used for dedicated detection of pulmonary emboli, although they may be recognized on routine, even noncontrast, scans (184,263,588).
For single detector scanners, collimation of 2 to 3 mm should be used, with reconstructions performed at 1 to 1.5 mm, with a pitch of
1.7 to 2. With multidetector array scanners (4 to 64 rows), which should always be utilized if available, collimation and reconstruction of 0.65 to 1.25 mm is used (in exceedingly dyspneic patients, 2.5- mm collimation of each detector is acceptable). A high peak kilovoltage (137 to 140 kVp) and high milliamps (180 to 320 mA) are advocated.
A dose of 120 mL of a 300 mg I/mL (350 for patients who weigh more than 225 pounds) of nonionic contrast should be injected through an 18- to 20-gauge catheter placed in a medially directed antecubital vein at a rate of 4 mL per second, with at least a 15- second delay to imaging (if a central vascular access catheter is used, the injection rate is generally restricted to 1.5 mL/second)
(Fig. 7-125A) (233,533). This delay is best determined by computer monitoring of enhancement in the main pulmonary artery (bolus tracking and triggering software to allow for individual customization of the scan delay); a rise of 100 HU should then initiate the scanning sequence (Fig. 7-125B) (215).
Images are acquired from the diaphragm to the level of the lung apex. Scanning in a caudocephalad direction minimizes breathing artifacts late in the acquisition sequence, which are less significant in the upper lobes, plus contrast-induced streak artifacts from the opacified superior vena cava. With single detector scanners, the breath-hold required usually is 20 to 30 seconds, with a multidetector scanner it is usually 6 to 18 seconds.
Contrast-enhanced CT also may be helpful in evaluating for possible occlusive disease involving the central pulmonary veins that can produce unusual patterns of pulmonary parenchymal opacification
(Fig. 7-126) (113,357,363,514).Interpretation (Analysis)
Image interpretation should be accomplished using a soft-copy monitor (workstation) (485,489,650). It is generally not feasible to print out the large number of reconstructed images (300 to 500) acquired, especially from the multidetector array scanners. The monitor allows rapid viewing of the transaxial images in cine
(scrolling) mode, tracing entire vessels from the periphery to centrally, and vice versa. Veins can be quickly differentiated from arteries, as the former enters the left atrium and the latter emanate from the hilar pulmonary arteries. Window levels and widths can be quickly and appropriately adjusted for the most optimal viewing of the pulmonary vessels (depending upon the degree of contrast enhancement; a preliminary default setting window height of 100 HU and width of 600 HU is used initially in our practice to scrutinize the pulmonary arteries for filling defects), and lung window viewing can be accomplished simultaneously. The latter is valuable for detecting pulmonary parenchymal abnormalities (such as peripheral infarctions), assessing for breathing artifacts, and also for distinguishing segmental and subsegmental arteries from veins at particular levels (the former are accompanied by bronchi, the latter are not).
Multiplanar reconstructions (see Figs. 7-124 and 7-126; Fig. 7-127), which are most valuable when chronic emboli are under consideration, can be quickly performed and viewed in selected patients when obliquely coursing vessels are questioned to contain pulmonary emboli (256).
The most reliable sign on CT of an acute pulmonary embolism, as with pulmonary angiography, is the demonstration of a relatively central intraluminal filling defect in a pulmonary artery surrounded by contrast media (see Figs. 7-124 and 7-127; Figs. 7-128 and 7-
129) (531). Such
P.502P.503 partially occluded vessels oriented in the transaxial plane may simulate “railroad tracks.―  Concomitant dilatation of the involved artery beyond its normal diameter sometimes can be recognized. Complete occlusion (cutoff) of a vessel is less common; the trailing edge of the embolus may be seen on images of the more central artery (see Figs. 7-124C, 7-125A; Fig. 7-130). Most patients with emboli have them visible in multiple sites, oftentimes both centrally and peripherally. A diagnosis of pulmonary embolism should not be made if an unopacified artery is only visible on one scan level; this may result from vessel pulsation and flow artifact. It must be recognized that, as with the interpretation of pulmonary emboli on conventional pulmonary angiography, the diagnosis (or exclusion) is not always patently obvious, and that a learning curve is involved (76) (Fig. 7-131).
Figure 7-127  Coronal CT reconstruction shows emboli ( arrows ) in both interlobar pulmonary arteries.
The purpose of creating this special image was to further evaluate the size and effect of a concomitantly detected bronchogenic cyst (c).Figure 7-128  Acute pulmonary emboli. CT angiogram demonstrates a “worm-like―  filling defect
(black arrow ) in the right intralobar pulmonary artery, surrounded by contrast media, plus an intraluminal defect in the left intralobar artery ( white arrowhead ), which also is enlarging the latter vessel.Figure 7-129  Acute pulmonary emboli. A: A relatively large embolus ( arrowheads ) is visible in the central pulmonary arteries on a noncontrast CT image in this mildly anemic patient. B: Postcontrast CT shows a “worm-like―  intraluminal saddle embolus ( black arrow). A more distal embolism is present in an anterior segmental right upper lobe branch (white arrow).C: In another patient, a saddle embolism is mainly mural, but is surrounded by contrast in the left pulmonary artery ( arrowhead ).D: Lung window setting corroborates acute etiology as no mosaic oligemia is present (compare with Figure 7-134).Chronic pulmonary emboli also can be diagnosed with CTA
(41,46,291). Such emboli tend to be eccentric, contiguous with the vessel wall, appearing as mural thickening (Figs. 7-132, 7-133, 7-
134, 7-135, 7-136, 7-137). These peripheral, crescentic filling defects may contain areas of calcification. Arterial webs may be visible, and the most peripheral arteries may demonstrate areas of narrowing and/or dilatation. The central pulmonary arteries may be dilated and prominent bronchial arteries commonly are visible
(221,496). A mosaic pattern (360,552,584) of lung perfusion/attenuation or linear scars frequently is seen on the lung window settings. Even localized bronchial dilation may occur, perhaps related to chronic hypoxia (Fig. 7-138) (509).
Most patients with pulmonary emboli have a visible pulmonary parenchymal opacity or small pleural effusion on CT (Figs. 7-139 and 7-140) (546). However, the only reliable
P.504
P.505
P.506
P.507
P.508
P.509
P.510
P.511 abnormality highly correlated with embolization is an area of consolidation adjacent to a pleural surface that is wedge-shaped
(triangular, tetrahedral) (Fig. 7-141) or with convex borders bulging toward the hilum (28,188,566). The periphery of such consolidated areas may demonstrate substantial enhancement, perhaps secondary to bronchial arterial collateral flow. Sometimes, scattered areas of relatively low attenuation may occur within these peripheral opacities, secondary to infarction and perhaps some necrosis (290).
Subsegmental atelectasis, focal oligemia, and small pleural effusions are also seen in many other conditions, and have no predictive value. With massive pulmonary emboli, morphologic abnormalitiescompatible with right ventricular failure/strain may be seen (Figs. 7-
142 and 7-143) (93,541), including right ventricular dilatation, deviation of the interventricular septum toward the left ventricle, and contrast reflux into the hepatic veins or coronary sinus. Similar findings of right ventricular strain also may be present on electrocardiography.
Figure 7-130  Small subsegmental pulmonary embolism. A–D:
Sequential cephalocaudal CT images demonstrate an occluded arterial branch ( arrowheads ). On the initial two images, the interface of the “trailing edge―  of the embolism within the contrast media is visible.Figure 7-131  Acute pulmonary emboli, massively obese woman.
A: CT demonstrates a filling defect in the right lower lobe pulmonary artery. Photopenia does degrade the quality of the image in this obese woman. B–D:  Selected cephalocaudal images document the filling defect ( arrowheads ) on multiple sequential scan levels.Figure 7-132  Chronic pulmonary emboli. A, B: Sequential transaxial CT images demonstrate eccentric mural filling defects ( arrowheads ) in right lower lobe pulmonary arteries. C: Volume-rendered coronal reconstruction demonstrates hypertrophied bronchial arteries. D: Coronal reconstruction at lung window setting shows multiple areas of mosaic oligemia, mainly in the right upper and lower lung zones.Figure 7-133  Chronic pulmonary emboli. A: Transaxial CT shows a mural filling defect ( arrow) in the right lower lobe pulmonary artery. A thrombus is present in the right atrium. B: Slightly more caudal, a web is seen ( arrowhead ) in this vessel. C, D: Selected coronal volume-rendered reconstructions show the web in the right lower lobe pulmonary artery ( arrowhead ) and mural thrombus ( arrow) in the superior segment pulmonary artery.Figure 7-134  Chronic pulmonary emboli. A–C:  Selected cephalocaudal CT images demonstrate a large mural thrombus ( arrowheads ) in the main and left pulmonary artery, and webs ( arrows ) in branches of the right lower lobe pulmonary artery. Dilatation of the main pulmonary artery and the right atrium and ventricle reflects severe pulmonary arterial hypertension. D: Lung window setting CT demonstrates focal areas of mosaic oligemia (compare with Figure 7-129 C, D).Figure 7-135  Chronic pulmonary emboli. A: Mediastinal window setting CT demonstrates multiple small calcifications ( arrowheads ) in a large mural filling defect in the main and left pulmonary artery. An acute embolism also is present in a right upper lobe artery ( arrow).B: Lung window setting CT demonstrates multiple areas of mosaic oligemia.Figure 7-136  Chronic pulmonary emboli. A, B: Volume-rendered coronal and sagittal reconstructions demonstrate calcified webs
(arrowheads ) in the right lower lobe pulmonary artery. Note the abrupt cut-off and pruning of multiple peripheral pulmonary arteries.Figure 7-137  Chronic pulmonary emboli, dilated bronchial arteries. A, B Selected cephalocaudal transaxial CT images show small enhancing vessels ( arrowheads ) in the mediastinum. A mural embolus is noted in a subsegmental right upper lobe pulmonary artery branch. C Volume-rendered coronal reconstruction demonstrates the dilated bronchial arteries ( arrows ).Figure 7-138  Chronic pulmonary emboli. A: Mediastinal window setting CT demonstrates mural filling defect
(arrowhead ) in a left lower lobe pulmonary artery, in a massively obese man. B: Lung window setting CT demonstrates dilated, slightly thick-walled, left lower lobe bronchi.
Figure 7-139  Acute pulmonary embolism. A: Mediastinal window setting CT shows an embolus in theleft lower lobe pulmonary artery extending dorsally into the superior segment branch. A small left pleural effusion is present.
B: Lung window setting CT demonstrates two peripheral areas of consolidation ( arrows ) in the left lower lobe compatible with pulmonary infarctions.
Figure 7-140  Acute pulmonary embolism. CT shows bilateral lower lobe atelectasis and small bilateral pleural effusions. Despite their presence, an intraluminal embolism ( arrow) can be depicted in a distal left lower lobe pulmonary artery. The lateral portion of the left lower lobe is relatively unenhanced, probably due to poor perfusion
(infarction).Figure 7-141  Acute pulmonary embolism and infarction. A: CT demonstrates a central filling defect in a right lower lobe pulmonary artery ( arrow).B: More caudal, a wedge-shaped area of nonenhancement ( arrowheads ) is seen in the lateral basal segment of the right lower lobe.Figure 7-142  Massive acute pulmonary emboli, right heart strain. A, B: Selected cephalocaudal CT images demonstrate emboli filling multiple upper and lower lobe pulmonary arteries. A patent foramen ovale ( arrowhead ) has been opened because of markedly increased right heart pressures. C: More caudal, marked dilatation of the right atrium
(RA) and ventricle (RV) are seen. Patient was treated successfully with a thrombolytic agent.
About 65% of patients with no evidence of pulmonary emboli have other findings (79,80,186,222,286). Most important, in nearly 30%of patients, an explanation for the patient's symptoms is provided
(e.g., aortic dissection, pericardial effusion, coronary artery graft occlusion or myocardial infarction, fibrosing mediastinitis, arteriovenous malformations, esophageal disease, pleuritis/effusion, pneumonia or rib fracture/metastases) (see Figs. 7-11, 7-12; Figs.
7-144, 7-145, 7-146) (548,549). And in another 10%, clinically relevant additional pathology is detected (e.g., unsuspected bronchogenic carcinoma or lymphoma, pulmonary or bone metastases, or sequestration) (Fig. 7-147).
Figure 7-143  Massive acute pulmonary emboli, right heart strain. A: CT demonstrates almost complete occlusion of both lower lobe pulmonary arteries ( arrowheads ).B:
More caudal, dilatation of the right atrium (RA) and ventricle
(RV) is seen. Note that the right ventricular chamber is larger than the left ventricular chamber. C: Even more caudal, reflux of contrast media into the inferior vena cava is visible ( arrow) and a fluid–fluid level within it indicates marked stasis of blood flow.
Figure 7-144  Aortic dissection, not pulmonary embolism. A:
Preliminary noncontrast CT shows that the technologist has mistakenly placed the cursor circle lateral to the pulmonary artery. B: Postcontrast CT image demonstrates poor opacification of the pulmonary arteries. Nevertheless, default triggering has resulted in optimal opacification of the aorta, depicting an intramural hematoma
(arrow) of the descending thoracic aorta. C: Sagittal MPR CT shows the acute intramural hematoma
(arrowheads ), which in retrospect is present on the noncontrast image, starting just distal to the left subclavian artery, providing the correct explanation for chest pain in this patient.
Figure 7-145  Mucus plugging, not pulmonary embolism. In this patient post–coronary artery bypass surgery with decreasing oxygen saturation, CT demonstrates a largemucus plug ( arrow) occluding the left main stem bronchus. No pulmonary embolism was seen. Bilateral pleural effusions and atelectases of the left lung are present.Figure 7-146  Fibrosing mediastinitis, not pulmonary embolism.
A, B: Cephalocaudal CT images show intact pulmonary arteries becoming narrowed ( arrow) as they extend through partially calcified hilar lymph nodes. C: Volume-rendered CT with altered windowing demonstrates the narrowed arteries without emboli extending through the partially calcified enlarged hilar lymph nodes. D:
Ventilation/perfusion scintigraphy, performed because patient was part of Prospective Investigation of Pulmonary Embolism
Diagnosis (PIOPED) II study, was interpreted as high likelihood ratio for pulmonary emboli. E: Catheter pulmonary angiogram, performed because of discrepant interpretation between prior two diagnostic tests, corroborates absence of pulmonary emboli.
The narrowing of the pulmonary arteries is better seen on the CT angiogram, and the calcified lymph nodes are not visible on the subtraction catheter pulmonary angiogram.Figure 7-147  Acute pulmonary emboli, plus an advanced bronchogenic carcinoma. A: Posteroanterior chest in a hypertensive man with new dyspnea was interpreted as showing only a tortuous aorta. B, C: Cephalocaudal CT images demonstrate bilateral pulmonary emboli, as well as enlarged mediastinal lymph nodes (n) (due to later proven metastases), in addition to the primary squamous cell carcinoma obstructing posterior segment ( arrowhead ) of the right upper lobe.
P.512P.513
P.514
Pulmonary embolism and deep venous thrombosis usually are different manifestations of the same disease entity. About 90% of pulmonary emboli are extensions from thrombi above the knee in the pelvic or thigh veins. With the increasing use of IV support devices inserted into the subclavian or jugular veins, the upper extremity veins and superior vena cava are more common sources of emboli. Treatment of pulmonary embolism and deep venous thrombosis generally is the same. Therefore, definitive depiction of the latter is sufficient to initiate therapy. In patients with symptoms of lower extremity deep venous thrombosis, Doppler ultrasound usually is the first indicated imaging technique
(273,550). However, this test is not very sensitive in patients without symptoms, and a negative result certainly does not exclude a diagnosis of pulmonary embolism.
Recognizing that different levels of interpretative experience and disparate CT equipment exists in some hospitals, and that very small isolated subsegmental emboli can be missed on CTA, some radiologists advocate concomitant routine venous imaging of the pelvis and thighs (Fig. 7-148) (75,78,84,178,346). Such can generally be accomplished quite rapidly after thoracic image acquisition, without any additional injection of contrast media.
Delayed images, about 180 seconds after the initiation of the contrast bolus, can be obtained from the iliac crest to the knee, using 5-mm reconstruction (with multidetector scanners, this takes about 10 seconds).
Accuracy (Results)
Spiral pulmonary CT angiography (CTA) cannot be accomplished in about 4% of potential candidates because IV contrast media cannot be administered (contrast allergy or elevated creatinine).Less than 4% of examinations conducted with state-of-the-art equipment are technically suboptimal or inadequate,
P.515 similar to the rate reported for conventional catheter pulmonary angiography. This usually results from poor opacification of the pulmonary arteries, most commonly due to poor cardiac output
(congestive heart failure) or rarely unsuspected superior vena caval obstruction, infrequently from poor technique (catheter placed in laterally-directed antecubital vein), or respiratory motion artifacts in dyspneic patients. Massive atelectasis or pleural effusion may diminish blood flow substantially to a local area, but rarely preclude optimal evaluation of the pulmonary arteries in these areas (see Fig.
7-140).
Figure 7-148  Pulmonary emboli, deep venous thrombosis. A:
Multiple small peripheral pulmonary emboli are present in the right lower lobe (depicted on serial images). B: Delayed CT venogram shows a thrombus ( arrow) enlarging the right deep femoral vein.With high-quality CTA examinations, pulmonary emboli in vessels 2 to 3 mm in diameter can be reliably seen (540). These are basically all segmental arteries and a substantial number of the subsegmental
(or fifth order, with the main pulmonary artery the first order, the left and right the second order, the lobar the third order, and the segmental the fourth order) arteries; with multidetector array scanners, about 94% of the subsegmental arteries are well opacified and depicted as opposed to about 62% with single-detector scanners
(159). The overall rate of demonstrating pulmonary emboli in our hospital-based population recently has been 16% (549), similar to other studies (471). Although this is less than the 30% reported results from conventional pulmonary angiography, the discrepancy almost certainly is the result of clinicians' increased likelihood to request a CTA, especially when their suspicion of embolism is not high, rather than their missing emboli, and recognizing that the examination simultaneously provides a comprehensive assessment of the thorax. The extent of the embolization may impact upon a clinical decision to use thrombolytic agents (urokinase or recombinant tissue-type plasminogen activator) (21,656) instead of anticoagulant therapy (see Fig. 7-142). Complete occlusion of a lobar artery or when 30% of the pulmonary circulation is affected, or when right ventricular strain is demonstrated, are proposed criteria
(477).
Nevertheless, spiral CTA certainly is not perfect, and some isolated subsegmental emboli will be missed (504). The true incidence and clinical relevance currently is unknown (or at least debatable).
Isolated, subsegmental pulmonary emboli may be a harbinger of future, larger, possibly fatal pulmonary embolism. But equally plausible, they may simply be incidental occurrences not warranting treatment. In the Prospective Investigation of Pulmonary Embolism
Diagnosis (PIOPED) study, isolated subsegmental emboli were interpreted on angiograms in 6%, but the interobserver agreement was only 66% (not much better than a coin flip), and most of thesepatients generally did well even if not placed on anticoagulant therapy (462). The fibrinolytic activity of the normal lung probably lyses most small emboli without any adverse effect. With MDCT, small peripheral pulmonary emboli can be reliably diagnosed
(485,492), probably with the same sensitivity and specificity, and in the opinion of the author, greater confidence, compared with conventional catheter pulmonary angiography. Even if an isolated small subsequental embolism is detected on CTA, this finding may not be clinically relevant, and the risk of anticoagulation (443) may outweigh the possible benefit (123,179). Lower extremity
P.516
Doppler ultrasound or CT venography (see Fig. 7-148) may be valuable to assess the thrombus burden and aid in the decision whether to treat or not.Figure 7-149  Pulmonary artery sarcomas. A, B: Transaxial and coronal reconstruction CT images demonstrate large filling defects in the pulmonary arteries bilaterally. Note that the filling defects are heterogeneous, suggesting neoplasm rather than emboli. C: A gadolinium- enhanced magnetic resonance angiographic image demonstrates some enhancement ( arrow) in the intrapulmonary arterial filling defects. D: In another patient, CT demonstrates heterogeneous filling defects in the main pulmonary arteries.Interpretative pitfalls do exist, most frequently occurring when experience is limited, including those related to individual patients
(respiratory motion, image noise with very large body habitus), technical factors (inappropriate window setting or reconstruction algorithm, improper contrast administration), anatomic factors (hilar lymph nodes, arterial bifurcations, pulsation artifact, misidentification of pulmonary veins), and pathologic conditions
(mucus plugging of bronchi, pulmonary artery sarcoma, tumor emboli) (Figs. 7-149 and 7-150) (34,187,488,500,650,659).
With an excellent quality CTA study, and advanced interpretative experience, when no pulmonary emboli are seen, clinically relevant pulmonary embolism is essentially excluded, and anticoagulation can be safety withheld
(111,152,182,185,268,344,439,472,479,596,610),
P.517 comparable to a normal pulmonary angiogram (228). The sensitivity and specificity in these circumstances both exceed 95%, and are getting even better with the introduction of multidetector-array scanners (447). The CT pulmonary angiogram and pelvic/thigh venogram generally is concordant, however, some patients will have a positive venogram and a negative CTA (and the converse is also true).Figure 7-150  Nonenhanced bronchial artery blood flow, not pulmonary embolism. A: In a patient with known chronic congestive heart failure, in whom the clinician suspected superimposed pulmonary emboli, the small filling defect ( arrow) in a right lower lobe pulmonary artery is due to nonenhanced blood entering the vessel from a bronchial arterial collateral. B:
In another patient with a similar clinical scenario, another small somewhat linear filling defect ( arrowhead ) is visible.
Indirect CT venography has comparable accuracy to ultrasound in the detection of deep venous thrombosis in the femoropopliteal system (151). Also, it can depict thrombosis in the iliac veins and vena cava, which are poorly shown on sonography. However, the addition of CT venography increases the radiation dose to the patient, especially the gonads, and we use it only in selected patients older than age 40 years.
Role
Properly performed and interpreted spiral (helical) CT pulmonary angiography almost always is definitive for the diagnosis (or exclusion) of pulmonary embolism (providing a yes/no answer), andsometimes demonstrates the cause of symptoms in the absence of emboli (see Figs. 7-11, 7-12, and 7-144, 7-145, 7-146) (235,549).
It is the preferred initial radiologic imaging technique in any patient who presents with signs and/or symptoms suggesting possible pulmonary embolism, and no clinical findings to suggest lower extremity deep venous thrombosis, unless there is a contraindication to the administration of IV contrast material
(67,80,345,411,615). This author would be even more emphatic when the patient has a history of cardiac or pulmonary disease, and/or an abnormal plain chest radiograph (the latter is not even needed if the clinical suspicion of pulmonary embolism is high).
It is not unreasonable in a previously healthy young woman (no history of cardiac or pulmonary disease) who presents to the emergency department with signs or symptoms suggesting possible pulmonary embolism, and who has a normal plain chest radiograph, that a ventilation-perfusion radionuclide scintigraphic study could be used as the first radiologic test to limit radiation exposure to the breast (86); recently introduced breast shields may greatly diminish this risk. In this limited scenario, a normal or high probability interpretation generally would allow a therapeutic decision to be reached. Should this study be indeterminate (intermediate), then spiral CTA could be performed (439). In pregnant patients, the radiation dose to the fetus is lower with CT, especially in the first trimester when it is most critical (646).
[V with dot above]/[Q with dot above] scintigraphy is superb in detecting pulmonary perfusion abnormalities and a normal result essentially rules out the diagnosis of pulmonary embolism (462).
But [V with dot above]/[Q with dot above] scintigraphy is only an indirect test for thromboembolic disease because there are many other causes of abnormal perfusion besides emboli that greatly restrict its accuracy (see Fig. 7-146) (519,531). The inability of [V with dot above]/[Q with dot above] scintigraphy to directly depict emboli results in the necessity to establish probability (likelihood ratio) criteria, which are not only ambiguous and confusing toclinicians but also accompanied by high interobserver disagreement
(174,569).
P.518
Its most notable limitation is the very high rate of inconclusive results (Fig. 7-151). In a hospital-based population, no valuable diagnostic data may be provided in approximately 70% of patients
(462). Neither a high or low probability (likelihood ratio) result by itself suffices to confirm or exclude the diagnosis of pulmonary embolism. Even with a high probability interpretation, only 85% were due to pulmonary emboli. An intermediate (indeterminate) interpretation occurred in 39%, with a low probability in 34%.
Although it is agreed that most of the patients in the latter category did well without anticoagulant therapy, multiple cases with such an interpretation have been seen personally in which CTA shows notable nonocclusive emboli.
Figure 7-151  Pulmonary embolism. Woman who is 9 weeks pregnant has dyspnea and chest pain. A chest radiograph was interpreted as normal. A: Ventilation/perfusion scintigram demonstrates a matched perfusion/ventilation defect in the right lower lobe, and was interpreted as intermediate likelihood ratio for pulmonary embolism. B, C: Selected cephalocaudal mediastinal setting CT images demonstrate unequivocal filling defects ( arrowheads ) in a right lower lobe pulmonary artery. D: Lung window setting CT shows a small area of consolidation in the posterior basal segment of the right lower lobe compatible with a pulmonary infarction.
The overall sensitivity and specificity of [V with dot above]/[Q with dot above] scintigraphy is far inferior to CTA
(52,80,153,365,615,617,619). Concomitant lung disease such as emphysema does not decrease the accuracy of the latter technique
(512). If all high, intermediate and low [V with dot above]/[Q with dot above] interpretations are categorized as positive, the test has an exceedingly high sensitivity of 98%, but a specificity of only
10%. If only high and intermediate interpretations are classified as positive, the specificity rises to 52% but the sensitivity drops to
82%. Combining this data with the pretest clinical probability of the diagnosis improves assessment for only a minority of patients (the same type of analysis would improve accuracy for all diagnostic tests). In patients with an intermediate (indeterminate) probability and in a substantial number with a low
P.519 probability, the presence or absence of pulmonary emboli remains unresolved. However, despite the contention that intermediate and low probability interpretations are not useful in establishing the presence of or excluding pulmonary emboli, conventional pulmonary angiography has been infrequently performed to complete thediagnostic evaluation (536).
The cost (or in reality the charges) for a CTA is quite comparable with [V with dot above]/[Q with dot above] scintigraphy (at the hospital of this author), and the former can be performed more expeditiously. The results of a CTA examination are equally valid whether the requesting clinician is an insecure neophyte or one with a wealth of experience (completely independent of the aforementioned pretest clinical possibility). It is my personal belief that [V with dot above]/[Q with dot above] scintigraphy today has a very limited role in the assessment of possible pulmonary embolism, and should be restricted to those patients in whom IV contrast media cannot be administered, although gadolinium- enhanced MR angiography is another option (122,378,434,440), at least for larger central emboli, or to those hospitals without high quality CT technology and/or interpretative experience. Conventional pulmonary angiography today generally can be restricted to the very few patients with a technically inadequate or suboptimal CTA (27).
As emphasized, the majority of patients with an initial clinical suspicion of pulmonary embolism do not have the disease. Spiral
CTA not only permits exquisite depiction of the pulmonary arteries, but also superb delineation of the pulmonary parenchyma
(essentially high-resolution images), mediastinum and pleura.
Alternative diagnoses responsible for the clinical symptoms are possible in almost 30% of patients studied (see Fig. 7-11, Fig. 7-12, and Fig. 7-144, 7-145, Fig. 7-146). In addition, ancillary diagnoses of previously unknown clinically significant diseases occur in about
10% of studies (see Fig. 7-147).
Other Emboli
Methyl-methacrylate pulmonary embolization can occur after percutaneous vertebroplasty, with the emboli appearing as very opaque tubular and branching structures (Figs. 7-152 and 7-153)
(81).Diffuse Lung Disease
There are more than 100 causes of diffuse lung disease, including interstitial and airspace infiltrative processes, airway disease, and emphysema, although less than 20 entities account for the majority of cases encountered in routine clinical practice. The relatively low cost and excellent spatial resolution of the plain chest radiograph make it the primary imaging technique for the detection and evaluation of diffuse parenchymal lung disease. However,
P.520 the superior contrast sensitivity and cross-sectional imaging plane of
CT, which diminishes superimposition, allows earlier detection and better characterization, especially when performed using high- resolution techniques (42,57,96,394,399,426,591,592,663). Chest radiographs may be normal in up to 15% of patients with diffuse infiltrative lung disease, and in up to half of patients with mild bronchiectasis and emphysema. HRCT is valuable in patients suspected of having lung disease, usually because of symptoms and/or abnormal pulmonary function tests, who have normal or minimally abnormal plain chest radiographs, and to clarify nonspecific chest radiographic findings to provide a definitive or limited differential diagnosis. An appropriate biopsy site where the most active disease is present may be identified and the progress of the disease followed after initiation of treatment with corticosteroids or cytotoxic agents. However, even with high resolution, a specific diagnosis often cannot be made, sometimes necessitating transbronchial or open lung biopsy for pathologic evaluation (190).Figure 7-152  Methyl-methacrylate pulmonary embolization. A,
B: Coronal and sagittal volume-rendered CT reconstructions demonstrate multiple very high attenuation peripheral pulmonary emboli ( arrowheads ). The barium impregnated methacrylate forms a cast of the azygos vein
(arrows ) extending directly cephalad from the uppermost vertebroplasty. An infus-a-port type catheter is present, extending from the left brachiocephalic vein into the right atrium, as well as a right internal jugular central vascular access catheter with its tip in the superior vena cava.Figure 7-153  Acute pulmonary emboli plus methyl-methacrylate embolization in a relatively immobile patient two weeks following vertebroplasty. A, B: Selected cephalocaudal CT images demonstrate typical pulmonary emboli
(arrows ).C: A more cephalad CT image with a very wide window setting shows concomitant methyl- methacrylate emboli ( arrowheads ).D: Another CT image depicts the site of the vertebroplasty.
High-Resolution CT
Technique
The purpose of HRCT is to improve spatial resolution, and thereby assist depiction of small structures (e.g., interlobular septa,bronchial and cyst walls, subtle parenchymal opacification). The two requisite imaging requirements (399) are thin collimation (1 to 1.5 mm), and lung image reconstruction using a high spatial reconstruction algorithm (which is actually used for all of the lung images at our hospital) (Fig. 7-154). The reconstructed lung images should not extend beyond the chest wall. Such images need to be obtained at 1-cm intervals. In selected patients, HRCT lung images may also be obtained in the prone position or during expiration.
Even when the primary clinical indication for a CT examination is to evaluate for diffuse lung disease, this author
P.521 always performs a comprehensive study of the entire thorax as well.
Contrast enhancement is rarely needed for this task. The more standard examination allows assessment of the mediastinum and thoracic wall. Almost all pathologic pulmonary processes will be visible on these images, and their relationship to and separation from adjacent blood vessels and bronchi established, helping avoid confusion between a small vessel or nodule. As previously stressed, volumetric helical MDCT enables thick and thin images to be reconstructed from the same data set, obviating the prior requirement of obtaining specific HRCT images after a standard slice by slice examination. Thus, both focal (nodule) and diffuse
(interstitial) lung disease can be evaluated from a single acquisition.
There has been no significant difference found in the quality of these reconstructed HR images compared with those created by the aforementioned slice-by-slice transaxial techniques (237,238,538).Figure 7-154 Pneumocytitis carinii  pneumonia. A, B:
Conventional and high-resolution CT illustrate the improved spatial resolution of the latter, which more clearly demonstrates the interstitial nature of the infectious process, including areas of ground-glass opacification.
Such detailed images of the lung parenchyma are comparable with gross tissue inspection, allowing detection of disease at an earlier stage than plain chest radiography, and also may better enable characterization of fine parenchymal lesions depicted only as vague opacities on conventional thicker section CT (49,333,400,407,470).
HRCT improves visualization of the fissures and allows depiction of bronchi out to the peripheral quarter of the lung and vessels smaller than 1 mm (379).
In addition, volumetric imaging permits application of some unique reconstruction techniques (494). MIPs and minimum-intensity projections (MINIPs) are 2D views created from the highest or lowest attenuation values within a stack of images (volume of data), respectively. They can be generated in any axis or plane. MIPs can be better than conventional transaxial images in helping identify small pulmonary nodules (1 to 3 mm), and MINIPs may be more effective in demonstrating subtle emphysema or air-trapping.However, both MIPs and MINIPs enhance or suppress areas of low and high attenuation, and if used alone, potentially could mask pathology.
Interpretative Pitfalls
Failure of the patient to suspend respiration during image acquisition can create artifacts such as ground glass–like opacities or pseudobronchiectasis (due to vessel and/or bronchial motion, as previously described). These generally can be recognized by substantial variations in the lung parenchymal attenuation every few images.
A window width that is too narrow or a window level that is too low falsely thickens bronchial walls and also can create false areas of ground-glass opacification by making normal structures too opaque
(250). A window that is too wide may mask diseases characterized by low attenuation (e.g., emphysema). Although there is no accepted standard, a window level between -500 and -700 HU and a window width between 1000 and 2000 HU generally suffices.
Obviously, when comparing different examinations, they should be viewed at the same window level and width.
Prone Versus Supine Positioning
Scans obtained in the supine position may have an area of increased attenuation in the lung adjacent to the posterior chest wall. This gravity-induced density gradient, due mainly to preferential blood flow, and perhaps some dependent atelectasis, can be mistaken for mild interstitial pulmonary disease, which often begins in this region
(4,5). Should the dorsal areas of the lung be the only questioned areas of abnormality, scanning in the prone
P.522 position reverses the distribution gradient and eliminates minor atelectasis, moving it to an anterior location, enabling distinction between gravity related changes and true pulmonary inflammationor fibrosis (Fig. 7-155). A similar phenomenon may occur adjacent to a large spinal osteophyte or bulky callus from an old healed fracture, or even a mediastinal mass (e.g., hiatal hernia). The cause is usually readily apparent, but if needed, prone or decubitus imaging can be done for clarification.
Inspiration Versus Expiration
Inspiratory imaging at total lung capacity maximizes aeration of the lung, and minimizes gravitational density gradients, thus improving the conspicuity of subtle interstitial disease and nodules. Expiratory
HRCT sometimes may accentuate differences between normal and abnormal parenchyma (636). Failure of lung parenchyma to increase in attenuation in expiration indicates air-trapping and can occur in patients with emphysema or small airways disease, such as bronchiolitis obliterans (582). In some patients with mild bronchiolitis obliterans, expiratory scans may be abnormal even if inspiratory HRCT scans are normal.
Reconstruction Algorithms
High spatial frequency algorithms, such as a bone algorithm, rather than traditional soft tissue algorithms that smooth the image data set to minimize noise, are used to enhance tissue interfaces, thus improving image sharpness and fine parenchymal lung detail (506).
As a consequence, these reconstruction algorithms increase the visibility of image noise, which is already increased as a result of fewer photons being captured in the thinner sections. This may detract from the aesthetics of the examination but does not typically impact image interpretation. Increasing the kilovoltage or milliamperage, especially in patients with thick chest walls, may be warranted to decrease image noise.
Quantitative CT
Quantitative CT (QCT) refers to the analysis of CT image data tocalculate lung volumes, based on cross-sectional area, and to study lung morphology by evaluating the tissue density distribution
(6,100,156,292). QCT results vary depending on the method of segmentation and analysis chosen, the use of IV contrast, the type of scanner used, and the threshold attenuation values chosen to analyze (6). If these parameters can be standardized, QCT techniques might provide consistent objective analysis of the imaging data, and have a potential role in the detection and follow- up of diffuse pulmonary diseases that increase (e.g., pneumoconiosis) or decrease lung density (e.g., emphysema).
In normal adults, the attenuation value of the lung varies from approximately -700 to -800 HU; lung densities are somewhat higher in children younger than the age of 10 years (225,524). The attenuation values may be up to 200 HU higher in the posterior dependent portions of the lung because of preferential blood flow received in the supine position, a phenomenon that is accentuated at full expiration (158). Full inspiration has the opposite effect, reducing the gradient as well as causing all attenuation values to become more negative. Although various methods have been devised to measure lung density accurately, major limitations exist in its clinical application.
Subjective (visual) inspection usually suffices to identify abnormal areas in diffuse lung disease, particularly when the process is focal or asymmetrically distributed. Some useful information may be provided by comparing
P.523 the values obtained with a previous study on the same patient under the same circumstances. The use of CT to determine lung density generally is limited to physiologic treatment investigations and as yet has no established clinical role. Techniques, such as sliding thin slab and MIPs and MINIPs, may be useful in detecting micronodular infiltrates and evaluating mild emphysema (50,499,508).Figure 7-155  Dependent atelectasis. A: Supine high-resolution CT shows minimal linear and nodular opacities in posterior basilar segment of the right lower lobe. B:
Repeat high-resolution CT in prone position demonstrates their disappearance.
Patterns and Distribution
Diffuse lung disease encompasses a broad array of disease patterns and etiologies. In general, they can be divided into disease involving primarily the airspace, interstitium, or small airways. Pure interstitial disease is common. Interstitial and airspace disease often coexist; pure patterns of airspace disease are less common than mixed patterns. Differential diagnostic considerations also can be based on the following characteristics: global and regional distribution, lung volumes, chronicity, associated findings such as pleural disease or lymphadenopathy, and clinical symptoms.
Relationships to the Secondary Pulmonary
Lobule
The secondary pulmonary lobule is the primary structural andfunctional unit of the lung, and is the smallest anatomic structure visible on HRCT, appearing as a 1- to 2.5-cm polyhedron with thin, straight walls (47,227). The main supplying artery and respiratory bronchiole is in its center. It is surrounded by the interlobular septa
(0.1 mm thick), which contain the pulmonary veins, lymphatics, and connective tissue, and internally is composed of several (3 to 12) acini supplied by 3 to 5 terminal bronchioles separated by intralobular septa. These septa are only visible on HRCT if thickened, and are best seen peripherally where they are better developed. They correspond to thickened Kerley B lines seen on conventional radiography (Fig. 7-156). Small dots or Y-shaped structures may be seen within the center of the secondary pulmonary lobule representing the respiratory bronchiole and pulmonary arteriole (379).
Lung Volumes
Assessment of the relative lung volumes provides useful information when assessing diffuse lung disease. For example, patients with emphysema usually have increased lung volumes, patients with eosinophilic granulomatosis or lymphangioleiomyomatosis may have normal lung volumes, whereas most interstitial lung disease typically results in reduced lung volumes and a restrictive pattern of pulmonary function. Relative lung volumes can be assessed from the chest radiographs or the combined review of the digital scout image and transaxial CT sections.
Global Distribution
Some interstitial lung diseases have a particular pattern of distribution, which can be a helpful feature in differential diagnosis.
For example, silicosis and cystic fibrosis have predominately upper lung involvement; sarcoidosis often has a midlung involvement; whereas idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis and fibrosis secondary to connective tissue diseases or asbestosis typically have a lower lungand peripheral subpleural distribution.
Bronchovascular Distribution
A few diffuse lung diseases are characterized by a distribution primarily along the bronchovascular bundles. These include lymphangitic carcinoma, Kaposi sarcoma, and sarcoidosis (see Fig.
7-91B; Fig. 7-157) (307,424). HRCT may demonstrate irregular nodular opacities adjacent to the bronchovascular structures.
Figure 7-156  Smooth interlobular septal thickening; interstitial pulmonary edema. A: The walls of the secondary pulmonary lobules are smoothly thickened ( arrowheads ). The small nodular opacity in the center of some lobules ( arrow) represents the terminal arteriole. B: In another patient, smooth septal line thickening is again seen, especially involving the periphery
(Kerley B lines) more caudally ( arrowheads ).Figure 7-157  Bronchovascular distribution; sarcoidosis. A:
High-resolution CT shows myriad ill-defined and conglomerate nodular opacities, mainly distributed somewhat centrally adjacent to the bronchi and pulmonary arteries. A substantial portion of the subpleural lung is spared.
Concomitant mediastinal lymph node enlargement is present. B:
In another patient, more advanced fibrosis has resulted in architectural distortion and honeycombing along the bronchovascular bundles.
P.524
Interstitial Patterns
Interstitial lung disease primarily involves the supporting structures that surround the airspaces, including the bronchovascular bundles, fissures, interlobular and intralobular septa, and thickening of these structures may appear as areas of reticulation (lace-like linear opacities) (663). The thickened septa may result from inflammatory cellular infiltrates or early fibrosis. Often there also is obscuration of normal interfaces, with indistinct separation of bronchi, vessels, and the pleura from the adjacent lung parenchyma (Figs. 7-158 and 7-
159). Irregularity and thickening of the pleura and fissure mayoccur, and the pulmonary vessels and bronchial wall margins may become irregular and shaggy.
Patches of hazy increased attenuation, termed ground-glass opacification , may surround nearby vessels; in contradistinction to airspace consolidation, the vessels and bronchial walls remain visible and are not obscured (silhouetted) (Fig. 7-160). These patchy opacifications generally are seen in the early stages of interstitial disease, and are due to alveolar septal inflammation and sometimes concomitant filling of the actual airspaces with inflammatory cells. The demonstration of such ground-glass opacities suggests an active inflammatory process in the interstitium and/or airspace, but also can be produced by a fine pattern of fibrosis below the spatial resolution of CT.
Septal Thickening
Diffuse lung disease may be manifested primarily by infiltrates/fibrosis involving the lymphatics, veins, and connective tissue of the interlobular septa (see Figs. 7-158 and 7-159) (379).
The resultant septal thickening may be smooth, irregular, or nodular, depending on the etiology and range from a fine network measuring less than 10 mm
P.525 involving the primary lobules, to a larger coarse polyhedral network with elements 15 to 25 mm in diameter surrounding the central vessel within the secondary pulmonary lobule.Figure 7-158  Early interstitial lung disease; nonspecific interstitial pneumonitis. A: High-resolution CT shows peripheral, mainly dorsal, irregular linear and nodular opacities, obscuring the lung interface with the pleura.
B: In another patient with more advanced disease, thin lines
(thickened septa) are seen extending directly to the pleural surface. The walls of some peripheral bronchi are thickened.Figure 7-159  Early interstitial lung disease; asbestosis. High- resolution CT shows bilateral pleural thickening and plaques, with peripheral irregular mild septal thickening and tiny cysts.
Smooth, interlobular septal thickening can result from fluid, most commonly pulmonary edema, or cellular infiltrates (see Fig. 7-156).
Irregular septal thickening, without architectural distortion, sometimes referred to as the beaded septum sign , may be seen with lymphangitic carcinomatosis, sarcoidosis or coal workers pneumoconiosis (Fig. 7-161) (406,409).
Honeycombing, Parenchymal Bands, and
Subpleural Lines
The term honeycombing  refers to coarse interstitial thickening and fibrosis with associated architectural distortion and overdistension of the adjacent lung parenchyma, resulting in the formation of cysticairspaces (Fig. 7-162) (26,634). The cystic spaces vary from a few mm to a few cm, and have clearly defined walls (1 to 3 mm thick).
They usually occur in a subpleural location, sometimes in several layers, unless the disease process in very far advanced.
Honeycombing represents very advanced, irreversible lung fibrosis, most commonly a feature of usual interstitial pneumonia (UIP).
Traction bronchiectasis also may be present (see Fig. 7-91C and D).
The term parenchymal band  refers to an elongated opacity, several millimeters in width and up to 5 cm in length, which extends to the pleura where there may be associated thickening or retraction (26).
The term subpleural lines  refer to thin curvilinear opacities, less than a few millimeters in thickness, which are parallel and usually less than 1 cm from the pleural
P.526 surface (461,661). Both of the latter may result from atelectasis, edema, fibrosis, or interstitial inflammation.
Figure 7-160  Ground-glass opacification; organizing pneumonia. CT shows hazy poorly-definedbilateral opacities without obscuration of the vessels or bronchial walls.
Figure 7-161  Irregular interlobular septal thickening. A:
Lymphangitic carcinomatosis. Multiple nodules are seen along the course of thickened septa. B: Sarcoidosis. Nodules are seen along the course of thickened septa, most notably in medial basal segment of the right lower lobe (compare with Figure 7-
156).Figure 7-162  Advanced interstitial fibrosis with honeycombing and traction bronchiectasis; idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis. High- resolution CT demonstrates extensive thick- walled cystic changes in the lung bases, somewhat worse peripherally, with distortion of lung architecture in many areas.
Dilated, thick walled bronchi are present, especially in the middle lobe.
Airspace Patterns
Airspace disease may be diffuse or focal. In general, airspace processes, such as edema, infection, and hemorrhage, tend to spare the most peripheral regions of the lung, whereas primarily interstitial processes tend to dominate in the outer third or cortex of the lung parenchyma. In its earliest form, small focal areas of airspace disease may appear as ill-defined nodules less than 1 cm in diameter (379). The process frequently is not recognizable on conventional radiography at this time. Typically, in a rapid fashion, these airspace nodules tend to coalesce, resulting in a lobular,subsegmental, lobar, or multilobar disease distribution.
As previously emphasized, the term ground-glass  or, perhaps more appropriately, frosted-glass  opacification refers to an increase in parenchymal attenuation with preservation of bronchial and vascular margins (see Fig. 7-160; Fig. 7-163) (91,397,498). Such HRCT changes may not be evident on conventional CT or on chest radiographs and are the result of partial filling of airspaces by macrophages and histiocytes or other material, or due to partial collapse of alveoli (332,510). As stressed, this pattern also can be observed as a result of septal inflammation, without alveolar filling
(49), or very mild fibrosis. The most common airspace process accounting for a ground-glass appearance is pneumonitis; other causes include pulmonary edema and, rarely, alveolar proteinosis
(171,364,408). The term pulmonary consolidation  refers to homogenous increased parenchymal attenuation that obscures vessels and airway walls (see Figs. 7-53C and 7-60D) (26,332), often producing air bronchograms as on conventional radiography.
Figure 7-163  Ground-glass opacification; pulmonary edema.CT shows focal areas of opacification involving multiple secondary pulmonary lobules, probably due to a combination of partial filling of the airspaces and some interstitial fluid accumulation.
Decreased Lung Attenuation
Cystic Airspaces
The term cystic lung disease  is a broad term used to describe abnormal air-containing spaces within the lung, with thin (1 to 2 mm) definable walls. Etiologies include dilated bronchi, pneumatoceles, cavities, blebs, bullae, and areas of destruction from emphysema (313). Cystic areas may be the result of inflammation, obstruction, necrosis, congenital abnormalities, neoplasm, or lung retraction due to fibrosis (240,379), and can occur in such diseases as histiocytosis X, lymphangioleiomyomatosis, tuberous sclerosis, andPneumocystis carinii  pneumonia (PCP), as well as small airway disease that leads to over distended pulmonary lobules.
Bullae are round, air-containing spaces in the lung that are more than 1 cm in diameter, with a thin wall, and generally represent focal areas of emphysema (26). A cyst is a round parenchymal space with a well-defined wall lined by epithelium or fibrous tissue usually containing air, and may occur in end-stage fibrosis, eosinophilic granuloma, and lymphangioleiomyomatosis (26). In most cases of emphysema, regions of low attenuation are seen in the pulmonary parenchyma without definable walls.
Honeycomb cysts are focal dilated thick-walled airspaces, typically less than 1 cm in diameter (26,399), resulting from interstitial pulmonary fibrosis, due in part to traction on the bronchiolar walls by fibrotic tissue (see Fig. 7-162). They are typically subpleural
(426), and usually decrease in size on expiration, suggesting directcommunication with the airway (18).
P.527
Air Trapping
Air trapping can be the result of fixed or reactive (spasm) small airways disease seen in a variety of diseases, including asthma
(353) and emphysema. It is a characteristic finding in bronchiolitis obliterans; predisposing conditions include infection, graft-versus- host disease, collagen vascular disease, and post–lung transplantation rejection. Air trapping may be evident on conventional inspiratory HRCT when severe, but expiratory scans are more sensitive for demonstrating the more subtle, low-attenuation areas of air trapping from surrounding normal lung (176).
Mosaic Pattern of Lung Attenuation
The terms mosaic perfusion  or mosaic oligemia  results from regional differences in perfusion, in which the abnormal, more lucent, oligemic lung has a diminished number and size of pulmonary vessels compared with surrounding normal lung (26,360). The remainder of the lung either appears normal or slightly increased in attenuation, the latter simulating either ground glass opacification or infiltrates, due to shunting of blood away from the diseased areas. The two basic causes are small vessel disease such as pulmonary vasculitis or chronic thromboembolic disease (see Figs. 7-
132D, 7-134D, and 7-135B), plus small airway disease such as found in cystic fibrosis (see Fig. 7-83), asthma, and bronchiolitis obliterans. With the latter causes, the mosaic oligemia is better seen on HRCT expiration scans, which also permit distinction from small vessel disease (584). As suggested previously, patchy areas of ground-glass attenuation can sometimes be difficult to distinguish from mosaic perfusion. When caused by patchy interstitial infiltrates, such as PCP or eosinophilic pneumonia, the abnormal ground-glass areas of increased attenuation do produce a sort ofmosaic pattern, but the size and number of vessels do not differ between normal and abnormal lung.
Figure 7-164  Centrilobular nodules. High-resolution CT demonstrates myriad peripheral and central ill- defined, tiny nodules, distal to and between the vessels.
The term CT halo sign , originally described in association with invasive pulmonary aspergillosis, refers to a halo of ground-glass attenuation, due to hemorrhage or edema (see Fig. 7-120), surrounding a variety of infectious and noninfectious nodules, including Kaposi sarcoma, candidiasis, tuberculosis, and following transbronchial biopsy (147,306,309,391,466).Pulmonary Nodules
Somewhat ill-defined centrilobular nodular opacities may be seen on
HRCT as a result of peribronchiolar inflammation and mucoid impaction in a variety of diseases involving the terminal bronchioles, including sarcoidosis, tuberculosis and other granulomatous infections, histiocytosis X, hypersensitivity pneumonitis, panbronchiolitis, and graft versus host disease (see
Figs. 7-80, 7-82A, and 7-83; Fig. 7-164) (197,246,407). The term tree-in-bud sign  refers to nodular dilatation of these centrilobular branching structures (Fig. 7-165) (493).
More well-defined peripheral interstitial nodules (1 to 2 mm) can be seen in some of the same disease processes as well as with silicosis and coal worker's pneumoconiosis, pulmonary metastases, and amyloidosis.
P.528
Nodular lesions in close proximity to blood vessels suggest a disseminated hematogenous process, such as metastases or septic emboli (379).
Figure 7-165  Tree-in-bud pattern; lymphoma, graft-versus-hostdisease. High-resolution CT shows branching mucus-filled terminal bronchioles, most prevalent in the peripheral portion of anterior and lateral basal segments of the right lower lobe. Some mildly dilated thick-walled bronchi are also present.
Specific Disease Processes
Pulmonary Edema
Hydrostatic pulmonary edema due to congestive heart failure or volume overload typically should be diagnosed based on the chest radiograph and clinical information. When seen on HRCT, findings include smooth intralobular septal thickening up to 5 mm, peribronchial thickening, dependent ground-glass opacities, pleural effusion, and thickened fissures (see Figs. 7-156 and 7-163)
(49,589). The thickened interlobular septa combined with areas of ground glass opacification may simulate chronic interstitial lung disease. The distribution of the opacities in the perihilar and dependent portions of the lungs, and the smoothly thickened septa strongly favor interstitial edema over true infiltrative lung disease.
If there is doubt, the examination can be repeated after treatment for congestive heart failure.
Adult Respiratory Distress Syndrome
Again, CT does not play a central role in the diagnosis or management of adult respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS), but it may be performed in complex cases with equivocal radiographic findings. In addition to diffuse patchy bilateral areas of consolidation and ground glass opacities, CT may demonstrate focal consolidation representing superimposed infection or pleural fluid collections (109,181). Pneumothoraces and pneumomediastinum arecommon complications, and CT may demonstrate the size and location of these air collections. Patients who recover from this syndrome commonly exhibit residual fibrotic changes, typically in the mid lung zones, especially anteriorly.
Figure 7-166  Usual interstitial pneumonia. High-resolution CT shows heterogeneous, predominantly peripheral septal thickening and honeycombing. Mild traction bronchiectasis is present in medial segment of the middle lobe.
Chronic Interstitial Pneumonias and
Pulmonary Fibrosis
Comprised of a group of pathologic entities, they represent different responses to lung injury, rather than specific diseases. Their classification has been recently updated (15,266,430,651). Each histologic pattern may be idiopathic (cryptogenic), resulting in a related clinical syndrome, or it may be associated with a variety ofpulmonary or systemic diseases.
Usual Interstitial Pneumonia
The term usual interstitial pneumonia  describes a pathologic pattern and is the most common type of chronic interstitial pneumonia, accounting for about 50% of cases (15,241,380,576). Histologic diagnosis requires that tissue be obtained by open lung or thoracoscopic biopsy. In its early stages, inflammation and fibroblastic activity predominate.
P.529
Later, dense fibrosis and honeycombing develop. The disease is characterized by temporal and spatial heterogeneity. The histologic abnormalities are in different stages throughout the lung and the involvement of various areas is nonuniform.
Figure 7-167  Usual interstitial pneumonia, idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis. A,B: Selected cephalocaudal high-resolution CT images demonstrate predominately peripheral (and basilar) septal thickening and honeycombing, with traction bronchiectasis in several areas.Figure 7-168  Usual interstitial pneumonia, scleroderma. Far advanced interstitial fibrosis with honeycombing and traction bronchiectasis. Note the dilated air- and fluid-filled esophagus.
As previously noted, the condition may be idiopathic, or associated with connective tissue/collagen vascular diseases (usually scleroderma or rheumatoid arthritis), drug reactions and chronic hypersensitivity pneumonias, and asbestosis (associated pleural plaques or diffuse pleural thickening may be distinguishing features)
(465). If there is no known etiology (idiopathic), the clinical syndrome is called idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis  or cryptogenic fibrosing alveolitis . About 70% of cases of UIP are caused by idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis. The latter usually occurs in patients age 50 to 70 years, with a male predominance. Most cases occur sporadically, but a familial form exists. Response to steroids is rare, and cytoxic agents are of limited benefit; thus prognosis is poor, with a median survival of 3 years. There is also an increased risk of bronchogenic carcinoma in this disease, typically adenocarcinoma.Because the clinical and plain chest radiograph features of UIP are usually nonspecific, and lung biopsy often not performed, HRCT has assumed an important diagnostic role. Compared with chest radiography, earlier disease is more confidently detected, the disease extent is better estimated, and sometimes disease activity can be predicted (192,404,534,608,640). On such images, in the early phases, reticular opacities due to thickened septa predominate. Perivascular interstitial thickening is common, producing irregular interfaces between the lung and pulmonary vessels. Later, honeycombing, a thick reticular network of irregular fibrosis with architectural distortion surrounding cystic spaces measuring 2 to 20 mm in diameter, commonly associated with traction bronchiectases, occurs in about 80% of patients, and is highly suggestive of UIP (see Figs. 7-91C, 7-91D, and 7-162; Figs.
7-166, 7-167, 7-168) (42,49,402,641). Distribution of disease is most severe in the lower lobes, subpleurally and dorsally. Other regions are spared until later in the pathologic process. Even small focal areas of pulmonary ossification may develop (Fig. 7-169)
(157). Ground glass opacities, which suggest but are not pathognomonic of active parenchymal inflammation (322), are relatively rare, except in the 15% of patients who develop acute exacerbations of the disease process. Mild to moderate mediastinal lymph node enlargement commonly occurs as a consequence of the inflammatory process (39).
Nonspecific Interstitial Pneumonia
Less common than UIP, nonspecific interstitial pneumonia (NSIP) lacks a precise pathologic definition, with findings not qualifying for other group classification (281,350).
P.530
It also is characterized histologically by varying degrees of interstitial inflammation and fibrosis, but in contradistinction to UIP, the histologic pattern is temporally and spatially homogeneous. It has a more benign clinical course and better prognosis than UIP, andcommonly responds to corticosteroid therapy. About 50% of cases are associated with connective tissue/collagen vascular disease, drug reaction, organic dust or other exposure, or a prior acute lung injury.
Figure 7-169  Usual interstitial pneumonia/idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis, with pulmonary ossification. A: Predominately peripheral fibrosis with honeycombing is accompanied by multiple small punctate areas of calcification. B: In another patient.Figure 7-170  Nonspecific interstitial pneumonia. Irregular relatively symmetric basilar reticular infiltrates and some ground-glass opacities are present. Very mild bronchial dilatation is seen, but honeycombing is absent.Figure 7-171  Chronic idiopathic interstitial pneumonia, mixed pattern. High-resolution CT demonstrates features of usual interstitial pneumonia with a heterogeneous distribution, some tiny cystic peripheral areas, and traction bronchiectases in the middle lobe. Ill-defined peripheral ground- glass opacities and lack of architectural distortion are more typical of nonspecific interstitial pneumonia. Histologically, features of both were present, with a final diagnosis of usual interstitial pneumonia assigned.
Irregular symmetric reticulations are accompanied by ground glass opacities in about 80% of patients on HRCT images (see Fig. 7-158;
Fig. 7-170). Honeycombing is minimal (133,219,288). Small poorly defined centrilobular nodules may be seen. As with UIP (Fig. 7-171), the abnormalities are usually basal and subpleural, but less patchy.
Desquamative Interstitial Pneumonia
The pathologic pattern of desquamative interstitial pneumonia ischaracterized by abundant macrophages within the airspaces, minor fibrotic changes, and preservation of lung architecture. This entity is almost always associated with cigarette smoking, but may be related to other inhalational injuries. Prognosis is very good; whether this condition ever progresses to UIP is controversial.
Areas of ground-glass opacification are seen on HRCT images, typically bilateral symmetric, and usually involving the lung bases
(Fig. 7-172) (218). Fibrosis (reticulation/ honeycombing) is limited or absent. Sometimes small cystic lucencies are present due to dilatation of the most distal airways (12,253).
Respiratory Bronchiolitis–Interstitial
Lung Disease
Respiratory bronchiolitis–interstitial lung disease is either closely related to or the same entity as desquamative interstitial pneumonia. Numerous pigmented macrophages are seen mainly in the respiratory bronchioles. Desquamative interstitial pneumonia is stated to exist when more extensive alveolar filling by macrophages is present. This histologic pattern is commonly present as an incidental finding in heavy cigarette smokers.
On HRCT, multifocal patchy subpleural or centrilobular ground-glass opacities, as well as very fine reticulation and micronodules, are seen (Fig. 7-173) (497,502,507). Bronchial wall thickening may be noted. Patchy areas of air trapping may be depicted on expiratory scans.Figure 7-172  Desquamative interstitial pneumonia. Relatively symmetric, basilar areas of ground-glass opacification alternate with some regions of reticulation and a few small cystic areas.Figure 7-173  Respiratory bronchiolitis interstitial lung disease.
A: Tiny ill-defined peripheral centrilobular nodular opacities are present, predominantly in anterior segment of the right upper lobe.B, C: In another patient, cephalocaudal high-resolution CT images demonstrate some ground-glass opacities in addition to tiny peripheral centrilobular nodules.
P.531
Lymphocytic Intersitial Pneumonia
Lymphocytic interstitial pneumonia is a benign lymphoproliferative disorder in which a diffuse interstitial infiltration of mononuclear cells, predominately polyclonal lymphocytes and some plasma cells,occurs (160). It also may be idiopathic, or occur in association with
Sjögren syndrome and/or connective tissue/collagen vascular diseases, and immunodeficient conditions including AIDS. Some cases progress to fibrosis or lymphoma.
On HRCT, bilateral areas of ground glass opacification and poorly defined centrilobular nodules predominate (Fig. 7-174).
Occasionally, perilymphatic nodules are present which may simulate lymphangitic spread of carcinoma. Regions with thin walled cystic spaces, 1 to 30 mm in diameter, are common, probably related to bronchiolar obstruction by the cellular infiltrate and some subsequent fibrosis (254).
Acute Interstitial Pneumonia
Formerly called Hamman-Rich syndrome , acute interstitial pneumonia is a fulminant autoimmune disease with histologic features identical to the acute adult respiratory distress syndrome related to sepsis or shock, with diffuse alveolar damage and some pulmonary fibrosis seen (651). There is alveolar wall edema, inflammation, and fibroblast proliferation, as well as hyaline membranes. The diagnosis is one of exclusion, with all cultures negative and no history of toxin or drug exposure.
Plain chest radiography and HRCT demonstrate diffuse bilateral areas of consolidation and ground-glass opacification, most dominant at the lung bases, quite similar to adult respiratory distress syndrome (Fig. 7-175). Interlobar septal thickening may be seen, and pleural effusions are common (255).Figure 7-174  Lymphocytic interstitial pneumonia. A, B:
Selected cephalocaudal high-resolution CT images demonstrate some focal areas of ground-glass opacity and reticulation in the lingula (straight arrow) and middle lobe
(curved arrow ).
P.532
Organizing Pneumonia
The histologic pattern of organizing pneumonia is characterized by a proliferative bronchiolitis with obliterative polypoid granulation tissue within the lumina of respiratory bronchioles and alveolar ducts, with surrounding patchy areas of organizing pneumonia, mainly composed of mononuclear cells and macrophages
(97,327,403).
The clinical syndrome is known as bronchiolitis obliterans organizing pneumonia  (BOOP) or cryptogenic organizing pneumonia . Most cases are idiopathic, usually occurring between ages 40 to 60 years. But this pattern can occur secondary to prior pulmonary infection or radiation therapy, toxic fume or dust (extrinsic allergic alveolitis) inhalation, drug reactions, chronic graft vs. host disease, and connective tissue/collagen vascular diseases. The prognosis of theidiopathic form is excellent, as it usually responds to corticosteroid therapy.
Figure 7-175  Acute interstitial pneumonia. Bilateral areas of consolidation and ground-glass opacification are present
(predominantly in the lung bases).
HRCT almost always (90%) demonstrates patchy consolidation, and/or ground glass opacities (see Fig. 7-160; Figs. 7-176 and 7-
177) (60%) (58,397,403). Air bronchograms are commonly seen.
This appearance can mimic several other conditions, including mycobacterial infection, sarcoidosis, diffuse bronchoalveolar cell carcinoma or lymphoma, and chronic aspiration (624). A characteristic “atoll sign―  or “reverse halo sign―  has been described, in which a dense peripheral zone of consolidation surrounds a more central region of ground glass opacification (287).
Irregular nodules, both large and small, may be present (13).Distribution
P.533 is typically peribronchial and sometimes subpleural, and most frequently in the lower lobes (614).
Figure 7-176  Organizing pneumonia; drug reaction. Patchy bilateral consolidation and ground-glass opacities are present.Figure 7-177  Organizing pneumonia; cryptogenic. Ill-defined nodular opacities are present bilaterally, several containing air bronchograms. Some focal areas of ground-glass opacification also seen. A calcified left lower lobe nodule and a subcarinal lymph node are compatible with healed granulomatous disease.
Connective Tissue/Collagen Vascular
Diseases
This is a heterogeneous group of immunologically mediated systemic disorders, with relatively frequent pulmonary involvement, especially a chronic interstitial pneumonitis (30), usually a form of
UIP, but occasionally NSIP (137). Complicating esophageal dysfunction in scleroderma may cause recurrent aspiration and secondary infection, and respiratory muscle weakness may lead to atelectases and secondary infection in lupus erythematosus and polymyositis/ dermatomyositis. HRCT may detect pulmonary abnormalities despite normal chest radiographs, sometimes in theabsence of clinical symptoms (503,639).
Rheumatoid Arthritis
Rheumatoid arthritis is the most common of the connective tissue disorders. Intrathoracic disease usually follows the onset of skeletal manifestations, but rarely many precede it. Pleural effusions, which are usually small and unilateral, can occur, and typically are exudative with a low glucose level. The chronic interstitial pneumonitis that may occur in a small percentage of these patients generally has the histologic features of UIP, but progression of disease typically is much slower that with idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis. On occasion, the histology of the interstitial pneumonia fits best with NSIP (633). HRCT can depict these changes of fibrosis, including interlobular septal thickening, honeycombing and traction bronchiectasis, and sometimes ground glass opacities, typically in the subpleural areas of the lower lobes (130,143,400,503,602,663).
As with all of the connective tissue disorders, some of the pulmonary abnormalities may be a complication of concomitant drug therapy. Subpleural nodules and pseudoplaques may occur. Larger pulmonary (necrobiotic) nodules, ranging from 0.5 to 7 cm, are rare; they tend to predominate in the upper lobes and may cavitate.
Lupus Erythematosus
Lupus erythematosus, which most commonly affects young women, is often manifested intrathoracically by pleuritis (pleural effusion) and sometimes an accompanying pericardial effusion (30,272).
Patients with this disorder also can develop interstitial pneumonitis, sometimes quite acute (lupus pneumonitis) (126,283,320). Diffuse alveolar hemorrhage and the antiphospholipid antibody syndrome are two other rare life-threatening complications.
Scleroderma
Scleroderma, an inflammatory/fibrotic disorder of the skin andinternal organs, also is more common in women. Pulmonary involvement is seen in the majority of patients with systemic involvement on HRCT, much more frequently than the other connective tissue diseases. Again, most of the manifestations are similar to UIP (see Fig. 7-168) or NSIP (108). Esophageal dilatation is present in the majority of patients, predisposing to aspiration.
Reactive mediastinal lymphadenopathy also may occur.
Sjögren Syndrome
Sjögren syndrome, manifested by dry eyes and mouth and polyarthritis, is most frequent in middle-aged women. Fifty percent of cases are associated with one of the other connective tissue disorders. The pulmonary manifestations most commonly are in the form of lymphocytic interstitial pneumonia.
Polymyositis/Dermatomyositis
Polymyositis/dermatomyositis are similar disorders with disparate predominance in the involvement of the muscle and skin, and typically affects young and middle aged women (10). Again, pulmonary manifestations generally are in the form of UIP or NSIP.
Aspiration pneumonia is a common complication due to muscle weakness.
Ankylosing Spondylitis
Ankylosing spondylitis, which usually affects young men 20 to 40 years of age, may produce radiologic changes that simulate tuberculosis, including apical fibrocavitary changes and cyst formation (125).
Drug-Induced Lung Disease
Many drugs can result in a variety of lung injuries and diseases, including interstitial pneumonitis, pulmonary edema,hypersensitivity pneumonitis, eosinophilic pneumonia, diffuse alveolar damage, and a BOOP-like reaction (see Fig. 7-176)
(115,314,525). HRCT is more sensitive than radiography in detecting these changes (35), and may
P.534 allow discontinuation of the drug before substantial fibrosis occurs.
Interstitial pneumonitis and fibrosis are typically associated with the chemotherapy agents, such as bleomycin and methotrexate, as well as other drugs, including amiodarone and nitrofurantoin. The CT findings are quite similar to UIP, or sometimes desquamative interstitial pneumonia, but the abnormalities generally are bilateral and symmetric.
Amiodarone, used to treat refractory arrhythmias, accumulates in both the liver and lung (mainly macrophages and type II pneumocytes), and can cause progressive pneumonitis (513).
Pulmonary toxicity occurs in about 5% of patients, usually after several months of therapy, especially with doses greater than 400
µg/day. The findings on HRCT may precede the onset of clinical symptoms. They generally are nonspecific, consisting of peripheral, basilar ground glass opacities, septal thickening and fibrosis (Fig. 7-
178). Sometimes, areas of consolidation near the pleura are noted with high attenuation values (80 to 170 HU) (74,315,358).
Increased attenuation of the liver due to iodine deposition is characteristic of amiodarone exposure. Pulmonary calcification also can cause high attenuation of the pulmonary parenchyma (Fig. 7-
179).
Sarcoidosis
Sarcoidosis is a systemic disease of unknown etiology characterized by noncaseating granulomas. It generally occurs between the ages of 20 to 40 years, and is more common in women and African-
Americans (303). Thoracic involvement occurs in about 90% of patients with the disease, with mediastinal lymphadenopathy itsmost frequent manifestation. It may be categorized in stages at presentation: stage I, mediastinal/hilar lymphadenopathy; stage II, lymphadenopathy plus parenchymal infiltrates; stage III, parenchymal infiltrates only (presumably due to resolution of lymphadenopathy); stage IV, fibrosis and cystic lung changes.
CT is more sensitive than chest radiography in depicting the lymphadenopathy and its extent, and in the detection of parenchymal lung disease (60,207,398). On HRCT, small (2 to 3 mm) nodules many be seen in the parenchyma, sometimes accompanied by slightly larger, typically irregular, nodules along the pleura and fissures (Fig. 7-180).
P.535
Even larger conglomerate nodules may occur sometimes surrounded by smaller satellite nodules (Fig. 7-181) (427). Nodular thickening of the central bronchial walls and perivascular interstitium may be present and correlates well with a high success rate of a diagnostic transbronchial biopsy (see Fig. 7-91B; Fig. 7-182). Endobronchial granulomata may rarely result in substantial airway narrowing and distal collapse. Similarly, involvement
P.536 of small bronchioles may cause air trapping. Occasionally, pulmonary sarcoidosis may be manifested as confluent areas of consolidation plus some focal ground glass opacities (Fig. 7-183), a condition sometimes termed alveolar sarcoid  (although the disease remains histologically interstitial); this appearance can also be seen in other entities such as BOOP, bronchoalveolar carcinoma, and lymphoma. Pulmonary involvement may be symmetric or asymmetric; the mid- and upper lung zones are most commonly involved, especially along the central bronchovascular bundles (see
Fig. 7-157), and the lung
P.537 periphery may be spared. In late stage disease, severe fibrosis results in marked architectural distortion, traction bronchiectases, and fibrocavitary changes (large cystic airspaces). In all stages,hypoattenuating nodules may be seen in the spleen and liver on IV contrast–enhanced scans, and upper abdominal lymphadenopathy may be present.
Figure 7-178  Amiodarone lung effects. A: High-resolution CT demonstrates course peripheral interstitial thickening and architectural distortion with small cystic areas, typical of fibrosis. B: Increased liver attenuation due to iodine deposition is seen. C: In another patient, noncontrast CT demonstrates high attenuation values in the atelectatic lower lobes ( arrowheads ).
Bilateral pleural effusions are present.Figure 7-179  Pulmonary calcification. A: Very high attenuation is seen in the middle lobe and posterior basal segment of the right lower lobe in this patient with chronic renal failure. B:
Bone scintigraphy shows increased uptake in the middle lobe. C:
In another patient with chronic renal failure, a noncontrast CT demonstrates dystrophic calcification in the lung apices.Figure 7-180  Sarcoidosis. A, B: Selected cephalocaudal high- resolution CT images demonstrate multiple small pulmonary nodules, slightly larger along the pleura.
Figure 7-181  Sarcoidosis. Relatively large peripheral conglomerate pulmonary nodules are surrounded by smallernodules. Concomitant right paratracheal lymph node enlargement is present.
Figure 7-182  Sarcoidosis. A predominantly central bronchovascular distribution of nodulation ( arrow) is present, with a few ill-defined peripheral nodules.Figure 7-183  Sarcoidosis, “alveolar―  form. A, B: Selected cephalocaudal CT images demonstrate focal areas of consolidation, with air bronchograms in the right upper lobe. Concomitant right paratracheal lymph node enlargement is present. C, D: In another patient, irregular areas of consolidation, with air bronchograms, are present.Figure 7-184  Simple silicosis. High-resolution CT through lung apex demonstrates small diffuse pulmonary nodules that are coalescing and becoming confluent on the right side.
Occupational Lung Disease
(Pneumoconiosis)
CT, especially HRCT, in comparison with plain chest radiography, not only greatly increases the sensitivity but also substantially reduces the known marked interobserver variations in interpretation when assessing the lung parenchyma in patients suspected of having occupational lung disease (11,33,285,375,505).
Silicosis
Silicosis results from inhalation of silicon dioxide dust and tends to progress even when exposure is stopped. The radiologic appearance in its early forms may be indistinguishable from that of the more benign coal worker's pneumoconiosis, although the two conditions may concomitantly exist (375,495,505). Simple silicosis  refers to the presence of multiple discrete pulmonary nodules, which are lessthan 1 cm in diameter, typically 3 to 7 mm, with an upper lobe predominance and slightly higher concentration posteriorly (Fig. 7-
184) (32,45,285). Subpleural nodules also may be seen (Fig. 7-
185). These nodules may calcify, and also may be associated with calcification (sometimes eggshell) of mediastinal lymph nodes. The nodules can increase in size and number as the disease advances, eventually becoming confluent, with associated distortion and contraction of the adjacent lung parenchyma.
Complicated silicosis, also called progressive massive fibrosis , refers to the formation of larger, generally greater than 2 cm, irregularly marginated, nodular opacities termed conglomerate masses , through coalescence of the smaller silicotic nodules (Fig. 7-186). The masses are usually relatively symmetric and located in the upper lobes. The associated fibrosis results in upper lobe volume loss and paracicatricial emphysema, accompanied by progressive functional impairment. Other than this paracicatricial pattern, the pulmonary emphysema in patients exposed to silica dust is usually a consequence of cigarette smoking rather than a primary manifestation of pneumoconiosis (33).
Massive inhalation of silica dust, generally over a period of 6 to 9 months, can cause an “acute―  form of disease termed silicoproteinosis . The large amounts of silica particles so irritate the alveolar lining cells that abundant intralveolar proteinaceous material is produced, similar to alveolar proteinosis, with a similar radiologic appearance. Sandblasting is the most common occupation involved, with the patients not having used protective masks. Also in silicosis, due to impaired macrophage function, superimposed tuberculosis may develop.Figure 7-185  Simple silicosis. A: High-resolution CT shows small nodules in both apices, with some larger subpleural nodules also present. Concomitant mild centrilobular and paraseptal emphysema is present. B: High- resolution CT in the brother of patient in
Figure 7-185A (they work together as self-employed sandblasters) demonstrates very similar findings.Figure 7-186  Complicated silicosis. A, B: Lung and mediastinal window setting CT images demonstrate a conglomerate partially calcified mass in the left upper lobe, with some lesser coalescence of nodules in the right upper lobe.
Surrounding fibrosis and subpleural nodules are present, as are some enlarged partially calcified mediastinal lymph nodes. C: In another patient, an extensively calcified conglomerate mass is present in each upper lobe, plus multiple calcified mediastinal lymph nodes.
P.538
Asbestosis
There are two main groups of asbestos fibers: amphiboles (stiff and straight) and serpentines (curly and flexible) (71,517). Crocidolite, an amphibole fiber, provokes the strongest inflammatory responseand greatest association with subsequent development of bronchogenic carcinoma and mesothelioma. Chrysotile, a serpentine fiber, accounts for most of the asbestos used in North America, and has a high association with pleural plaques. Another amphibole, tremolite, may contaminate chrysotile fibers and account for the increased risk of neoplasm in patients exposed to asbestos.
The term asbestos-related pleural disease  designates pleural plaques or thickening that serve as a marker of asbestos exposure but unless very extensive usually do not impair pulmonary function. The term asbestosis  specifically refers to asbestos-induced interstitial pulmonary fibrosis, which generally should be the main determinant of compensation in cases of disability. Magnesium silicate from the inhaled fibers elicits a cellular inflammatory response with subsequent fibrosis, in a pattern quite similar to UIP. There is a definite dose-related effect in the development of asbestosis. CT, particularly HRCT, is significantly more sensitive and specific than chest radiography in detecting asbestosis (4,5,141,265,511,574).
As with UIP, asbestosis initially and predominately involves the subpleural dorsal parenchyma of both lower lobes, probably corresponding to the greatest distribution of the inhaled fiber (95).
At first, asbestosis is patchy, with the fibrotic process then advancing in a more centrifugal fashion to involve adjacent lung
(461,572). HRCT may demonstrate inter- and intralobular septal thickening and some tiny nodular opacities in the subpleural lung
(Figs. 7-159; Fig. 7-187) (4,5,14,49). Because simple dependent atelectases and gravity dependent blood flow secondary to less than full inspiration may mimic these early changes, repeat scanning in the prone position is valuable for confirmation that the changes represent fixed structural abnormalities. Later, parenchymal bands, nontapering linear opacities 2 to 5 cm in length, may develop.
Subpleural ground glass opacities may occasionally be seen (14).
With advanced disease, honeycombing becomes apparent. All of these changes are initially seen in a subpleural location (as in idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis), typically in the dorsal and caudallung, and later may extend more centrally (461,572).
Asbestos-related pleural disease is almost always present in patients with parenchymal disease, although the absence of plaques does not exclude the diagnosis of asbestosis (149,348). As emphasized previously, the HRCT
P.539 findings of interstitial infiltrates and fibrosis (UIP pattern) can occur as a result of a variety of lung diseases and therefore even when found in association with pleural plaques do not absolutely indicate asbestosis (40). Whereas the definitive diagnosis of asbestosis may require an open lung biopsy, because there is no accepted treatment, the diagnosis is usually based on a combination of clinical, physiologic, and radiologic information (149,348).
Figure 7-187  Asbestosis. A, B: Selected cephalocaudal high- resolution CT images demonstrate peripheral fibrotic changes, a subpleural band in the right upper lobe periphery, and honeycombing, most severe at the right lung base. Calcified pleural plaques and thickening are present dorsally in each hemithorax. A transvenous pacemaker is noted.Other Pneumoconiosis
Arc welders may inhale fine iron oxide particles, producing diffusely distributed, ill-defined, centrilobular micronodules that may resolve after exposure ceases (Fig. 7-188) (9). Exposure to graphite dust produces radiologic and pathologic changes similar to coal worker's pneumoconioses and silicosis, with centrilobular nodules in a subpleural location, interlobular septal thickening, and sometimes conglomerate masses (9,10). Inhalation of aluminum dust may be associated with a reticular nodular pattern, most commonly dominant in the upper lung zones (9).
Wegener Granulomatosis
Wegener granulomatosis is a necrotizing systemic vasculitis characterized by granulomatous involvement of small and medium- sized pulmonary arteries and veins (310). The lungs and tracheobronchial tree are commonly involved, and most patients have an associated necrotizing glomerulonephritis, although manifestations may be limited to the former. Peripheral, variable sized, usually irregular, pulmonary nodules, frequently with shaggy internal cavitation are the most common pulmonary manifestation
(Fig. 7-189) (3,139). Pathologic examination demonstrates central necrosis and granulomatous reaction; adjacent vessels may be thrombosed, with ischemia accounting
P.540 for the cavitation. On CT, feeding vessels may be seen leading to the nodules, and the CT halo sign also may occur in this condition.
Concomitant focal or diffuse pulmonary hemorrhage may appear as consolidation. Tracheal, especially in the subglottic region, or bronchial stenosis can occur (see Fig. 7-7) (359). Antineutrophilic cytoplasmic antibodies, especially the C-form (cytoplasmic staining pattern) versus the P-form (perinuclear staining pattern), are present in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid in most patients.Figure 7-188  Siderosis. A, B: Selected cephalocaudal high- resolution CT images demonstrate multiple small nodular opacities scattered throughout both lungs, including the subpleural areas. Some concomitant centrilobular and paraseptal pulmonary emphysema is present.
Figure 7-189  Wegener granulomatosis. A thick-walled cavitary mass with an irregular inner margin is present in anteriorsegment of the left upper lobe.
Lymphomatoid Granulomatosis
Lymphomatoid granulomatosis is a related angiodestructive granulomatous disease, with a predilection for involvement of the lungs and skin. Radiologic findings usually are similar to those in
Wegener granulomatosis, with bilateral, often poorly defined lung nodules, ranging from 1 to 6 cm in diameter, with frequent cavitation, distributed along the bronchovascular bundles present
(323).
Lymphangioleiomyomatosis and Tuberous
Sclerosis
Lymphangioleiomyomatosis is a multisystem disease that primarily affects women of reproductive age and is probably hormone-related.
The disease is characterized histologically by somewhat immature- appearing smooth muscle proliferation and collagen deposition. This may occur in the pulmonary parenchyma, mainly in the terminal bronchioles and adjacent to lymphatic vessels in the interstitium.
The former results in obstruction of these bronchioles and air trapping and the formation of thin-walled pulmonary cysts, which can ultimately produce a pneumothorax; the latter obstructs lymphatics and can cause a chylothorax. Similar spindle cell proliferation also can involve the mediastinal and extrathoracic lymph nodes, which may contribute to the lymphatic obstruction.
HRCT shows diffuse distribution of numerous, well-defined, thin- walled lung cysts, usually 2 mm to 5 cm in diameter, interspersed among normal lung parenchyma (Fig. 7-190) (293,445). The cysts tend to differ in appearance from the somewhat irregular ones in histiocytosis X (as described in later in text). Septal thickening may result from lymphatic engorgement. A pneumothorax or pleuraleffusion (chylothorax) also may be present. Mediastinal or retrocrural lymph node enlargement can occur. The lung volumes are typically normal but in advanced disease may be hyperinflated. The thoracic involvement in tuberous sclerosis, again almost always in young women, is indistinguishable both pathologically and radiologically from lymphangioleiomyomatosis (633), and renal angiomyolipomas are common in the former.
Histiocytosis X (Langerhans Cell
Histiocytosis or Eosinophilic Granuloma)
Histiocytosis X is a systemic disease that may affect primarily the lungs; almost all with lung disease are 20 to 40 year old and
“heavy―  cigarette smokers. Histologically, granulomas containing large numbers of Langerhans cells
P.541 and eosinophils form in the peribronchiolar interstitial tissues and alveolar septa, leading ultimately to fibrosis, nodulation and the formation of lung cysts (604,621).
Figure 7-190  Lymphangioleiomyomatosis. A, B: Selected cephalocaudal high-resolution CT images demonstrate innumerable pulmonary cysts, with definable walls,throughout both lungs.
Figure 7-191  Histiocytosis X. A: High-resolution CT demonstrates multiple thin-walled cysts, many irregular in configuration, in both upper lobes. B: In another patient, multiple irregular thin-walled cysts again are present
(compare with consistently round cysts in Figure 7-190).
On HRCT, cystic lung spaces, with distinct walls, are typically seen, generally less than 10 mm in diameter (2,389,559). The cysts often are somewhat round, but can be irregular, including a branching appearance (Fig. 7-191). Most patients have concomitant small peribronchial nodules, usually less than 5 mm in diameter. The margins of these nodules typically are irregular, particularly if there are surrounding cystic changes. Commonly these nodules demonstrate cavitation (see Fig. 7-85); such nodules may evolve into the aforementioned cysts (2,62). In most patients the intervening lung is normal, but in some patients there is a surrounding fine reticular pattern or areas of centrilobular emphysema (61). Bronchogenic carcinoma may develop in these patients (Fig. 7-192) (604). The disease often has a diffusedistribution in the upper and mid-lung zones with relative sparing of the lung bases.
Figure 7-192  Bronchogenic carcinoma complicating
Histiocytosis X. CT demonstrates a spiculated mass in anterior segment of the right upper lobe, with surrounding small thin-walled cystic areas. Concomitant centrilobular emphysema is present in the posterior segment.
Hypersensitivity Pneumonitis (Extrinsic
Allergic Alveolitis)
Hypersensitivity Pneumonitis is an immunologically mediated response to inhaled organic dust antigens that may be occupationally linked (8,354). Numerous causes exist, with farmer'slung (thermophilic actinomyces that grow in moist hay) and bird fancier's lung (avian proteins in feces and feathers) two commonly recognized types. The disease is characterized histologically by a mononuclear cell infiltrate, cellular bronchiolitis, and non- necrotizing epithelioid granulomas. The pathologic, and consequently radiologic, patterns are similar in the various antigenic etiologies. It is not uncommon, despite proper clinical questioning, that a history of exposure to an offending antigen is not elicited.
Hypersensitivity pneumonitis is often classified into acute, subacute and chronic forms. On HRCT in the acute form, occurring after intense exposure, some airspace consolidation resembling pulmonary edema (Fig. 7-193) and small, 1 to 3 mm, ill-defined centrilobular nodules may be seen (70). In the subacute phase (weeks to months after the first exposure), when most patients are actually imaged, patchy ground-glass opacities generally are seen intermingled with poorly defined centrilobular nodules predominating in the mid and lower lung zones, a pattern reminiscent of desquamative interstitial pneumonia or BOOP. Areas of decreased lung attenuation (mosaic pattern) can occur due to this small airways disease, and air trapping
P.542 may be demonstrated on expiratory CT scans (446). This combination of mosaic attenuation and focal ground-glass opacities
(Fig. 7-194) has been characterized as the “head cheese sign―
(83). The chronic phase manifested by fibrosis tends to show a diffuse peripheral reticulation and septal thickening, sometimes with honeycombing, with a mid-lung predominance and relative sparing of the lung bases, quite different than the pattern of UIP or NSIP
(8,70,352). Indistinct centrilobular nodular opacities and mosaic attenuation may persist.Figure 7-193  Acute hypersensitivity pneumonia. CT demonstrates multiple areas of ground-glass opacification in both lungs, with some mosaic oligemia in the left lower lobe. An allergic reaction to Aspergillus  within a marijuana cigarette was determined to be the cause.
Eosinophilic Lung Disease
A spectrum comprised of various conditions characterized histologically by the accumulation of eosinophils in the distal airspaces and adjacent interstitial tissue. A specific cause, such as drugs or a parasitic or fungal infection, may be identified.Figure 7-194  Subacute hypersensitivity pneumonia. CT demonstrates multiple areas of ground-glass opacification in both lungs, with interposed areas of mosaic oligemia. An allergic reaction to parakeets was determined to be the cause.
Figure 7-195  Acute eosinophilic pneumonia. Nonsegmentalareas of pulmonary consolidation and ground-glass opacities are present, mainly in the periphery of both mid lung zones.
In idiopathic acute pulmonary eosinophilia (also called Loeffler syndrome ), nonsegmental areas of pulmonary consolidation and ground glass opacities, typically involving the upper and mid lung zones and often transient and migratory, can occur (Fig. 7-195).
Centrilobular nodules may be present in the regions of ground glass opacity (252). There usually is concomitant blood eosinophilia.
In idiopathic chronic pulmonary eosinophilia, again blood eosinophilia usually is present. Histocytes usually accompany the accumulation of eosinophils in the distal airspaces and interstitium, and mild fibrosis may be present. This disorder may represent a hypersensitivity reaction. Peripheral airspace consolidation, sometimes simulating a photographic negative of pulmonary edema radiographically may be present. On HRCT, consolidation and ground glass opacities, predominately or exclusively involving the subpleural lung regions are seen (Fig. 7-196). The latter distribution may not be evident on plain chest radiography. (252,361).
Pulmonary Alveolar Proteinosis
Pulmonary alveolar proteinosis is a disorder related to improper clearance of surfactant, which is an antiatelectases agent.
Surfactant phospholipids and proteins accumulate in the distal alveolar spaces, interfering with gas exchange; this material typically stains positive with periodic acid-Schiff. Superinfection of the material can occur, most frequently with nocardia. Treatment is usually via bronchopulmonary lavage, in an endeavor to remove the abnormal surfactant products and improve oxygenation. The condition usually is idiopathic in etiology, but as previously noted may be secondary to large volumes of inhaled irritant inorganic dusts such as silica or chemicals.On HRCT, patchy areas of consolidation and ground glass opacification are seen, sometimes accompanied by ill-defined nodular opacities (236,324). Concomitant
P.543 smooth interlobular septal thickening, in combination with the ground glass opacities, produces a polygonal pattern referred to as
“crazy-paving―  (Fig. 7-197) (251). However, the latter appearance is not specific and can be seen in other conditions, such as bronchoalveolar cell carcinoma and lipoid pneumonia (Fig. 7-
198).
Figure 7-196  Chronic eosinophilic pneumonia. A, B: Selected cephalocaudal CT images demonstrate nonsegmental consolidation with air bronchograms, mainly peripheral in both upper and mid lung zones. Note an almost ovoid anteroposterior distribution.Figure 7-197  Pulmonary alveolar proteinosis. Areas of consolidation and ground-glass opacification with preservation of vessel margins, are present, in a pattern referred to as
“crazy-paving.―
Lymphangitic Carcinoma
In most cases of lymphangitic carcinomatosis, initially the neoplastic disease spreads hematogenously to the lungs, then secondarily penetrates lymphatic vessels and the interstitium, which become thickened by tumor cells, fibrous tissue, and edema (244,579). Local interstitial (“lymphangitic― ) spread also can occur adjacent to a primary carcinoma (Fig. 7-199). CT findings include uneven thickening of bronchovascular bundles and thickening of the interstitial septa, often in a polygonal fashion (see Fig. 7-161A, Fig.
7-200) (406). As the diseases progresses, a more nodular appearance may be seen superimposed on this reticular pattern, resulting in a characteristic appearance of small nodules connected to thickened lines, or a “beaded chain―  appearance (379). The overall lung architecture is preserved, and honeycombing is not produced. Both the central and peripheral lung may be involved, andthere is often associated hilar and mediastinal lymphadenopathy and/or pleural effusion. Pulmonary lymphangitic spread is most frequently seen secondary to metastatic adenocarcinomas of the breast, lung, stomach, colon, and pancreas.
Figure 7-198  “Crazy-paving―  pattern. A: Due to lipoid pneumonia. B: Due to Wegener granulomatosis with some pulmonary hemorrhage.
Figure 7-199  Local lymphangitic carcinomatosis. Small linear and nodular opacities are present in the left lower lobe peripherally, adjacent to a more central large bronchogenic carcinoma.
P.544
Pulmonary Emphysema
Pulmonary emphysema is defined pathologically as a chronic condition characterized by progressive irreversible enlargement of airspaces distal to the terminal bronchiole with destruction of the alveolar walls and no obvious fibrosis (609). This results in loss of lung elastic recoil, causing airflow obstruction, hyperinflation, and gas trapping. Blebs and bullae are frequently seen in association with emphysema, but may be seen as a localized process in otherwise normal lungs. A bleb is an air collection within the layers of the visceral pleura, whereas a bulla is an intrapulmonary emphysematous space larger than 1 cm in diameter.
Although the conventional chest radiograph demonstrates relatively advanced emphysema, it usually is insensitive in detecting mild or even moderate emphysema, particularly in the absence of secondary signs of air trapping and hyperinflation. CT, especially high- resolution techniques, permits direct identification of destroyed lung tissue with high precision and is more sensitive than conventional radiography in detecting emphysema (44,135). The CT features of emphysema include areas of decreased attenuation without visible walls, pruning of pulmonary vessels, pulmonary vessel distortion, and decreased lung density gradients (44,49,135,581,628). The lack of visible walls generally permits easy distinction from other cystic lung diseases, such as lymphangioleiomyomatosis and histiocytosis
X. Numerous studies have demonstrated an excellent correlation between the CT assessment of emphysema morphology and direct pathologic examination (43,134). Also, there is a strong relationshipbetween the severity of emphysema depicted on CT and various measures of pulmonary function, including reduced carbon monoxide diffusing capacity and airflow obstruction (forced expiratory volume in one second [FEV 1] and forced vital capacity [FVC]). HRCT can reliably depict even mild emphysema that escapes detection by pulmonary function testing (43,49), with images obtained during expiration showing the areas of emphysema and air trapping to even greater advantage against a background of higher attenuation and less diseased lung (43,44,158,201).
Types of Emphysema
There are four basic anatomic types of emphysema, including those with a genetic basis as well as those related to cigarette smoking: centrilobular, panlobular, paraseptal, and paracicatricial. It is not uncommon for multiple types to coexist (44,135) and for emphysema to be seen in combination with other pulmonary disease. These latter cases can present some confusion due to a mixed restrictive and obstructive pattern on pulmonary function testing and normal lung volumes on chest x-ray.
Centrilobular Emphysema
Centrilobular emphysema, also referred to as centriacinar or proximal acinar emphysema , is found predominantly in cigarette smokers and is the most common form (134). The association with cigarette smoking is presumably due to enzymatic destruction of lung as a result of an imbalance between lung proteases and antiproteases. It involves the progressive destruction of lung parenchyma around dilated proximal respiratory bronchioles
(44,201). Lucent regions initially are surrounded by normal lung parenchyma but become confluent, along with obliteration of the peripheral pulmonary vasculature, as the disease progresses (Figs.
7-201 and 7-202) (44,134). These focal areas of low attenuation seen in centrilobular emphysema typically do not come in contactwith the pleura, as opposed to the emphysematous spaces seen in paraseptal emphysema, which do make contact with the visceral pleura (49). Centrilobular emphysema affects primarily the apical and posterior segments of the upper lobes and the superior segments of
P.545 the lower lobes, but can occasionally present with diffuse or lower lobe predominance (134). When these changes become very far advanced, the areas of destruction become confluent and the centrilobular distribution may no longer be apparent.
Figure 7-200  Lymphangitic carcinomatosis. Tiny nodular metastases are seen scattered throughout both lungs, with thickened interlobular septa present mainly in the anterior segments of both upper lobes.Figure 7-201  Centrilobular emphysema. A, B: Selected cephalocaudal spiral CT 5-mm reconstructed images demonstrate large irregular areas of lucency, without any definable walls, with a paucity of pulmonary vessels, most notably anteriorly in the right upper lobe. C, D: Same selected levels with 1-mm high-resolution reconstructed images show changes more definitively.
Panlobular Emphysema
Panlobular emphysema, also referred to as panacinar or diffuse emphysema , affects the entire secondary pulmonary lobule, producing diffuse destruction and enlarged airspaces throughout thelung. It is seen in α 1-antitrypsin deficiency as a result of proteolytic digestion of lung parenchyma. There is a lower lobe predominance in most cases, presumably due to the greater blood flow in this region (see Figs. 7-4A, 7-4C, 7-185A; Fig. 7-203) (134).
IV abuse of methylphenidate hydrochloride (Ritalin,
CibaGeneva, Summit, NJ) or methadone also is associated with basilar predominant panlobular emphysema, indistinguishable from that seen with α 1-antitrypsin deficiency (537,583). On CT, widespread areas of low attenuation usually are seen, accompanied by diffuse vascular distortion. The lower lobe distribution may be more obvious on CT than on plain chest radiographs. Despite its severity, panlobular emphysema may not be as strikingly abnormal as in the centrilobular form because of the diffuse involvement and lack of surrounding distinguishing normal parenchyma.
Paraseptal Emphysema
Paraseptal emphysema, also referred to as distal acinar or localized emphysema , involves the distal portion of the lobule. Local destruction and airspace enlargement are confined to relatively few peripheral sites, characteristically adjacent to the visceral pleura and interlobular septa, within otherwise normal lung. These subpleural lucencies on occasion may have very thin walls discernible (see Fig. 7-202). When these paraseptal cysts exceed 1 cm in size, with an exceedingly thin wall, they may be termed bullae. Paraseptal emphysema may be seen in association with centrilobular or panlobular emphysema, or as an isolated phenomenon (476). The bullae predispose to pneumothorax
P.546 and can reach a very large size. Some patients present with classic apical bullae, amenable to a conventional bullectomy; the term vanishing lung  has been used to describe patients with dyspnea and these radiographic features. Large bullae can compress adjacent more compliant lung, producing atelectatic pseudomasses (Fig. 7-
204).Figure 7-202  Centrilobular and paraseptal emphysema.
CT shows marked irregular areas of lucency in the right apex, without definable walls, and pruning of the vessels in this area, due to centrilobular emphysema. Ovoid lucencies with some defined walls, due to paraseptal emphysema, are seen just lateral to the top of the aortic arch
(A).
Paracicatricial Emphysema
Paracicatricial emphysema, also referred to as irregular or scar emphysema , refers to airspace enlargement and lung destruction that occurs as a result of adjacent pulmonary fibrosis (134). There is no consistent relationship to any part of the acinus or secondary pulmonary lobule. Causes include inflammatory lung disease and infectious granulomatous disease, such as tuberculosis, and other causes of fibrosis, such as silicosis. There is often associated traction bronchiectasis and honeycomb lung.
Lung Volume Reduction SurgeryThe introduction of surgical treatment options necessitates relatively precise quantification and localization of the disease (148). CT provides helpful information regarding the severity and distribution of emphysema in candidates for traditional bullectomy or lung volume reduction surgery (44,132,390) and may disclose unsuspected concomitant conditions such as advanced coronary artery disease, bronchiectasis, or an occult bronchogenic carcinoma not detected on the plain chest radiograph (567).
Lung volume reduction surgery is a therapeutic option for some patients with severe debilitating emphysema (567). The procedure consists generally of bilateral nonsegmental wedge resections of the most severely emphysematous lung, to reduce total lung volume by
20% to 30%, usually via median sternotomy, but sometimes thoracotomy or video-assisted thoracoscopic surgery. In properly selected patients, improvement in lung function and quality of life occurs in most, and usually is maintained for at least 2 years (662).
Although there are important clinical criteria to consider, the anatomic features of the emphysematous distribution are a critical determinant of the success of the surgery (242,271). Upper lobe predominate emphysema, with a substantial regional heterogeneity, typically large areas of normal or mildly emphysematous lower lobes, is the strongest correlate with a positive outcome. QCT indexes can be created to assess these possible regional differences
(161,270). The main advantage of computer-assisted quantification is that it is objective and the technique can be reproduced amongst interpreters of varying experience and expertise. Subjective grading sometimes results in overestimation of the extent and severity of emphysema, and
P.547 clearly more interobserver differences (29). Multidetector HRCT in full inspiration is used exclusively for documenting morphologic emphysematous destruction. Although no accepted standard exists, values lower than -950 HU can serve as a threshold. As previouslyemphasized with QCT techniques, potential sources of error exist
(587).
Figure 7-203  Panlobular emphysema; alpha 1 antitrypsin deficiency. A, B: High-resolution CT images through the lung apices and bases demonstrate lower lobe predominate emphysema.
Figure 7-204  Atelectatic pseudomass. CT demonstrates a right paraspinal mass ( arrow) with central air bronchograms. A very large bulla almost completely fills the right hemithorax. The mass represented collapsed normal lung that re-expanded following resection of the bulla.
Figure 7-205  Constrictive (obliterative) bronchiolitis. A, B:
Selected cephalocaudal high-resolution CT images demonstrate multiple patchy geographic areas of decreased attenuation (mosaic oligemia). Marked hyperinflation is present and the peripheral vessels are attenuated. C: In another patient with the Swyer-James syndrome, CT shows hyperinflation and pruning of the vessels in the left lower lobe with a small associated cyst. A pectusexcavatum deformity is present.
Small Airway Disease
Bronchiolitis
Bronchiolitis comprises a spectrum of diseases that affect the small airways, 3 mm or less in diameter (terminal and respiratory bronchioles and alveolar ducts). Damage to the bronchiolar epithelium by inflammation and sometimes by fibrosis is present
(150,401,425). These conditions can be simplistically subdivided histologically into constrictive and proliferative forms.
Constrictive (Obliterative) Bronchiolitis
In constrictive (obliterative) bronchiolitis, inflammation and granulation tissue of the bronchiolar wall and resultant fibrosis of the submucosal and peribronchiolar tissues causes narrowing or obstruction of the bronchiolar lumen (191). On HRCT, a pattern of mosaic attenuation is seen, typically with a patchy geographic distribution throughout the lungs, as a result of both air trapping and reflex vasoconstriction (due to decreased ventilation) (Fig. 7-
205) (655). Areas of decreased lung attenuation with relatively small vessels are seen, alternating with nearby regions of relatively increased attenuation with larger caliber vessels due to blood flow redistribution (441). These abnormal findings can be accentuated and confirmed (20), and sometimes only seen, on scans obtained in expiration (19,176,216,347,582). Such scans enable distinction of
P.548 small airways from small vessel disease, another cause of the mosaic attenuation pattern; no air trapping occurs in the latter and enlarged central pulmonary arteries commonly are seen. Etiologies of constrictive bronchiolitis include infections (usually viral), graftversus host disease in transplantation patients, connective tissue/collagen vascular diseases, drugs and inhaled toxins, but the cause may not be apparent (idiopathic) (87,150,507,605). Swyer-
James syndrome, a hyperlucent small or normal-sized lung with diminished vascular supply, is believed to be a result of bronchiolitis obliterans occurring in early childhood as a complication of a viral infection (see Fig. 7-205C) (388).
Figure 7-206  Centrilobular nodules and tree-in-bud pattern; endobronchial spread of tuberculosis . CT shows the changes in the right lower lobe.
Proliferative Bronchiolitis
In proliferative bronchiolitis, organizing exudate is present in the small airways. On HRCT, ill-defined micronodules are seen in the center of the secondary pulmonary lobules (Fig. 7-164), with advanced forms producing the characteristic “tree-in-bud― appearance (see Fig. 7-165; Fig. 7-206) (88). Secretions withindilated terminal and respiratory bronchioles result in these centrilobular nodular opacities, often with a branching or Y-shaped configuration (633). Some associated thickening of the interlobular septa and bronchiolar wall dilatation and thickening may be present.
This form of the disease usually is secondary to infection, but hypersensitivity pneumonia or connective tissue/collagen vascular disease (especially rheumatoid arthritis and dermatomyositis) (Fig.
7-207), can be the cause or it may be idiopathic. Diffuse panbronchiolitis, characterized by diffuse airway inflammation, affects primarily persons of Asian origin. Bronchiectasis and bronchiolectasis with peripheral nodular opacities representing dilated opacified bronchioles may be seen on HRCT (431).
Figure 7-207  Proliferative bronchiolitis; rheumatoid arthritis.
High-resolution CT shows attenuation of the vessels in the lower lobes, accompanied by some dilated thick- walled bronchi.
When proliferative bronchiolitis is associated with intraluminalgranulation polyps and some organizing pneumonia in the surrounding lung parenchyma, organizing pneumonia pattern predominates on HRCT; the idiopathic form is known as BOOP
(cryptogenic organizing pneumonia ) (as noted in the discussion of chronic interstitial pneumonias).
Pulmonary Vasculitis
There are a variety of inflammatory conditions involving the small peripheral pulmonary vessels, including the Churg-Strauss syndrome
(92). Small vessel occlusive disease may produce a mosaic attenuation pattern on HRCT images (Fig. 7-208) (210). Early disease may be inconspicuous without some image manipulation, such as MINIP
P.549 reconstructions. No air trapping would be noted on expiratory CT scans. Small areas of parenchymal ground glass opacities and/or consolidation may occur, with small pulmonary nodules much less frequently seen.
Figure 7-208  Pulmonary vasculitis. High-resolution computedtomography shows patchy areas of ground-glass opacification with regions of mosaic oligemia.
Pulmonary Lymphoid Disorders
Pulmonary lymphoid disorders are a spectrum of reactive inflammatory and malignant processes, with variable radiologic manifestations (25,162,296,300).
Bronchus-associated tissue (BALT) and mucosa-associated lymphoid tissue (MALT) is distributed throughout the lung along the bronchi and interlobar septa. Follicular polyclonal hyperplasia of this lymphoid tissue results in follicular bronchiolitis, which is commonly associated with connective tissue/collagen vascular diseases, especially rheumatoid arthritis. HRCT usually demonstrates centrilobular nodules and some focal ground glass opacities, and sometimes air trapping.
Lymphocytic interstitial pneumonia, already described, is a diffuse hyperplasia of these BALT or MALT.
Nodular lymphoid hyperplasia (pseudolymphoma) is probably exceedingly rare, with most previously reported cases probably representing a low grade B-cell lymphoma. This entity usually is manifested as a pulmonary nodule or small area of consolidation.
Any associated lymphadenopathy or pleural effusion should suggest a malignant neoplastic process.
Primary pulmonary lymphoma, almost all B cell, is uncommon, representing less than 1% of lymphomas at presentation. Generally, a poorly defined nodule(s), mass(es) or area of consolidation is seen, which frequently contains air bronchograms. CT may show narrowed bronchi entering the nodule/consolidation. The CT angiogram sign, with enhancing vessels seen within an area of consolidation lung, initially described with bronchoalveolar cellcarcinoma, also may be encountered with primary pulmonary lymphoma. Less aggressive, small, mass-like, monoclonal lymphoid hyperplastic lesions may arise from the bronchi or mucosa
(BALTOMA or MALTOMA).
Lymphomatoid granulomatosis is a B-cell lymphoma, usually containing abundant reactive T cells, perhaps initiated by the
Epstein-Barr virus (as described in the discussion of Wegener granulomatosis).
Pulmonary Infections
Standard chest radiography is the primary technique for imaging pulmonary infections. The distribution and severity of pulmonary consolidation, presence of cavitation, mediastinal lymphadenopathy, or a parapneumonic effusion is usually well demonstrated. CT can be helpful in complex cases (Fig. 7-209). The findings are similar to those seen with plain film radiographs. Air bronchograms are well demonstrated within areas of consolidation (Fig. 7-210); lung necrosis (Fig. 7-211), occult mediastinal adenopathy, or the lipid content of lipoid pneumonia can be revealed.Figure 7-209  Aspiration pneumonia. CT shows focal area of consolidation in posterior segment of the right upper lobe, a common site.
Mycobacterial
The incidence of pulmonary tuberculosis, including primary tuberculosis and Mycobacterium avium-intracellulare  (M. avium  and
M.intracellulare  are closely related and difficult to separate), has increased over the last decade, attributable in part to AIDS
(183,329,529).
Primary tuberculosis usually presents as an area of consolidation similar to that of bacterial pneumonia. Mediastinal lymphadenopathy and pleural effusions may
P.550 accompany the primary infection and in some cases adenopathy may be the only intrathoracic manifestation. The involved lymph nodes inpatients with tuberculosis often demonstrate central areas of necrosis, which are low in attenuation on CT, especially on postcontrast–enhanced scans (387).
Figure 7-210  Bacterial ( Legionella ) pneumonia. CT shows nonspecific consolidation of most of the right lung with air bronchograms.Figure 7-211  Necrotizing pneumonia; Pseudomonas .A, B:
Mediastinal and lung window setting CT images show left upper lobe consolidation with cavitation and abscess formation, and an air fluid level. Some reactive left hilar and aortopulmonary lymph node enlargement is present.
Endobronchial spread of tuberculosis, caused by erosion of an infected focus into the tracheobronchial tree, may present as disseminated nodules or produce a tree-in-bud appearance on HRCT, as multiple acini within a secondary pulmonary lobule fill with inflammatory material (see Fig. 7-206). These opacities, measuring up to 1 cm in diameter, are larger than those seen with miliary tuberculosis (282). Reactivation tuberculosis frequently presents as upper lobe consolidation with cavitation and fibrosis, without adenopathy and effusions (Fig. 7-212) (329,529).
Nontuberculous mycobacterial disease ( M. avium intracellulare , or M. avium intracellulare complex , plus M. kansasii  in the United States andM. xenopi  in Canada) may resemble classic reinfection tuberculosis, with nodular opacities and fibrocavitary disease predominating in the upper lobes (120). This form of the disease is most prevalent in older men, typically alcoholic men with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease. A much more common form of M.avium intracellulare  is seen now in older women with no predisposing illness (sometimes called the Lady Windermere syndrome , occurring in fastidious elderly women who do not expectorate). On HRCT, this pattern is characterized by multifocal cylindrical bronchiectasis and small peribronchial nodules, most frequently in the middle lobe and lingula (see Fig. 7-89) (249). In addition, M. avium intracellulare  infection is relatively common in immunosuppressed patients, especially those with AIDS when the
CD4 cell count drops below 100 cells/mm3.
Figure 7-212  Reactivation tuberculosis. In a patient with lupus erythematosus on corticosteroid therapy, CT shows irregular areas of consolidation in both pulmonary apices.
Aspergillus
There is a spectrum of pulmonary involvement with Aspergillus fumigatus , dependent largely on the patient's immune status.
Aspergillus  is the most common fungal
P.551 infection in non-AIDS immunocompromised patients, due to bone marrow transplantation or leukemia or lymphoma (Figs. 7-213 and7-214). A mycetoma, or fungus ball, usually represents saprophytic secondary colonization of a preexisting cavity, frequently old tuberculosis or sarcoidosis (see Fig. 7-117; Fig. 7-215). The intracavitary mass may be mobile and exhibit an air crescent sign.
Figure 7-213  Invasive aspergillosis. In this patient post–bone marrow transplantation for lymphoma, a necrotizing pneumonia is seen in the left upper lobe. A thrombus ( arrowhead ) is present in the left pulmonary artery secondary to this process.Figure 7-214  Semi-invasive Aspergillus . In this patient post–marrow transplantation for leukemia, both consolidation and a fungus ball (f) are seen in a necrotizing pneumonia in the right upper lobe.
Allergic bronchopulmonary aspergillosis represents a hyperimmune response to aspergillosis. Most patients have asthma or cystic fibrosis, as well as eosinophilia and elevated serum immunoglobulin
(Ig) E levels. CT usually demonstrates central bronchiectasis with impacted mucus, which typically is colonized by aspergillosis (see
Fig. 7-86).Figure 7-215  Fungus ball; Aspergillus fumigatus . In this patient with sarcoidosis and hemoptysis, CT demonstrates a dependent mass in a thick-walled cavity in the left upper lobe.
Invasive aspergillus is a common, life-threatening complication of immunosuppression and transplantation, particularly when such patients are severely neutropenic (<500 cells/mm3). Inhaled spores in these patients form a small nidus of infection within the small airways, and hyphae produced often invade into small adjacent pulmonary arteries, leading to distal infarction and necrosis. This thrombosis incites a halo of hemorrhage around the nodule (1 to 3 cm in diameter). Sputum culture and plain chest radiographs are neither sensitive nor specific. Unexplained fever in such a patient is a reasonable indication for chest CT to search for occult infection.
Identification of the halo sign (a solid soft tissue attenuation nodule or mass surrounded by a veil-like perimeter of ground glass opacification) in a lung nodule is highly suggestive of early angioinvasive aspergillosis (see Fig. 7-120) (306,309), albeit notdefinitive, but usually justifies earlier employment of antifungal therapy (138). The halo sign can also be seen with invasive mucormycosis (368), Candida , and Pseudomonas . The subsequent identification of lung lesions with an air-crescent, after recovery from neutropenia, confirms the pathogenic sequence and suggests a favorable outcome (see Fig. 7-214). Sometimes a larger area of peripheral wedge-shaped consolidation is seen due to infarction caused by invasion of a larger pulmonary artery (see Fig. 7-213).
Lung Abscess
Lung abscess is usually a complication of a necrotizing pneumonia
(e.g.,Staphylococcus aureus  or anaerobic Streptococcus ). Most cases can be diagnosed on chest radiography, with CT reserved for further evaluation of complex pleuroparenchymal opacities, including distinction from an empyema (Fig. 7-216). On CT, an abscess generally is a
P.552 round cavity with a relatively thick, irregular inner wall (see Fig. 7-
211). Vessels and bronchi lead directly to the lesion; they are not displaced around an air-fluid collection as in an empyema. The cavity usually will form acute angles with the pleura and chest wall when it is peripherally located.Figure 7-216  Lung abscess and empyema. In a patient with diabetes, mucormycosis  is responsible for the necrotizing pneumonia and abscess in the left lower lobe. A small peripheral empyema (e), with enhancement of the parietal and visceral pleura, also is present.Figure 7-217 Candidiasis .A: In a patient with Crohn disease on corticosteroid therapy, CT demonstrates bilateral ill-defined pulmonary nodular opacities due to hematogenous dissemination. B: CT image through upper abdomen demonstrates microabscesses in the spleen.
Immunocompromised Patients, Pulmonary
Infections
Bacterial pneumonias, as in the general population, are most prevalent, but there is a predominance of gram- negative bacilli
(e.g., pseudomonas, enterobacter) as the etiologic agent (331,654).
Pulmonary consolidation is the most common radiologic pattern, with a segmental or lobar distribution, and cavitation is frequent.
Nocardia usually occurs in patients on corticosteroid therapy, and often presents as nodules. Candidiasis many occur in patients with lymphoma or leukemia who are on antibiotic therapy. Either ground glass opacities or consolidation may be seen on CT when the airway is the portal of entry, whereas nodules predominate in hematogenous dissemination (Fig. 7-217). Small multifocal low attenuation nodules in the liver and spleen are frequent in the latterform. Cytomegalovirus (CMV) pulmonary infection is most frequent in patients following organ or bone marrow transplantation, on cyclosporine or similar immunosuppressants. Micronodules or patchy ground glass opacities are the usual CT findings (370). Septic emboli may be a complication of long-term indwelling catheters in these patients, and most frequently appear as multiple pulmonary nodules, many of which exhibit cavitation (Fig. 7-218); concomitant pleural effusion(s) is common (208).
AIDS
A variety of opportunistic infections may occur in AIDS
(56,217,330,356,371,373,377,556) with a notable relationship to the underlying immune status of the individual patient. The T4 helper cell, the primary target of the HIV, can be monitored by measuring the CD4 count, with a decline reflecting a worsening immune system. Bacterial infections, including Hemophilus , influenza, Pseudomonas , and Mycobacterium  tuberculosis, start to occur with increasing frequency with CD4 counts between 200 and
500 cells/mm3. Only with more profound impairment of the immune system, with CD4 counts less than 200 cells/mm3, do the true opportunistic infections occur, such as PCP. CMV pneumonia and M. avium-intracellulare  infection almost always occur when the CD4 count is less than 60 cells/mm3. Neoplasms related to AIDS do not exhibit a direct relationship to the host's immune status. AIDS- related lymphoma and Kaposi sarcoma may occur with mild to moderate immune system impairment. AIDS patients often have more than one pulmonary disease, thus complicating both diagnosis and treatment. Blood tests measuring the actual number of viruses have recently been used as markers of immune status and susceptibility to opportunistic infections.
The incidence of PCP infection is decreasing as a consequence of widespread prophylactic therapy. The clinical and radiologic presentation is variable (48). PCP may present with a spectrum ofCT findings (311). Ground-glass infiltrates may be seen, especially on HRCT, as the earliest manifestation and in a patient with AIDS is highly suggestive of the diagnosis (Fig. 7-219) (217,556). A predominantly reticular interstitial pattern, with perihilar extension, may occur. This may progress to areas of consolidation.
Occasionally, PCP may present as a pulmonary nodule (311), presumably representing a granulomatous response to the infection, and is seen in patients less severely immunocompromised. A cystic form of PCP generally is encountered only in AIDS patients, characterized by multiple irregularly shaped, variably sized, thin wall cysts in an upper lobe and often subpleural location (312), thought to be the result of tissue necrosis and repeat infections
(129). Pneumothorax is a common subsequent complication;
P.553 the resultant air leaks are difficult to seal and chest tubes may be required for prolonged periods. Pleural effusions and lymphadenopathy are rare and may be related to a concomitant disease.
CMV is the most common virus causing significant morbidity and mortality in AIDS patients. The CT findings in CMV pneumonitis typically are a mixed alveolar and interstitial pattern, virtually identical to that of multiple other diseases, especially PCP (1,373).
Miliary nodules and masses or mass-like infiltrates rarely may present as the dominant finding.Figure 7-218  Septic emboli. A, B: Transaxial and coronal reconstruction lung window setting CT images demonstrate thick-walled cavities in the periphery of both lungs. C: A vegetation (endocarditis) is also depicted on the tricuspid valve ( arrow).Figure 7-219 Pneumocystis carinii  pneumonia. CT shows patchy ground-glass opacities scattered throughout both lungs. A prior chest radiograph had been interpreted as normal.
Fungal infections are relatively uncommon in AIDS patients (573), withAspergillus  and Cryptococcus  the most common offenders. With invasive aspergillosis, a nodular mass, occasionally cavitary with a surrounding halo, may occur. Nonspecific nodules or masses are seen with cryptococcus (Fig. 7-220). Histoplasmosis also can present as nodules (Fig. 7-221) or a miliary pattern of disseminated disease.
The appearance of tuberculosis in HIV-infected patients depends on the level of immune suppression (183). It ranges from a more typical presentation in patients with relatively normal immune system (CD4 count >200 cells/mm3), with reactivation features such as apical fibrocavitary disease or irregular nodules related to bronchogenic spread, to a pattern of primary tuberculosis with lobar or segmental consolidation and enlarged, necrotic mediastinal lymph nodes or hematogenous miliary dissemination in patients with marked immune compromise (371). M. avium-intracellulare  or M.kansasii  infection may appear quite similar, and usually occurs when the CD4 count is less than 50 cells/mm3.
Lymphoproliferative disorders, including lymphocytic interstitial pneumonia, lymphocytic bronchiolitis, and
P.554 lymphoma, may affect the lung in AIDS patients (371,374). The pulmonary manifestations of non-Hodgkin lymphoma in AIDS typically are nodules or masses, sometimes with air bronchograms.
Figure 7-220 Cryptococcosis .A: CT demonstrates thick-walled cavitary nodules in the right lower lobe.B: CT-guided aspiration biopsy disclosed the diagnosis.
Kaposi sarcoma may involve lymph nodes and internal organs, usually in association with skin lesions (196). Pulmonary, pleural,and tracheobronchial involvement occurs in approximately one third of patients with cutaneous lesions. CT may demonstrate linear opacities and ill-defined irregular nodules in a peribronchovascular distribution (105,196). Lymphadenopathy is uncommon (424).
Lung Transplantation
Lung transplantation is now an accepted treatment for a variety of end-stage pulmonary diseases, including emphysema, fibrosis, lymphangioleimymatous, and primary pulmonary arterial hypertension (94). One-year survival after this procedure currently exceeds 90%, with a 5-year survival approximating 50%. There are complications, some relatively unique to lung transplantation, including airway ischemia, acute and chronic rejection, plus those related to immunosuppression therapy (90). Imaging techniques, including CT, have an important role in the detection and diagnosis of such problems.
Figure 7-221  Disseminated histoplasmosis . CT shows ill-defined peripheral nodules in both lungs.Airway complications, including dehiscence and stenosis, the result of ischemia, are depicted with a high degree
P.555 of sensitivity and specificity with CT (367,545). Anastomotic dehiscence is manifested by peribronchial extraluminal air collections, generally in direct contiguity with the site of anastomosis. This complication is detected earlier and more definitely with CT compared with plain chest radiography (Fig. 7-
222). There may be concomitant pneumomediastinum, pneumopericardium, interstitial air, and even a pneumothorax.
Fortunately, this complication is notably decreased in frequency today due to improvements in surgical technique, including telescoping of the transplanted major bronchi, which are wrapped with pericardium.
Figure 7-222  Bronchial dehiscence following left lung transplantation. CT reveals an abnormal air collection adjacent to a discontinuity in the left main bronchusat the site of the anastomosis. Advanced emphysema is present in the native right lung.
Figure 7-223  Lymphoproliferative disorder following lung transplantation. CT shows a lobular nodule in the right lower lobe, and a larger nodule with surrounding ground-glass attenuation (halo-sign) plus satellite nodules in the left lower lobe. The diagnosis was established by percutaneous needle biopsy to differentiate the nodules from an opportunistic infection.
Chronic allograft rejection, characterized histologically by bronchiolitis obliterans, generally occurs 3 months or more after lung transplantation, most frequently at 16 to 20 months, and is present in almost all lung recipients by 5 years (55,392). HRCT may demonstrate a mosaic attenuation pattern, with air trapping and dilatation (299,321,558).Posttransplantation lymphoproliferative disorder is a spectrum of B- cell disease, ranging from benign polyclonal lymphoid hyperplasia to aggressively malignant monoclonal non-Hodgkin lymphoma (483).
Epstein-Barr virus infection may be the etiologic agent in some cases. It may develop as soon as 3 months after lung transplantation (even sooner in pediatric patients), with most cases occurring in the first year following transplantation. The thorax is involved in most patients, typically by an ill-defined pulmonary nodule(s), similar in appearance to a fungal infection (Fig. 7-223).
Multifocal consolidation and/or mediastinal lymph node enlargement are other possible manifestations.
Recurrence of the primary pulmonary disease is another consideration in patients who develop abnormal chest radiographic or CT findings (89,204).
